1000
425,n, The zeal of thine house hath eaten me up. 
Then answered the Jews and said unto him, What sign shewest thou unto us, seeing that thou doest these things? 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Destroy this temple, and in three days I will raise it up. 
Then said the Jews, Forty and six years was this temple in building, and wilt thou rear it up in three days? 
But he spake of the temple of his body. 
When therefore he was
430,he gospel, not where Christ was named, lest I should build upon another man's foundation: 
But as it is written, To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see: and they that have not heard shall understand. 
For which cause also I have been much hindered from coming to you. 
But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great desire these many years to come unto you; 
Whensoever I take my journey into Spain, I will 
322, of Saul. 
And Samuel came no more to see Saul until the day of his death: nevertheless Samuel mourned for Saul: and the LORD repented that he had made Saul king over Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Samuel, How long wilt thou mourn for Saul, seeing I have rejected him from reigning over Israel? fill thine horn with oil, 
354,ion, how that beyond measure I persecuted the church of God, and wasted it: 
And profited in the Jews' religion above many my equals in mine own nation, being more exceedingly zealous of the traditions of my fathers. 
But when it pleased God, who separated me from my mother's womb, and called me by his grace, 
To reveal his Son in me, that I might prea
469,nd speaking; but ye hearkened not unto me. 
I have sent also unto you all my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them, saying, Return ye now every man from his evil way, and amend your doings, and go not after other gods to serve them, and ye shall dwell in the land which I have given to you and to your fathers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearkened unto me. 
Because the sons of Jonadab the son of Rechab have performed the commandment of t
432,have sent unto you, saying, Ye shall not say, The burden of the LORD; 
Therefore, behold, I, even I, will utterly forget you, and I will forsake you, and the city that I gave you and your fathers, and cast you out of my presence: 
And I will bring an everlasting reproach upon you, and a perpetual shame, which shall not be forgotten. 
The LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set before the temple of the LORD, aft
344,For he knoweth vain men: he seeth wickedness also; will he not then consider it? 
For vain men would be wise, though man be born like a wild ass's colt. 
If thou prepare thine heart, and stretch out thine hands toward him; 
If iniquity be in thine hand, put it far away, and let not wickedness dwell in thy tabernacles. 
For then shalt thou lif
357,and to build Jerusalem unto the Messiah the Prince shall be seven weeks, and threescore and two weeks: the street shall be built again, and the wall, even in troublous times. 
And after threescore and two weeks shall Messiah be cut off, but not for himself: and the people of the prince that shall come shall destroy the city and the sanctuary; and the end 
394,ck again, saying, All that was committed to thy servants, they do it. 
And they have gathered together the money that was found in the house of the LORD, and have delivered it into the hand of the overseers, and to the hand of the workmen. 
Then Shaphan the scribe told the king, saying, Hilkiah the priest hath given me a book. And Shaphan read it before the king. 
And it came to pass, when t
425, in the service of the king. 
Among the Hebronites was Jerijah the chief, even among the Hebronites, according to the generations of his fathers. In the fortieth year of the reign of David they were sought for, and there were found among them mighty men of valour at Jazer of Gilead. 
And his brethren, men of valour, were two thousand and seven hundred chief fathers, whom king David made rulers over the Reubenites, the Gad
373,ay. 
And Abraham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar. 
And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah. 
But God came to Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him, Behold, thou art but a dead man, for the woman which thou hast taken; for she
479,e out of the city, and the army which followed them. 
And they slew every one his man: and the Syrians fled; and Israel pursued them: and Benhadad the king of Syria escaped on an horse with the horsemen. 
And the king of Israel went out, and smote the horses and chariots, and slew the Syrians with a great slaughter. 
And the prophet came to the king of Israel, and said unto him, Go, strengthen thyself, and mark, and see what thou doest: for at the return of the year the king
398, Bethhaccerem; he built it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof. 
But the gate of the fountain repaired Shallun the son of Colhozeh, the ruler of part of Mizpah; he built it, and covered it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof, and the wall of the pool of Siloah by the king's garden, and unto the stairs that go down from the cit
399,e. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; It shall also come to pass, that at the same time shall things come into thy mind, and thou shalt think an evil thought: 
And thou shalt say, I will go up to the land of unwalled villages; I will go to them that are at rest, that dwell safely, all of them dwelling without walls, and having neither bars nor gates, 
To take a spoil, and to take a prey; to turn thine han
322,son of Nethaniah went forth from Mizpah to meet them, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met them, he said unto them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam. 
And it was so, when they came into the midst of the city, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst of the pit, h
346,on of one of the apothecaries, and they fortified Jerusalem unto the broad wall. 
And next unto them repaired Rephaiah the son of Hur, the ruler of the half part of Jerusalem. 
And next unto them repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, even over against his house. And next unto him repaired Hattush the son of Hashabniah. 
Malchijah the son of Har
451,else, but either to tell, or to hear some new thing.) 
Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars' hill, and said, Ye men of Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious. 
For as I passed by, and beheld your devotions, I found an altar with this inscription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye ignorantly worship, him declare I unto you. 
God that made the world and all things therein, seeing that he is Lord of heaven and earth, dwell
449,tutes and judgments, which ye shall observe to do in the land, which the LORD God of thy fathers giveth thee to possess it, all the days that ye live upon the earth. 
Ye shall utterly destroy all the places, wherein the nations which ye shall possess served their gods, upon the high mountains, and upon the hills, and under every green tree: 
And ye shall overthrow their altars, and break their pillars, and burn their groves with fire; and ye sha
404, midst of a bush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned with fire, and the bush was not consumed. 
And Moses said, I will now turn aside, and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt. 
And when the LORD saw that he turned aside to see, God called unto him out of the midst of the bush, and said, Moses, Moses. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, Draw not nigh hither: put off thy shoes fro
414, strive with Isaac's herdmen, saying, The water is ours: and he called the name of the well Esek; because they strove with him. 
And they digged another well, and strove for that also: and he called the name of it Sitnah. 
And he removed from thence, and digged another well; and for that they strove not: and he called the name of it Rehoboth; and he said, For now the LORD hath made room for us, and we shall be 
327,arken unto them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David? and we have none inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to your tents, O Israel: and now, David, see to thine own house. So all Israel went to their tents. 
But as for the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities of Judah, Rehoboam re
363, partakers of the benefit. These things teach and exhort. 
If any man teach otherwise, and consent not to wholesome words, even the words of our Lord Jesus Christ, and to the doctrine which is according to godliness; 
He is proud, knowing nothing, but doting about questions and strifes of words, whereof cometh envy, strife, railings, evil surmisings, 
Perverse 
432,on of Levi, which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Janna, which was the son of Joseph, 
Which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Amos, which was the son of Naum, which was the son of Esli, which was the son of Nagge, 
Which was the son of Maath, which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Semei, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the s
436,g prayers: these shall receive greater damnation. 
And Jesus sat over against the treasury, and beheld how the people cast money into the treasury: and many that were rich cast in much. 
And there came a certain poor widow, and she threw in two mites, which make a farthing. 
And he called unto him his disciples, and saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That this poor widow hath cast more in, than all they which have cast into the
378,tes: of Jesui, the family of the Jesuites: of Beriah, the family of the Beriites. 
Of the sons of Beriah: of Heber, the family of the Heberites: of Malchiel, the family of the Malchielites. 
And the name of the daughter of Asher was Sarah. 
These are the families of the sons of Asher according to those that were numbered of them; who were fifty and three thousand and four hun
320,indle in them, and devour them; and there shall not be any remaining of the house of Esau; for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And they of the south shall possess the mount of Esau; and they of the plain the Philistines: and they shall possess the fields of Ephraim, and the fields of Samaria: and Benjamin shall possess Gilea
438,. 
Therefore he lifted up his hand against them, to overthrow them in the wilderness: 
To overthrow their seed also among the nations, and to scatter them in the lands. 
They joined themselves also unto Baalpeor, and ate the sacrifices of the dead. 
Thus they provoked him to anger with their inventions: and the plague brake in upon them. 
Then stood up Phinehas, and executed judgment: and so the plague was stayed. 
And that was counte
445,baskets ye took up? 
How is it that ye do not understand that I spake it not to you concerning bread, that ye should beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees? 
Then understood they how that he bade them not beware of the leaven of bread, but of the doctrine of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees. 
When Jesus came into the coasts of Caesarea Philippi, he asked his disciples, saying, Whom do men say that I the Son of man am? 

412,heless among the chief rulers also many believed on him; but because of the Pharisees they did not confess him, lest they should be put out of the synagogue: 
For they loved the praise of men more than the praise of God. 
Jesus cried and said, He that believeth on me, believeth not on me, but on him that sent me. 
And he that seeth me seeth him that sent me. 
I am come a light into the world, that whosoever b
412,ll be saved; but he that believeth not shall be damned. 
And these signs shall follow them that believe; In my name shall they cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues; 
They shall take up serpents; and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall not hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick, and they shall recover. 
So then after the Lord had spoken unto them, he was received up into heaven, and sat
381,y messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
For I say unto you, Among those that are born of women there is not a greater prophet than John the Baptist: but he that is least in the kingdom of God is greater than he. 
And all the people that heard him, and the publicans, justified God, being baptized with the baptism of John. 
But the Pharisees and lawy
361,ven thousand and one hundred. 
Of the children of Levi four thousand and six hundred. 
And Jehoiada was the leader of the Aaronites, and with him were three thousand and seven hundred; 
And Zadok, a young man mighty of valour, and of his father's house twenty and two captains. 
And of the children of Benjamin, the kindred of Saul, three thousand: for hitherto
413,h weakness, yet he liveth by the power of God. For we also are weak in him, but we shall live with him by the power of God toward you. 
Examine yourselves, whether ye be in the faith; prove your own selves. Know ye not your own selves, how that Jesus Christ is in you, except ye be reprobates? 
But I trust that ye shall know that we are not reprobates. 
Now I pray to God that ye do no evil; not that we should a
404,the Manassites. 
And the Gileadites took the passages of Jordan before the Ephraimites: and it was so, that when those Ephraimites which were escaped said, Let me go over; that the men of Gilead said unto him, Art thou an Ephraimite? If he said, Nay; 
Then said they unto him, Say now Shibboleth: and he said Sibboleth: for he could not frame to pronounce it right. Then they took him, and slew him at th
452,command the serpent, and he shall bite them: 
And though they go into captivity before their enemies, thence will I command the sword, and it shall slay them: and I will set mine eyes upon them for evil, and not for good. 
And the Lord GOD of hosts is he that toucheth the land, and it shall melt, and all that dwell therein shall mourn: and it shall rise up wholly like a flood; and shall be drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
It is he that buildeth 
327,dah, city by city, 
And said to the judges, Take heed what ye do: for ye judge not for man, but for the LORD, who is with you in the judgment. 
Wherefore now let the fear of the LORD be upon you; take heed and do it: for there is no iniquity with the LORD our God, nor respect of persons, nor taking of gifts. 
Moreover in Jeru
463, day, and hath given it to a neighbour of thine, that is better than thou. 
And also the Strength of Israel will not lie nor repent: for he is not a man, that he should repent. 
Then he said, I have sinned: yet honour me now, I pray thee, before the elders of my people, and before Israel, and turn again with me, that I may worship the LORD thy God. 
So Samuel turned again after Saul; and Saul worshipped the LORD. 
Then said Samuel, Bring ye hither to me Agag 
369, beside me, while thine handmaid slept, and laid it in her bosom, and laid her dead child in my bosom. 
And when I rose in the morning to give my child suck, behold, it was dead: but when I had considered it in the morning, behold, it was not my son, which I did bear. 
And the other woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the dead is thy son. And this said, No
451,And Esau ran to meet him, and embraced him, and fell on his neck, and kissed him: and they wept. 
And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the women and the children; and said, Who are those with thee? And he said, The children which God hath graciously given thy servant. 
Then the handmaidens came near, they and their children, and they bowed themselves. 
And Leah also with her children came near, and bowed themselves: and after came Joseph near and Ra
358, and drink their water with astonishment, that her land may be desolate from all that is therein, because of the violence of all them that dwell therein. 
And the cities that are inhabited shall be laid waste, and the land shall be desolate; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, what is that prov
425,her's brother, and that he was Rebekah's son: and she ran and told her father. 
And it came to pass, when Laban heard the tidings of Jacob his sister's son, that he ran to meet him, and embraced him, and kissed him, and brought him to his house. And he told Laban all these things. 
And Laban said to him, Surely thou art my bone and my flesh. And he abode with him the space of a month. 
And Laban said unto Jacob, Because t
379,nto the tabernacle. 
And it came to pass, as Moses entered into the tabernacle, the cloudy pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and the Lord talked with Moses. 
And all the people saw the cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle door: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent door. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man 
397,
And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth. 
John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom I spake, He that cometh after me is preferred before me: for he was before me. 
And of his fulness have all we received, and grace for grace. 
For the law was given by Moses, but g
418,ver against Bethpeor, in the land of Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon, whom Moses and the children of Israel smote, after they were come forth out of Egypt: 
And they possessed his land, and the land of Og king of Bashan, two kings of the Amorites, which were on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
From Aroer, which is by the bank of the river Arnon, even unto mount Sion, which is Hermon, 
And al
345,nd king Rehoboam consulted with the old men, that stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, and said, How do ye advise that I may answer this people? 
And they spake unto him, saying, If thou wilt be a servant unto this people this day, and wilt serve them, and answer them, and speak good words to them, then they will be thy servants
462,ff. 
Behold, I have refined thee, but not with silver; I have chosen thee in the furnace of affliction. 
For mine own sake, even for mine own sake, will I do it: for how should my name be polluted? and I will not give my glory unto another. 
Hearken unto me, O Jacob and Israel, my called; I am he; I am the first, I also am the last. 
Mine hand also hath laid the foundation of the earth, and my right hand hath spanned the heavens: when I call unto them, they 
347, him that needeth. 
Let no corrupt communication proceed out of your mouth, but that which is good to the use of edifying, that it may minister grace unto the hearers. 
And grieve not the holy Spirit of God, whereby ye are sealed unto the day of redemption. 
Let all bitterness, and wrath, and anger, and clamour, and evil speaking, be put away fr
357,he hath been rebellious against me, saith the LORD. 
Thy way and thy doings have procured these things unto thee; this is thy wickedness, because it is bitter, because it reacheth unto thine heart. 
My bowels, my bowels! I am pained at my very heart; my heart maketh a noise in me; I cannot hold my peace, because thou hast heard, O my soul, the sound of th
432,of all things secretly in the siege and straitness, wherewith thine enemy shall distress thee in thy gates. 
If thou wilt not observe to do all the words of this law that are written in this book, that thou mayest fear this glorious and fearful name, THE LORD THY GOD; 
Then the LORD will make thy plagues wonderful, and the plagues of thy seed, even great plagues, and of long continuance, and sore sicknesses, and of long continua
376,people said unto Joshua, Nay; but we will serve the LORD. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye are witnesses against yourselves that ye have chosen you the LORD, to serve him. And they said, We are witnesses. 
Now therefore put away, said he, the strange gods which are among you, and incline your heart unto the LORD God of Israel. 
And the people said unto Joshua, The LORD 
338,be exalted. 
It is God that avengeth me, and subdueth the people under me. 
He delivereth me from mine enemies: yea, thou liftest me up above those that rise up against me: thou hast delivered me from the violent man. 
Therefore will I give thanks unto thee, O LORD, among the heathen, and sing praises unto thy name. 
Great deliverance g
381,. 
All these had taken strange wives: and some of them had wives by whom they had children. 
The words of Nehemiah the son of Hachaliah. And it came to pass in the month Chisleu, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the palace, 
That Hanani, one of my brethren, came, he and certain men of Judah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, which were left of the 
353, forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with the best gold. 
The throne had six steps, and the top of the throne was round behind: and there were stays on either side on the place of the seat, and two lions stood beside the stays. 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six s
333,that thou didst depart out of the land of Egypt, until ye came unto this place, ye have been rebellious against the LORD. 
Also in Horeb ye provoked the LORD to wrath, so that the LORD was angry with you to have destroyed you. 
When I was gone up into the mount to receive the tables of stone, even the tables of the covenant which t
475,red them, even Othniel the son of Kenaz, Caleb's younger brother. 
And the Spirit of the LORD came upon him, and he judged Israel, and went out to war: and the LORD delivered Chushanrishathaim king of Mesopotamia into his hand; and his hand prevailed against Chushanrishathaim. 
And the land had rest forty years. And Othniel the son of Kenaz died. 
And the children of Israel did evil again in the sight of the LORD: and the LORD strengthened Eglon the king of Moab against 
432,sure that the judgment of God is according to truth against them which commit such things. 
And thinkest thou this, O man, that judgest them which do such things, and doest the same, that thou shalt escape the judgment of God? 
Or despisest thou the riches of his goodness and forbearance and longsuffering; not knowing that the goodness of God leadeth thee to repentance? 
But after thy hardness and impenitent heart treasurest up 
450,out of their cities. 
It may be they will present their supplication before the LORD, and will return every one from his evil way: for great is the anger and the fury that the LORD hath pronounced against this people. 
And Baruch the son of Neriah did according to all that Jeremiah the prophet commanded him, reading in the book the words of the LORD in the LORD's house. 
And it came to pass in the fifth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of
321,still, and believed not for his wondrous works. 
Therefore their days did he consume in vanity, and their years in trouble. 
When he slew them, then they sought him: and they returned and enquired early after God. 
And they remembered that God was their rock, and the high God their redeemer. 
Nevertheless they did flatt
433,n hath lift up any iron: and they offered thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace offerings. 
And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses, which he wrote in the presence of the children of Israel. 
And all Israel, and their elders, and officers, and their judges, stood on this side the ark and on that side before the priests the Levites, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, as well
414,d the diminishing of them the riches of the Gentiles; how much more their fulness? 
For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 
If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them. 
For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if
327,hee, nor forsake thee, until thou hast finished all the work for the service of the house of the LORD. 
And, behold, the courses of the priests and the Levites, even they shall be with thee for all the service of the house of God: and there shall be with thee for all manner of workmanship every willing skilful man, for any ma
424, and the deputies and rulers of the provinces which are from India unto Ethiopia, an hundred twenty and seven provinces, unto every province according to the writing thereof, and unto every people after their language, and to the Jews according to their writing, and according to their language. 
And he wrote in the king Ahasuerus' name, and sealed it with the king's ring, and sent letters by posts on horseback, and rider
459,mes. 
To many thou shalt give the more inheritance, and to few thou shalt give the less inheritance: to every one shall his inheritance be given according to those that were numbered of him. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be divided by lot: according to the names of the tribes of their fathers they shall inherit. 
According to the lot shall the possession thereof be divided between many and few. 
And these are they that were numbered of the Levites after
434,ll. 
Moreover the light of the moon shall be as the light of the sun, and the light of the sun shall be sevenfold, as the light of seven days, in the day that the LORD bindeth up the breach of his people, and healeth the stroke of their wound. 
Behold, the name of the LORD cometh from far, burning with his anger, and the burden thereof is heavy: his lips are full of indignation, and his tongue as a devouring fire: 
And his breath,
422,ut let not me be confounded: let them be dismayed, but let not me be dismayed: bring upon them the day of evil, and destroy them with double destruction. 
Thus said the LORD unto me; Go and stand in the gate of the children of the people, whereby the kings of Judah come in, and by the which they go out, and in all the gates of Jerusalem; 
And say unto them, Hear ye the word of the LORD, ye kings of Judah, and all Judah
413,d came it not into his mind? 
So that the LORD could no longer bear, because of the evil of your doings, and because of the abominations which ye have committed; therefore is your land a desolation, and an astonishment, and a curse, without an inhabitant, as at this day. 
Because ye have burned incense, and because ye have sinned against the LORD, and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD, nor walked in his la
472,name of the place Hormah. 
And they journeyed from mount Hor by the way of the Red sea, to compass the land of Edom: and the soul of the people was much discouraged because of the way. 
And the people spake against God, and against Moses, Wherefore have ye brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness? for there is no bread, neither is there any water; and our soul loatheth this light bread. 
And the LORD sent fiery serpents among the people, and they bit the pe
360,bread seen with thee in all thy coast seven days; neither shall there any thing of the flesh, which thou sacrificedst the first day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there 
343,him: lo, I have told you. 
And they departed quickly from the sepulchre with fear and great joy; and did run to bring his disciples word. 
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them, saying, All hail. And they came and held him by the feet, and worshipped him. 
Then said Jesus unto them, Be not afraid: go tell my brethren
389,ou shalt not slack to pay it: for the LORD thy God will surely require it of thee; and it would be sin in thee. 
But if thou shalt forbear to vow, it shall be no sin in thee. 
That which is gone out of thy lips thou shalt keep and perform; even a freewill offering, according as thou hast vowed unto the LORD thy God, which thou hast promised with thy mouth. 
When thou comest into thy nei
466,m that he died. 
And unto Abiathar the priest said the king, Get thee to Anathoth, unto thine own fields; for thou art worthy of death: but I will not at this time put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD God before David my father, and because thou hast been afflicted in all wherein my father was afflicted. 
So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest unto the LORD; that he might fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning the 
476,at creepeth upon the earth after his kind: and God saw that it was good. 
And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness: and let them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of the air, and over the cattle, and over all the earth, and over every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth. 
So God created man in his own image, in the image of God created he him; male and female created he them. 
And God blessed them, and God said unto th
431, 
I should have been as though I had not been; I should have been carried from the womb to the grave. 
Are not my days few? cease then, and let me alone, that I may take comfort a little, 
Before I go whence I shall not return, even to the land of darkness and the shadow of death; 
A land of darkness, as darkness itself; and of the shadow of death, without any order, and where the light is as darkness. 
Then answered Zophar the
321,l your carcases be wasted in the wilderness. 
After the number of the days in which ye searched the land, even forty days, each day for a year, shall ye bear your iniquities, even forty years, and ye shall know my breach of promise. 
I the LORD have said, I will surely do it unto all this evil congregation, that are gat
334,ily. 
Now when they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of Galatia, and were forbidden of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in Asia, 
After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into Bithynia: but the Spirit suffered them not. 
And they passing by Mysia came down to Troas. 
And a vision appeared to Paul in the night; Th
361,also shall be dashed to pieces before their eyes; their houses shall be spoiled, and their wives ravished. 
Behold, I will stir up the Medes against them, which shall not regard silver; and as for gold, they shall not delight in it. 
Their bows also shall dash the young men to pieces; and they shall have no pity on the fruit of the womb; their eyes shall not 
370, that the soul of Jonathan was knit with the soul of David, and Jonathan loved him as his own soul. 
And Saul took him that day, and would let him go no more home to his father's house. 
Then Jonathan and David made a covenant, because he loved him as his own soul. 
And Jonathan stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and gave it to David, and his garments, ev
335,f any man have a quarrel against any: even as Christ forgave you, so also do ye. 
And above all these things put on charity, which is the bond of perfectness. 
And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye are called in one body; and be ye thankful. 
Let the word of Christ dwell in you richly in all wisdom; teach
324,nd apparel, in great abundance. 
And so shall be the plague of the horse, of the mule, of the camel, and of the ass, and of all the beasts that shall be in these tents, as this plague. 
And it shall come to pass, that every one that is left of all the nations which came against Jerusalem shall even go up from year to year 
398, and no man knoweth the Son, but the Father; neither knoweth any man the Father, save the Son, and he to whomsoever the Son will reveal him. 
Come unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will give you rest. 
Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I am meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest unto your souls. 
For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. 
At that time J
337,an hundred fifty and six. 
The children of the other Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Harim, three hundred and twenty. 
The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and five. 
The children of Jericho, three hundred forty and five. 
The children of Senaah, three thousand and six hundred and thir
467,ur treasure is, there will your heart be also. 
Let your loins be girded about, and your lights burning; 
And ye yourselves like unto men that wait for their lord, when he will return from the wedding; that when he cometh and knocketh, they may open unto him immediately. 
Blessed are those servants, whom the lord when he cometh shall find watching: verily I say unto you, that he shall gird himself, and make them to sit down to meat, and will come forth and serve 
403,e near, he asked him, 
Saying, What wilt thou that I shall do unto thee? And he said, Lord, that I may receive my sight. 
And Jesus said unto him, Receive thy sight: thy faith hath saved thee. 
And immediately he received his sight, and followed him, glorifying God: and all the people, when they saw it, gave praise unto God. 
And Jesus entered and passed through Jericho. 
And, behold, there was a man
434,the judgment. 
Wherefore now let the fear of the LORD be upon you; take heed and do it: for there is no iniquity with the LORD our God, nor respect of persons, nor taking of gifts. 
Moreover in Jerusalem did Jehoshaphat set of the Levites, and of the priests, and of the chief of the fathers of Israel, for the judgment of the LORD, and for controversies, when they returned to Jerusalem. 
And he charged them, saying, Thus shall ye d
400,ead among the people. 
My confusion is continually before me, and the shame of my face hath covered me, 
For the voice of him that reproacheth and blasphemeth; by reason of the enemy and avenger. 
All this is come upon us; yet have we not forgotten thee, neither have we dealt falsely in thy covenant. 
Our heart is not turned back, neither have our steps declined from thy way; 
Though thou hast sor
362,d let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she made the camels drink also. 
And I asked her, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she said, the daughter of Bethuel, Nahor's son, whom Milcah bare unto him: and I put the earring upon her face, and the bracelets upon her hands. 
And I bowed 
442, Joseph, I also was in my dream, and, behold, I had three white baskets on my head: 
And in the uppermost basket there was of all manner of bakemeats for Pharaoh; and the birds did eat them out of the basket upon my head. 
And Joseph answered and said, This is the interpretation thereof: The three baskets are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thy head from off thee, and shall hang thee on a tree; and the birds shall
380,gation, lest ye die: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations: 
And that ye may put difference between holy and unholy, and between unclean and clean; 
And that ye may teach the children of Israel all the statutes which the LORD hath spoken unto them by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses spake unto Aaron, and unto Eleazar and unto Ithamar, his sons that were left, 
474,h this inscription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye ignorantly worship, him declare I unto you. 
God that made the world and all things therein, seeing that he is Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made with hands; 
Neither is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any thing, seeing he giveth to all life, and breath, and all things; 
And hath made of one blood all nations of men for to dwell on all the face of the earth, and hath determine
456,f the Spirit, which they that believe on him should receive: for the Holy Ghost was not yet given; because that Jesus was not yet glorified.) 
Many of the people therefore, when they heard this saying, said, Of a truth this is the Prophet. 
Others said, This is the Christ. But some said, Shall Christ come out of Galilee? 
Hath not the scripture said, That Christ cometh of the seed of David, and out of the town of Bethlehem, where David was? 
So there w
395,the Lord GOD; I will make this proverb to cease, and they shall no more use it as a proverb in Israel; but say unto them, The days are at hand, and the effect of every vision. 
For there shall be no more any vain vision nor flattering divination within the house of Israel. 
For I am the LORD: I will speak, and the word that I shall speak shall come to pass; it shall be no more prolonged: for 
470,Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring unto us ministers for the house of our God. 
And by the good hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of understanding, of the sons of Mahli, the son of Levi, the son of Israel; and Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, ei
400,aanites are there before you, and ye shall fall by the sword: because ye are turned away from the LORD, therefore the LORD will not be with you. 
But they presumed to go up unto the hill top: nevertheless the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and Moses, departed not out of the camp. 
Then the Amalekites came down, and the Canaanites which dwelt in that hill, and smote them, and discomfited them, ev
393,ad no children: therefore Eleazar and Ithamar executed the priest's office. 
And David distributed them, both Zadok of the sons of Eleazar, and Ahimelech of the sons of Ithamar, according to their offices in their service. 
And there were more chief men found of the sons of Eleazar than of the sons of Ithamar, and thus were they divided. Among the sons of Eleazar there were sixteen chief me
454,e. 
Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory: 
Rec
390,inces, and upon her wise men. 
A sword is upon the liars; and they shall dote: a sword is upon her mighty men; and they shall be dismayed. 
A sword is upon their horses, and upon their chariots, and upon all the mingled people that are in the midst of her; and they shall become as women: a sword is upon her treasures; and they shall be robbed. 
A drought is upon her waters; and they shal
400,th mine hand against the LORD's anointed. 
And, behold, as thy life was much set by this day in mine eyes, so let my life be much set by in the eyes of the LORD, and let him deliver me out of all tribulation. 
Then Saul said to David, Blessed be thou, my son David: thou shalt both do great things, and also shalt still prevail. So David went on his way, and Saul returned to his place. 
And David sa
399,ll glory of the things which concern mine infirmities. 
The God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which is blessed for evermore, knoweth that I lie not. 
In Damascus the governor under Aretas the king kept the city of the damascenes with a garrison, desirous to apprehend me: 
And through a window in a basket was I let down by the wall, and escaped his hands. 
It is not expedient for me doubtle
443,t ye abide in me. 
I am the vine, ye are the branches: He that abideth in me, and I in him, the same bringeth forth much fruit: for without me ye can do nothing. 
If a man abide not in me, he is cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and men gather them, and cast them into the fire, and they are burned. 
If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ye shall ask what ye will, and it shall be done unto you. 
Herein is my Father glorified,
348, is my defence; I shall not be moved. 
In God is my salvation and my glory: the rock of my strength, and my refuge, is in God. 
Trust in him at all times; ye people, pour out your heart before him: God is a refuge for us. Selah. 
Surely men of low degree are vanity, and men of high degree are a lie: to be laid in the balance, they are altogether 
414, Ammonites until the heat of the day: and it came to pass, that they which remained were scattered, so that two of them were not left together. 
And the people said unto Samuel, Who is he that said, Shall Saul reign over us? bring the men, that we may put them to death. 
And Saul said, There shall not a man be put to death this day: for to day the LORD hath wrought salvation in Israel. 
Then said Samuel to the 
347,s is better than a thousand. I had rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. 
For the LORD God is a sun and shield: the LORD will give grace and glory: no good thing will he withhold from them that walk uprightly. 
O LORD of hosts, blessed is the man that trusteth in thee. 
Lord, thou hast been favo
348,him for a piece of silver and a morsel of bread, and shall say, Put me, I pray thee, into one of the priests' offices, that I may eat a piece of bread. 
And the child Samuel ministered unto the LORD before Eli. And the word of the LORD was precious in those days; there was no open vision. 
And it came to pass at that time, when Eli was laid down 
327,n I will judge uprightly. 
The earth and all the inhabitants thereof are dissolved: I bear up the pillars of it. Selah. 
I said unto the fools, Deal not foolishly: and to the wicked, Lift not up the horn: 
Lift not up your horn on high: speak not with a stiff neck. 
For promotion cometh neither from the east, nor from the wes
347,ook out of Jordan, did Joshua pitch in Gilgal. 
And he spake unto the children of Israel, saying, When your children shall ask their fathers in time to come, saying, What mean these stones? 
Then ye shall let your children know, saying, Israel came over this Jordan on dry land. 
For the LORD your God dried up the waters of Jordan from before you
429,hey shall stumble, and fall toward the north by the river Euphrates. 
Who is this that cometh up as a flood, whose waters are moved as the rivers? 
Egypt riseth up like a flood, and his waters are moved like the rivers; and he saith, I will go up, and will cover the earth; I will destroy the city and the inhabitants thereof. 
Come up, ye horses; and rage, ye chariots; and let the mighty men come forth; the Ethiopians and the 
398,I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever: thy faithfulness shalt thou establish in the very heavens. 
I have made a covenant with my chosen, I have sworn unto David my servant, 
Thy seed will I establish for ever, and build up thy throne to all generations. Selah. 
And the heavens shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy faithfulness also in the congregation of the saints. 
For who in the heav
427,est not eat within thy gates the tithe of thy corn, or of thy wine, or of thy oil, or the firstlings of thy herds or of thy flock, nor any of thy vows which thou vowest, nor thy freewill offerings, or heave offering of thine hand: 
But thou must eat them before the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that 
423,p, and searched the land from the wilderness of Zin unto Rehob, as men come to Hamath. 
And they ascended by the south, and came unto Hebron; where Ahiman, Sheshai, and Talmai, the children of Anak, were. (Now Hebron was built seven years before Zoan in Egypt.) 
And they came unto the brook of Eshcol, and cut down from thence a branch with one cluster of grapes, and they bare it between two upon a staff; and they brough
321, such things as were necessary. 
And after three months we departed in a ship of Alexandria, which had wintered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux. 
And landing at Syracuse, we tarried there three days. 
And from thence we fetched a compass, and came to Rhegium: and after one day the south wind blew, and we c
370, is at Jerusalem. So it ceased unto the second year of the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
Then the prophets, Haggai the prophet, and Zechariah the son of Iddo, prophesied unto the Jews that were in Judah and Jerusalem in the name of the God of Israel, even unto them. 
Then rose up Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and began to build the
466,s people greatly; and made them stronger than their enemies. 
He turned their heart to hate his people, to deal subtilly with his servants. 
He sent Moses his servant; and Aaron whom he had chosen. 
They shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of Ham. 
He sent darkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not against his word. 
He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish. 
Their land brought forth frogs in abundance, in the chambers of th
327,h the son of Jehoiada the priest, which stood above the people, and said unto them, Thus saith God, Why transgress ye the commandments of the LORD, that ye cannot prosper? because ye have forsaken the LORD, he hath also forsaken you. 
And they conspired against him, and stoned him with stones at the commandment of the king in
333,e by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: th
336,essel. 
For I have heard the slander of many: fear was on every side: while they took counsel together against me, they devised to take away my life. 
But I trusted in thee, O LORD: I said, Thou art my God. 
My times are in thy hand: deliver me from the hand of mine enemies, and from them that persecute me. 
Make thy face to shine upo
411, performed his word that he spake, and I am risen up in the room of David my father, and sit on the throne of Israel, as the LORD promised, and have built an house for the name of the LORD God of Israel. 
And I have set there a place for the ark, wherein is the covenant of the LORD, which he made with our fathers, when he brought them out of the land of Egypt. 
And Solomon stood before the altar of the LORD 
472,nt into a covenant of the LORD with thee: notwithstanding, if there be in me iniquity, slay me thyself; for why shouldest thou bring me to thy father? 
And Jonathan said, Far be it from thee: for if I knew certainly that evil were determined by my father to come upon thee, then would not I tell it thee? 
Then said David to Jonathan, Who shall tell me? or what if thy father answer thee roughly? 
And Jonathan said unto David, Come, and let us go out into the field. And 
406,d become bitter, and her belly shall swell, and her thigh shall rot: and the woman shall be a curse among her people. 
And if the woman be not defiled, but be clean; then she shall be free, and shall conceive seed. 
This is the law of jealousies, when a wife goeth aside to another instead of her husband, and is defiled; 
Or when the spirit of jealousy cometh upon him, and he be jealous over his wife, an
364, men say that I the Son of man am? 
And they said, Some say that thou art John the Baptist: some, Elias; and others, Jeremias, or one of the prophets. 
He saith unto them, But whom say ye that I am? 
And Simon Peter answered and said, Thou art the Christ, the Son of the living God. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, Blessed art thou, Simon Barjona: for flesh
441,Heman; Jehiel, and Shimei: and of the sons of Jeduthun; Shemaiah, and Uzziel. 
And they gathered their brethren, and sanctified themselves, and came, according to the commandment of the king, by the words of the LORD, to cleanse the house of the LORD. 
And the priests went into the inner part of the house of the LORD, to cleanse it, and brought out all the uncleanness that they found in the temple of the LORD into the court of the house 
476,d into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonied, and rose up in haste, and spake, and said unto his counsellors, Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire? They answered and said unto the king, True, O king. 
He answered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the midst of the fire, and they have no hurt; and the form of the fourth is like the Son of God. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar came near to the mouth of the b
373,ice: 
But that it may be a witness between us, and you, and our generations after us, that we might do the service of the LORD before him with our burnt offerings, and with our sacrifices, and with our peace offerings; that your children may not say to our children in time to come, Ye have no part in the LORD. 
Therefore said we, that it shall be, when they should so say
327,ea, the heavens are not clean in his sight. 
How much more abominable and filthy is man, which drinketh iniquity like water? 
I will shew thee, hear me; and that which I have seen I will declare; 
Which wise men have told from their fathers, and have not hid it: 
Unto whom alone the earth was given, and no stranger passed amo
471,e to labour thither; for they are but few. 
So there went up thither of the people about three thousand men: and they fled before the men of Ai. 
And the men of Ai smote of them about thirty and six men: for they chased them from before the gate even unto Shebarim, and smote them in the going down: wherefore the hearts of the people melted, and became as water. 
And Joshua rent his clothes, and fell to the earth upon his face before the ark of the LORD until the even
379,t with Adonijah. 
And Adonijah slew sheep and oxen and fat cattle by the stone of Zoheleth, which is by Enrogel, and called all his brethren the king's sons, and all the men of Judah the king's servants: 
But Nathan the prophet, and Benaiah, and the mighty men, and Solomon his brother, he called not. 
Wherefore Nathan spake unto Bathsheba the mother of Solomon, saying, Hast th
425,d fruit trees in abundance: so they did eat, and were filled, and became fat, and delighted themselves in thy great goodness. 
Nevertheless they were disobedient, and rebelled against thee, and cast thy law behind their backs, and slew thy prophets which testified against them to turn them to thee, and they wrought great provocations. 
Therefore thou deliveredst them into the hand of their enemies, who vexed them: and in 
422,hter in law hath played the harlot; and also, behold, she is with child by whoredom. And Judah said, Bring her forth, and let her be burnt. 
When she was brought forth, she sent to her father in law, saying, By the man, whose these are, am I with child: and she said, Discern, I pray thee, whose are these, the signet, and bracelets, and staff. 
And Judah acknowledged them, and said, She hath been more righteous than I; 
440,all cedars: 
Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl: 
Kings of the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of the earth: 
Both young men, and maidens; old men, and children: 
Let them praise the name of the LORD: for his name alone is excellent; his glory is above the earth and heaven. 
He also exalteth the horn of his people, the praise of all his saints; even of the children of Israel, a people near unto him. 
434,in. 
And Moses returned unto the LORD, and said, Oh, this people have sinned a great sin, and have made them gods of gold. 
Yet now, if thou wilt forgive their sin--; and if not, blot me, I pray thee, out of thy book which thou hast written. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Whosoever hath sinned against me, him will I blot out of my book. 
Therefore now go, lead the people unto the place of which I have spoken unto thee: behold, min
478,ith him to give the land of the Canaanites, the Hittites, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Jebusites, and the Girgashites, to give it, I say, to his seed, and hast performed thy words; for thou art righteous: 
And didst see the affliction of our fathers in Egypt, and heardest their cry by the Red sea; 
And shewedst signs and wonders upon Pharaoh, and on all his servants, and on all the people of his land: for thou knewest that they dealt proudly against them. So di
413,. 
Then he took the five loaves and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he blessed them, and brake, and gave to the disciples to set before the multitude. 
And they did eat, and were all filled: and there was taken up of fragments that remained to them twelve baskets. 
And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am? 
The
320, in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid nor dismayed by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not yours, but God's. 
To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up
406,which is in Gibeon. 
And there was a very sore battle that day; and Abner was beaten, and the men of Israel, before the servants of David. 
And there were three sons of Zeruiah there, Joab, and Abishai, and Asahel: and Asahel was as light of foot as a wild roe. 
And Asahel pursued after Abner; and in going he turned not to the right hand nor to the left from following Abner. 
Then Abner looked behind hi
343,to Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river Gozan, unto this day. 
The sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the children of Amram; Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam. The sons also of Aaron; Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
Eleazar begat Phinehas, Phinehas begat 
418,r me, and cords; they have spread a net by the wayside; they have set gins for me. Selah. 
I said unto the LORD, Thou art my God: hear the voice of my supplications, O LORD. 
O GOD the Lord, the strength of my salvation, thou hast covered my head in the day of battle. 
Grant not, O LORD, the desires of the wicked: further not his wicked device; lest they exalt themselves. Selah. 
As for the head of those that compa
441, from among my people, both ye and the children of Israel; and go, serve the LORD, as ye have said. 
Also take your flocks and your herds, as ye have said, and be gone; and bless me also. 
And the Egyptians were urgent upon the people, that they might send them out of the land in haste; for they said, We be all dead men. 
And the people took their dough before it was leavened, their kneadingtroughs being bound up in their clothes upon th
373, made them other five talents. 
And likewise he that had received two, he also gained other two. 
But he that had received one went and digged in the earth, and hid his lord's money. 
After a long time the lord of those servants cometh, and reckoneth with them. 
And so he that had received five talents came and brought other five talents, saying, Lord, thou deliveredst u
366, poor. 
When Jesus understood it, he said unto them, Why trouble ye the woman? for she hath wrought a good work upon me. 
For ye have the poor always with you; but me ye have not always. 
For in that she hath poured this ointment on my body, she did it for my burial. 
Verily I say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached in the whole world, there shall 
373, army were upon thy walls round about, and the Gammadims were in thy towers: they hanged their shields upon thy walls round about; they have made thy beauty perfect. 
Tarshish was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of all kind of riches; with silver, iron, tin, and lead, they traded in thy fairs. 
Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were thy merchants: they traded the p
409,t is found shall be thrust through; and every one that is joined unto them shall fall by the sword. 
Their children also shall be dashed to pieces before their eyes; their houses shall be spoiled, and their wives ravished. 
Behold, I will stir up the Medes against them, which shall not regard silver; and as for gold, they shall not delight in it. 
Their bows also shall dash the young men to pieces; and the
387,wait patiently for him: fret not thyself because of him who prospereth in his way, because of the man who bringeth wicked devices to pass. 
Cease from anger, and forsake wrath: fret not thyself in any wise to do evil. 
For evildoers shall be cut off: but those that wait upon the LORD, they shall inherit the earth. 
For yet a little while, and the wicked shall not be: yea, thou shalt d
421,dgeth he the people; he giveth meat in abundance. 
With clouds he covereth the light; and commandeth it not to shine by the cloud that cometh betwixt. 
The noise thereof sheweth concerning it, the cattle also concerning the vapour. 
At this also my heart trembleth, and is moved out of his place. 
Hear attentively the noise of his voice, and the sound that goeth out of his mouth. 
He directeth it under the whole heaven
362,t day: for Saul had adjured the people, saying, Cursed be the man that eateth any food until evening, that I may be avenged on mine enemies. So none of the people tasted any food. 
And all they of the land came to a wood; and there was honey upon the ground. 
And when the people were come into the wood, behold, the honey dropped; but no man put his hand to his
478,Solomon his son, saying, 
I go the way of all the earth: be thou strong therefore, and shew thyself a man; 
And keep the charge of the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and his testimonies, as it is written in the law of Moses, that thou mayest prosper in all that thou doest, and whithersoever thou turnest thyself: 
That the LORD may continue his word which he spake concerning me, saying, If thy children take h
432,ldren of Jorah, an hundred and twelve. 
The children of Hashum, two hundred twenty and three. 
The children of Gibbar, ninety and five. 
The children of Bethlehem, an hundred twenty and three. 
The men of Netophah, fifty and six. 
The men of Anathoth, an hundred twenty and eight. 
The children of Azmaveth, forty and two. 
The children of Kirjatharim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven hundred and forty and three. 
The children of Ram
326,he right of redemption is thine to buy it. 
So Hanameel mine uncle's son came to me in the court of the prison according to the word of the LORD, and said unto me, Buy my field, I pray thee, that is in Anathoth, which is in the country of Benjamin: for the right of inheritance is thine, and the redemption is thine; buy it fo
443,iefs upon them; I will spend mine arrows upon them. 
They shall be burnt with hunger, and devoured with burning heat, and with bitter destruction: I will also send the teeth of beasts upon them, with the poison of serpents of the dust. 
The sword without, and terror within, shall destroy both the young man and the virgin, the suckling also with the man of gray hairs. 
I said, I would scatter them into corners, I would make the remembrance 
369,precious as gold. 
And I said unto them, Ye are holy unto the LORD; the vessels are holy also; and the silver and the gold are a freewill offering unto the LORD God of your fathers. 
Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chief of the priests and the Levites, and chief of the fathers of Israel, at Jerusalem, in the chambers of the house of the LORD. 
452,ith, which we preach; 
That if thou shalt confess with thy mouth the Lord Jesus, and shalt believe in thine heart that God hath raised him from the dead, thou shalt be saved. 
For with the heart man believeth unto righteousness; and with the mouth confession is made unto salvation. 
For the scripture saith, Whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashamed. 
For there is no difference between the Jew and the Greek: for the same Lord over all is rich 
419, mouth, and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked. 
And righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and faithfulness the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down togethe
416,nd make haste to shed blood. 
Surely in vain the net is spread in the sight of any bird. 
And they lay wait for their own blood; they lurk privily for their own lives. 
So are the ways of every one that is greedy of gain; which taketh away the life of the owners thereof. 
Wisdom crieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets: 
She crieth in the chief place of concourse, in the openings of the gates: in the
362,Abram said unto Lot, Let there be no strife, I pray thee, between me and thee, and between my herdmen and thy herdmen; for we be brethren. 
Is not the whole land before thee? separate thyself, I pray thee, from me: if thou wilt take the left hand, then I will go to the right; or if thou depart to the right hand, then I will go to the left. 
And Lot lifted up h
433,ent me: 
To wit, Jerusalem, and the cities of Judah, and the kings thereof, and the princes thereof, to make them a desolation, an astonishment, an hissing, and a curse; as it is this day; 
Pharaoh king of Egypt, and his servants, and his princes, and all his people; 
And all the mingled people, and all the kings of the land of Uz, and all the kings of the land of the Philistines, and Ashkelon, and Azzah, and Ekron, and the remna
327,ought my sword nor my weapons with me, because the king's business required haste. 
And the priest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom thou slewest in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a cloth behind the ephod: if thou wilt take that, take it: for there is no other save that here. And David said, T
363,monah. 
And they departed from Hashmonah, and encamped at Moseroth. 
And they departed from Moseroth, and pitched in Benejaakan. 
And they removed from Benejaakan, and encamped at Horhagidgad. 
And they went from Horhagidgad, and pitched in Jotbathah. 
And they removed from Jotbathah, and encamped at Ebronah. 
And they departed from Ebronah, and encamped at Ezi
437,per of the prison committed to Joseph's hand all the prisoners that were in the prison; and whatsoever they did there, he was the doer of it. 
The keeper of the prison looked not to any thing that was under his hand; because the LORD was with him, and that which he did, the LORD made it to prosper. 
And it came to pass after these things, that the butler of the king of Egypt and his baker had offended their lord the king of Egypt. 
A
368,forty days tempted of the devil. And in those days he did eat nothing: and when they were ended, he afterward hungered. 
And the devil said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, command this stone that it be made bread. 
And Jesus answered him, saying, It is written, That man shall not live by bread alone, but by every word of God. 
And the devil, taking him up into 
438,h a stranger, 
Thou art snared with the words of thy mouth, thou art taken with the words of thy mouth. 
Do this now, my son, and deliver thyself, when thou art come into the hand of thy friend; go, humble thyself, and make sure thy friend. 
Give not sleep to thine eyes, nor slumber to thine eyelids. 
Deliver thyself as a roe from the hand of the hunter, and as a bird from the hand of the fowler. 
Go to the ant, thou sluggard; conside
357,ant will come in a day when he looketh not for him, and at an hour when he is not aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his portion with the unbelievers. 
And that servant, which knew his lord's will, and prepared not himself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. 
But he that knew not, and did commit thin
446,for you, bring it unto me, and I will hear it. 
And I commanded you at that time all the things which ye should do. 
And when we departed from Horeb, we went through all that great and terrible wilderness, which ye saw by the way of the mountain of the Amorites, as the LORD our God commanded us; and we came to Kadeshbarnea. 
And I said unto you, Ye are come unto the mountain of the Amorites, which the LORD our God doth give unto us. 
Behold, 
470, that I will punish you in this place, that ye may know that my words shall surely stand against you for evil: 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give Pharaohhophra king of Egypt into the hand of his enemies, and into the hand of them that seek his life; as I gave Zedekiah king of Judah into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, his enemy, and that sought his life. 
The word that Jeremiah the prophet spake unto Baruch the son of Neriah, when he had written t
434,or this commandment which I command thee this day, it is not hidden from thee, neither is it far off. 
It is not in heaven, that thou shouldest say, Who shall go up for us to heaven, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do it? 
Neither is it beyond the sea, that thou shouldest say, Who shall go over the sea for us, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do it? 
But the word is very nigh unto thee, in thy mouth, a
337,shalt not cut them down (for the tree of the field is man's life) to employ them in the siege: 
Only the trees which thou knowest that they be not trees for meat, thou shalt destroy and cut them down; and thou shalt build bulwarks against the city that maketh war with thee, until it be subdued. 
If one be found slain in the land which 
400,royed. 
In that day shall messengers go forth from me in ships to make the careless Ethiopians afraid, and great pain shall come upon them, as in the day of Egypt: for, lo, it cometh. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also make the multitude of Egypt to cease by the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon. 
He and his people with him, the terrible of the nations, shall be brought to destroy the land
474,e to pass, when the captains of the chariots saw Jehoshaphat, that they said, It is the king of Israel. Therefore they compassed about him to fight: but Jehoshaphat cried out, and the LORD helped him; and God moved them to depart from him. 
For it came to pass, that, when the captains of the chariots perceived that it was not the king of Israel, they turned back again from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the
458,few. 
But the Jews which believed not, moved with envy, took unto them certain lewd fellows of the baser sort, and gathered a company, and set all the city on an uproar, and assaulted the house of Jason, and sought to bring them out to the people. 
And when they found them not, they drew Jason and certain brethren unto the rulers of the city, crying, These that have turned the world upside down are come hither also; 
Whom Jason hath received: and these a
438,ss, to work all uncleanness with greediness. 
But ye have not so learned Christ; 
If so be that ye have heard him, and have been taught by him, as the truth is in Jesus: 
That ye put off concerning the former conversation the old man, which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts; 
And be renewed in the spirit of your mind; 
And that ye put on the new man, which after God is created in righteousness and true holiness. 
Wherefore p
477,lace by subjection, no, not for an hour; that the truth of the gospel might continue with you. 
But of these who seemed to be somewhat, (whatsoever they were, it maketh no matter to me: God accepteth no man's person:) for they who seemed to be somewhat in conference added nothing to me: 
But contrariwise, when they saw that the gospel of the uncircumcision was committed unto me, as the gospel of the circumcision was unto Peter; 
(For he that wrought effectually in Peter to
346, hast made for thee to dwell in, in the Sanctuary, O LORD, which thy hands have established. 
The LORD shall reign for ever and ever. 
For the horse of Pharaoh went in with his chariots and with his horsemen into the sea, and the LORD brought again the waters of the sea upon them; but the children of Israel went on dry land in the midst of the 
395,there unto the LORD, and called it Jehovahshalom: unto this day it is yet in Ophrah of the Abiezrites. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Take thy father's young bullock, even the second bullock of seven years old, and throw down the altar of Baal that thy father hath, and cut down the grove that is by it: 
And build an altar unto the LORD thy God upon the top o
459,ople shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was heard afar off. 
Now when the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the children of the captivity builded the temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel,
338,not thou the chastening of the Lord, nor faint when thou art rebuked of him: 
For whom the Lord loveth he chasteneth, and scourgeth every son whom he receiveth. 
If ye endure chastening, God dealeth with you as with sons; for what son is he whom the father chasteneth not? 
But if ye be without chastisement, whereof all are partakers, th
449,rvice, for the work in the tabernacle of the congregation, 
Even those that were numbered of them after their families, were three thousand and two hundred. 
These be those that were numbered of the families of the sons of Merari, whom Moses and Aaron numbered according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
All those that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron and the chief of Israel numbered, after their families, and after
477,re their eyes. 
And say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will take the children of Israel from among the heathen, whither they be gone, and will gather them on every side, and bring them into their own land: 
And I will make them one nation in the land upon the mountains of Israel; and one king shall be king to them all: and they shall be no more two nations, neither shall they be divided into two kingdoms any more at all. 
Neither shall they defile themselves
330,easts, and all his substance, which he had got in the land of Canaan; and went into the country from the face of his brother Jacob. 
For their riches were more than that they might dwell together; and the land wherein they were strangers could not bear them because of their cattle. 
Thus dwelt Esau in mount Seir: Esau is Edom. 

355,ob, and will yet choose Israel, and set them in their own land: and the strangers shall be joined with them, and they shall cleave to the house of Jacob. 
And the people shall take them, and bring them to their place: and the house of Israel shall possess them in the land of the LORD for servants and handmaids: and they shall take them captives, whose c
333,hich grew upon the ground. 
But his wife looked back from behind him, and she became a pillar of salt. 
And Abraham gat up early in the morning to the place where he stood before the LORD: 
And he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah, and toward all the land of the plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke of the country went up as the smo
390,nd the Lord said, I am Jesus whom thou persecutest: it is hard for thee to kick against the pricks. 
And he trembling and astonished said, Lord, what wilt thou have me to do? And the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the city, and it shall be told thee what thou must do. 
And the men which journeyed with him stood speechless, hearing a voice, but seeing no man. 
And Saul arose from 
390,ORD: he shall roar like a lion: when he shall roar, then the children shall tremble from the west. 
They shall tremble as a bird out of Egypt, and as a dove out of the land of Assyria: and I will place them in their houses, saith the LORD. 
Ephraim compasseth me about with lies, and the house of Israel with deceit: but Judah yet ruleth with God, and is faithful with the saints. 
Ephraim 
459,ch things? or shall he break the covenant, and be delivered? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely in the place where the king dwelleth that made him king, whose oath he despised, and whose covenant he brake, even with him in the midst of Babylon he shall die. 
Neither shall Pharaoh with his mighty army and great company make for him in the war, by casting up mounts, and building forts, to cut off many persons: 
Seeing he despised the oath by breaking th
368,folly, lest thou also be like unto him. 
Answer a fool according to his folly, lest he be wise in his own conceit. 
He that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the feet, and drinketh damage. 
The legs of the lame are not equal: so is a parable in the mouth of fools. 
As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool. 
As a 
392,rom his neck, but shall not divide it asunder: 
And he shall sprinkle of the blood of the sin offering upon the side of the altar; and the rest of the blood shall be wrung out at the bottom of the altar: it is a sin offering. 
And he shall offer the second for a burnt offering, according to the manner: and the priest shall make an atonement for him for his sin which he hath sinned, and it 
334,m to go out into the deep. 
And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered them. 
Then went the devils out of the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were choked. 
When
435,dren also of Machir the son of Manasseh were brought up upon Joseph's knees. 
And Joseph said unto his brethren, I die: and God will surely visit you, and bring you out of this land unto the land which he sware to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob. 
And Joseph took an oath of the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you, and ye shall carry up my bones from hence. 
So Joseph died, being an hundred and ten years old: and t
472, gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride: for the land shall be desolate. 
At that time, saith the LORD, they shall bring out the bones of the kings of Judah, and the bones of his princes, and the bones of the priests, and the bones of the prophets, and the bones of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, out of their graves: 
And they shall spread them before the sun, and the moon, and all the host of heaven, whom they have loved, and whom they have s
469,rs of Jordan, at the passage of the children of Israel. 
And when the children of Israel heard of it, the whole congregation of the children of Israel gathered themselves together at Shiloh, to go up to war against them. 
And the children of Israel sent unto the children of Reuben, and to the children of Gad, and to the half tribe of Manasseh, into the land of Gilead, Phinehas the son of Eleazar the priest, 
And with him ten princes, of each chief house a prince th
461,om the LORD was upon Saul, as he sat in his house with his javelin in his hand: and David played with his hand. 
And Saul sought to smite David even to the wall with the javelin: but he slipped away out of Saul's presence, and he smote the javelin into the wall: and David fled, and escaped that night. 
Saul also sent messengers unto David's house, to watch him, and to slay him in the morning: and Michal David's wife told him, saying, If thou save not thy li
396,ne his neighbour, and will not speak the truth: they have taught their tongue to speak lies, and weary themselves to commit iniquity. 
Thine habitation is in the midst of deceit; through deceit they refuse to know me, saith the LORD. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, I will melt them, and try them; for how shall I do for the daughter of my people? 
Their tongue is as an arrow sh
381,urn in the land are we come; for thy servants have no pasture for their flocks; for the famine is sore in the land of Canaan: now therefore, we pray thee, let thy servants dwell in the land of Goshen. 
And Pharaoh spake unto Joseph, saying, Thy father and thy brethren are come unto thee: 
The land of Egypt is before thee; in the best of the land make thy father and brethren to d
354,nd captain. So Joab the son of Zeruiah went first up, and was chief. 
And David dwelt in the castle; therefore they called it the city of David. 
And he built the city round about, even from Millo round about: and Joab repaired the rest of the city. 
So David waxed greater and greater: for the LORD of hosts was with him. 
These also are the chief of th
433,ong; and they that wasted us required of us mirth, saying, Sing us one of the songs of Zion. 
How shall we sing the LORD's song in a strange land? 
If I forget thee, O Jerusalem, let my right hand forget her cunning. 
If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave to the roof of my mouth; if I prefer not Jerusalem above my chief joy. 
Remember, O LORD, the children of Edom in the day of Jerusalem; who said, Rase it, rase it, eve
470,, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Eliab the son of Helon. 
On the fourth day Elizur the son of Shedeur, prince of the children of Reuben, did offer: 
His offering was one silver charger of the weight of an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, fu
457,dren of Thamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Peruda, 
The children of Jaalah, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 
The children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth of Zebaim, the children of Ami. 
All the Nethinims, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two. 

436,or of woollen; whether in a skin, or in any thing made of skin; 
And if the plague be greenish or reddish in the garment, or in the skin, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin; it is a plague of leprosy, and shall be shewed unto the priest: 
And the priest shall look upon the plague, and shut up it that hath the plague seven days: 
And he shall look on the plague on the seventh day: if the plague be spread in t
410, the king commanded Joab and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Deal gently for my sake with the young man, even with Absalom. And all the people heard when the king gave all the captains charge concerning Absalom. 
So the people went out into the field against Israel: and the battle was in the wood of Ephraim; 
Where the people of Israel were slain before the servants of David, and there was there a great slaughte
349,, seeing that there are priests that offer gifts according to the law: 
Who serve unto the example and shadow of heavenly things, as Moses was admonished of God when he was about to make the tabernacle: for, See, saith he, that thou make all things according to the pattern shewed to thee in the mount. 
But now hath he obtained a more excellent min
369,thine hand before their eyes. 
And say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will take the children of Israel from among the heathen, whither they be gone, and will gather them on every side, and bring them into their own land: 
And I will make them one nation in the land upon the mountains of Israel; and one king shall be king to them all: and they shall be 
383,e fish of thy rivers shall stick unto thy scales. 
And I will leave thee thrown into the wilderness, thee and all the fish of thy rivers: thou shalt fall upon the open fields; thou shalt not be brought together, nor gathered: I have given thee for meat to the beasts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, becaus
368, out a little from the land. And he sat down, and taught the people out of the ship. 
Now when he had left speaking, he said unto Simon, Launch out into the deep, and let down your nets for a draught. 
And Simon answering said unto him, Master, we have toiled all the night, and have taken nothing: nevertheless at thy word I will let down the net. 
And when they had 
342, it far from thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee. 
But he turned, and said unto Peter, Get thee behind me, Satan: thou art an offence unto me: for thou savourest not the things that be of God, but those that be of men. 
Then said Jesus unto his disciples, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross, and fo
447,g Edom; We have heard a rumour from the LORD, and an ambassador is sent among the heathen, Arise ye, and let us rise up against her in battle. 
Behold, I have made thee small among the heathen: thou art greatly despised. 
The pride of thine heart hath deceived thee, thou that dwellest in the clefts of the rock, whose habitation is high; that saith in his heart, Who shall bring me down to the ground? 
Though thou exalt thyself as the eagle, and
369,y had found him, they said unto him, All men seek for thee. 
And he said unto them, Let us go into the next towns, that I may preach there also: for therefore came I forth. 
And he preached in their synagogues throughout all Galilee, and cast out devils. 
And there came a leper to him, beseeching him, and kneeling down to him, and saying unto him, If thou wilt, thou 
376,im, unto mount Nebo, which is in the land of Moab, that is over against Jericho; and behold the land of Canaan, which I give unto the children of Israel for a possession: 
And die in the mount whither thou goest up, and be gathered unto thy people; as Aaron thy brother died in mount Hor, and was gathered unto his people: 
Because ye trespassed against me among the children 
455,o speak with thee. 
But he answered and said unto him that told him, Who is my mother? and who are my brethren? 
And he stretched forth his hand toward his disciples, and said, Behold my mother and my brethren! 
For whosoever shall do the will of my Father which is in heaven, the same is my brother, and sister, and mother. 
The same day went Jesus out of the house, and sat by the sea side. 
And great multitudes were gathered together unto him, so that
396,or the lamb. 
Your lamb shall be without blemish, a male of the first year: ye shall take it out from the sheep, or from the goats: 
And ye shall keep it up until the fourteenth day of the same month: and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it in the evening. 
And they shall take of the blood, and strike it on the two side posts and on the upper door post of the houses,
388,word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Moreover, thou son of man, take thee one stick, and write upon it, For Judah, and for the children of Israel his companions: then take another stick, and write upon it, For Joseph, the stick of Ephraim and for all the house of Israel his companions: 
And join them one to another into one stick; and they shall become one in thine hand. 
And 
438,hold, I send unto you prophets, and wise men, and scribes: and some of them ye shall kill and crucify; and some of them shall ye scourge in your synagogues, and persecute them from city to city: 
That upon you may come all the righteous blood shed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the blood of Zacharias son of Barachias, whom ye slew between the temple and the altar. 
Verily I say unto you, All these things shall c
394,and was driven of the devil into the wilderness.) 
And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy name? And he said, Legion: because many devils were entered into him. 
And they besought him that he would not command them to go out into the deep. 
And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered t
477,is the cause why Joshua did circumcise: All the people that came out of Egypt, that were males, even all the men of war, died in the wilderness by the way, after they came out of Egypt. 
Now all the people that came out were circumcised: but all the people that were born in the wilderness by the way as they came forth out of Egypt, them they had not circumcised. 
For the children of Israel walked forty years in the wilderness, till all the people that were men of war, whic
340, shall weep for thee with bitterness of heart and bitter wailing. 
And in their wailing they shall take up a lamentation for thee, and lament over thee, saying, What city is like Tyrus, like the destroyed in the midst of the sea? 
When thy wares went forth out of the seas, thou filledst many people; thou didst enrich the kings of the eart
322,came to pass, that when the Jews which dwelt by them came, they said unto us ten times, From all places whence ye shall return unto us they will be upon you. 
Therefore set I in the lower places behind the wall, and on the higher places, I even set the people after their families with their swords, their spears, and thei
424,the king's captain, Why is the decree so hasty from the king? Then Arioch made the thing known to Daniel. 
Then Daniel went in, and desired of the king that he would give him time, and that he would shew the king the interpretation. 
Then Daniel went to his house, and made the thing known to Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah, his companions: 
That they would desire mercies of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that D
470,d. 
And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him. And when the devil had thrown him in the midst, he came out of him, and hurt him not. 
And they were all amazed, and spake among themselves, saying, What a word is this! for with authority and power he commandeth the unclean spirits, and they come out. 
And the fame of him went out into every place of the country round about. 
And he arose out of the synagogue, and entered into Simon's house. An
474,hall come to pass, when the Egyptians shall see thee, that they shall say, This is his wife: and they will kill me, but they will save thee alive. 
Say, I pray thee, thou art my sister: that it may be well with me for thy sake; and my soul shall live because of thee. 
And it came to pass, that, when Abram was come into Egypt, the Egyptians beheld the woman that she was very fair. 
The princes also of Pharaoh saw her, and commended her before Pharaoh: and the woman was t
423,r this there was a feast of the Jews; and Jesus went up to Jerusalem. 
Now there is at Jerusalem by the sheep market a pool, which is called in the Hebrew tongue Bethesda, having five porches. 
In these lay a great multitude of impotent folk, of blind, halt, withered, waiting for the moving of the water. 
For an angel went down at a certain season into the pool, and troubled the water: whosoever then first after the tro
437,e wilderness, and, behold, the glory of the LORD appeared in the cloud. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel: speak unto them, saying, At even ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall be filled with bread; and ye shall know that I am the LORD your God. 
And it came to pass, that at even the quails came up, and covered the camp: and in the morning the dew lay round about
385,pitched in Rithmah. 
And they departed from Rithmah, and pitched at Rimmonparez. 
And they departed from Rimmonparez, and pitched in Libnah. 
And they removed from Libnah, and pitched at Rissah. 
And they journeyed from Rissah, and pitched in Kehelathah. 
And they went from Kehelathah, and pitched in mount Shapher. 
And they removed from mount Shapher, and encamped in Haradah. 
And 
375, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one another. 
But after that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man appeared, 
Not by works of righteousness which we have done, but according to his mercy he saved us, by the washing of regeneration, and renewing of the Holy Ghost; 
Which he shed on us a
369, Shiloh: and the child was young. 
And they slew a bullock, and brought the child to Eli. 
And she said, Oh my lord, as thy soul liveth, my lord, I am the woman that stood by thee here, praying unto the LORD. 
For this child I prayed; and the LORD hath given me my petition which I asked of him: 
Therefore also I have lent him to the LORD; as long as he liveth he shal
477,hall come upon all the world, to try them that dwell upon the earth. 
Behold, I come quickly: hold that fast which thou hast, that no man take thy crown. 
Him that overcometh will I make a pillar in the temple of my God, and he shall go no more out: and I will write upon him the name of my God, and the name of the city of my God, which is new Jerusalem, which cometh down out of heaven from my God: and I will write upon him my new name. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear wh
399,nds of Zebah and Zalmunna now in thine hand, that we should give bread unto thine army? 
And Gideon said, Therefore when the LORD hath delivered Zebah and Zalmunna into mine hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns of the wilderness and with briers. 
And he went up thence to Penuel, and spake unto them likewise: and the men of Penuel answered him as the men of Succoth had answered him. 

393,And go forth unto the valley of the son of Hinnom, which is by the entry of the east gate, and proclaim there the words that I shall tell thee, 
And say, Hear ye the word of the LORD, O kings of Judah, and inhabitants of Jerusalem; Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, the which whosoever heareth, his ears shall tingle. 
Because they hav
361,r, Kishon with her suburbs, Dabareh with her suburbs, 
Jarmuth with her suburbs, Engannim with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Asher, Mishal with her suburbs, Abdon with her suburbs, 
Helkath with her suburbs, and Rehob with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with her suburbs, to be a city of refu
451, said, Cry. And he said, What shall I cry? All flesh is grass, and all the goodliness thereof is as the flower of the field: 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: because the spirit of the LORD bloweth upon it: surely the people is grass. 
The grass withereth, the flower fadeth: but the word of our God shall stand for ever. 
O Zion, that bringest good tidings, get thee up into the high mountain; O Jerusalem, that bringest good tidings, lift up 
415,hat against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and be guilty; 
Or if his sin, which he hath sinned, come to his knowledge: then he shall bring his offering, a kid of the goats, a female without blemish, for his sin which he hath sinned. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay the sin offering in the place of the burnt offering. 
And th
363,at took them captives held them fast; they refused to let them go. 
Their Redeemer is strong; the LORD of hosts is his name: he shall throughly plead their cause, that he may give rest to the land, and disquiet the inhabitants of Babylon. 
A sword is upon the Chaldeans, saith the LORD, and upon the inhabitants of Babylon, and upon her princes, and upon her wise
400,e face of an ox on the left side; they four also had the face of an eagle. 
Thus were their faces: and their wings were stretched upward; two wings of every one were joined one to another, and two covered their bodies. 
And they went every one straight forward: whither the spirit was to go, they went; and they turned not when they went. 
As for the likeness of the living creatures, their appearanc
468, tiller of the ground. 
And in process of time it came to pass, that Cain brought of the fruit of the ground an offering unto the LORD. 
And Abel, he also brought of the firstlings of his flock and of the fat thereof. And the LORD had respect unto Abel and to his offering: 
But unto Cain and to his offering he had not respect. And Cain was very wroth, and his countenance fell. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Why art thou wroth? and why is thy countenance fallen? 
If
352,uncover the nakedness of thy brother's wife: it is thy brother's nakedness. 
Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of a woman and her daughter, neither shalt thou take her son's daughter, or her daughter's daughter, to uncover her nakedness; for they are her near kinswomen: it is wickedness. 
Neither shalt thou take a wife to her sister, to vex her, t
347,e observe all my statutes, and all my judgments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Again, thou shalt say to the children of Israel, Whosoever he be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that giveth any of his seed unto Molech; he shall surely be put to death: the people of the l
395,when they saw him walking upon the sea, they supposed it had been a spirit, and cried out: 
For they all saw him, and were troubled. And immediately he talked with them, and saith unto them, Be of good cheer: it is I; be not afraid. 
And he went up unto them into the ship; and the wind ceased: and they were sore amazed in themselves beyond measure, and wondered. 
For they considered not the m
404,he Lord, that he may instruct him? but we have the mind of Christ. 
And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spiritual, but as unto carnal, even as unto babes in Christ. 
I have fed you with milk, and not with meat: for hitherto ye were not able to bear it, neither yet now are ye able. 
For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and strife, and divisions, are ye not carnal
389, until the carrying away into Babylon are fourteen generations; and from the carrying away into Babylon unto Christ are fourteen generations. 
Now the birth of Jesus Christ was on this wise: When as his mother Mary was espoused to Joseph, before they came together, she was found with child of the Holy Ghost. 
Then Joseph her husband, being a just man, and not willing to make her a publi
339, the river. 
And seven days were fulfilled, after that the LORD had smitten the river. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, Go unto Pharaoh, and say unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Let my people go, that they may serve me. 
And if thou refuse to let them go, behold, I will smite all thy borders with frogs: 
And the river shall bring forth frog
368, the holes of the rocks. 
For mine eyes are upon all their ways: they are not hid from my face, neither is their iniquity hid from mine eyes. 
And first I will recompense their iniquity and their sin double; because they have defiled my land, they have filled mine inheritance with the carcases of their detestable and abominable things. 
O LORD, my strength, and my f
443,an, and selleth him, or if he be found in his hand, he shall surely be put to death. 
And he that curseth his father, or his mother, shall surely be put to death. 
And if men strive together, and one smite another with a stone, or with his fist, and he die not, but keepeth his bed: 
If he rise again, and walk abroad upon his staff, then shall he that smote him be quit: only he shall pay for the loss of his time, and shall cause him to be t
440,one that feareth God, and escheweth evil? 
Then Satan answered the LORD, and said, Doth Job fear God for nought? 
Hast not thou made an hedge about him, and about his house, and about all that he hath on every side? thou hast blessed the work of his hands, and his substance is increased in the land. 
But put forth thine hand now, and touch all that he hath, and he will curse thee to thy face. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, Behold, all t
363,hereof, even threescore and seventeen men. 
And he came unto the men of Succoth, and said, Behold Zebah and Zalmunna, with whom ye did upbraid me, saying, Are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in thine hand, that we should give bread unto thy men that are weary? 
And he took the elders of the city, and thorns of the wilderness and briers, and with them he tau
381,of Jesse are ended. 
Truly God is good to Israel, even to such as are of a clean heart. 
But as for me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well nigh slipped. 
For I was envious at the foolish, when I saw the prosperity of the wicked. 
For there are no bands in their death: but their strength is firm. 
They are not in trouble as other men; neither are they plagued like other 
437,ean hands shall be stronger and stronger. 
But as for you all, do ye return, and come now: for I cannot find one wise man among you. 
My days are past, my purposes are broken off, even the thoughts of my heart. 
They change the night into day: the light is short because of darkness. 
If I wait, the grave is mine house: I have made my bed in the darkness. 
I have said to corruption, Thou art my father: to the worm, Thou art my mother,
404,days understanding. 
With him is wisdom and strength, he hath counsel and understanding. 
Behold, he breaketh down, and it cannot be built again: he shutteth up a man, and there can be no opening. 
Behold, he withholdeth the waters, and they dry up: also he sendeth them out, and they overturn the earth. 
With him is strength and wisdom: the deceived and the deceiver are his. 
He leadeth counsellors aw
412, clean. 
But if the scab spread much abroad in the skin, after that he hath been seen of the priest for his cleansing, he shall be seen of the priest again. 
And if the priest see that, behold, the scab spreadeth in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a leprosy. 
When the plague of leprosy is in a man, then he shall be brought unto the priest; 
And the priest shall see him: and, behol
345,lf at the fire. 
And the chief priests and all the council sought for witness against Jesus to put him to death; and found none. 
For many bare false witness against him, but their witness agreed not together. 
And there arose certain, and bare false witness against him, saying, 
We heard him say, I will destroy this temple that is made with h
434,will do to him that which shall seem good unto thee: and whatsoever thou shalt require of me, that will I do for thee. 
And all the people went over Jordan. And when the king was come over, the king kissed Barzillai, and blessed him; and he returned unto his own place. 
Then the king went on to Gilgal, and Chimham went on with him: and all the people of Judah conducted the king, and also half the people of Israel. 
And, behold, al
338,tion of the children of Israel two kids of the goats for a sin offering, and one ram for a burnt offering. 
And Aaron shall offer his bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and make an atonement for himself, and for his house. 
And he shall take the two goats, and present them before the LORD at the door of the tabernacle of
392,thered together all the lords of the Philistines, and said, Send away the ark of the God of Israel, and let it go again to his own place, that it slay us not, and our people: for there was a deadly destruction throughout all the city; the hand of God was very heavy there. 
And the men that died not were smitten with the emerods: and the cry of the city went up to heaven. 
And the ark of th
323, give ten tribes to thee: 
(But he shall have one tribe for my servant David's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake, the city which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Israel:) 
Because that they have forsaken me, and have worshipped Ashtoreth the goddess of the Zidonians, Chemosh the god of the Moabites, and Milcom the god 
472, perfect and entire, wanting nothing. 
If any of you lack wisdom, let him ask of God, that giveth to all men liberally, and upbraideth not; and it shall be given him. 
But let him ask in faith, nothing wavering. For he that wavereth is like a wave of the sea driven with the wind and tossed. 
For let not that man think that he shall receive any thing of the Lord. 
A double minded man is unstable in all his ways. 
Let the brother of low degree rejoice in that he is exal
373,the fountain, and to the king's pool: but there was no place for the beast that was under me to pass. 
Then went I up in the night by the brook, and viewed the wall, and turned back, and entered by the gate of the valley, and so returned. 
And the rulers knew not whither I went, or what I did; neither had I as yet told it to the Jews, nor to the priests, nor to the noble
390,hey go astray as soon as they be born, speaking lies. 
Their poison is like the poison of a serpent: they are like the deaf adder that stoppeth her ear; 
Which will not hearken to the voice of charmers, charming never so wisely. 
Break their teeth, O God, in their mouth: break out the great teeth of the young lions, O LORD. 
Let them melt away as waters which run continually: when he ben
385, the offering of the corn, of the new wine, and the oil, unto the chambers, where are the vessels of the sanctuary, and the priests that minister, and the porters, and the singers: and we will not forsake the house of our God. 
And the rulers of the people dwelt at Jerusalem: the rest of the people also cast lots, to bring one of ten to dwell in Jerusalem the holy city, and nine par
468,word, let him speak my word faithfully. What is the chaff to the wheat? saith the LORD. 
Is not my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer that breaketh the rock in pieces? 
Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one from his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that use their tongues, and say, He saith. 
Behold, I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith the LORD, a
427, house of Ephraim; so that Israel was sore distressed. 
And the children of Israel cried unto the LORD, saying, We have sinned against thee, both because we have forsaken our God, and also served Baalim. 
And the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Did not I deliver you from the Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of Ammon, and from the Philistines? 
The Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonite
424,ipper of the great goddess Diana, and of the image which fell down from Jupiter? 
Seeing then that these things cannot be spoken against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rashly. 
For ye have brought hither these men, which are neither robbers of churches, nor yet blasphemers of your goddess. 
Wherefore if Demetrius, and the craftsmen which are with him, have a matter against any man, the law is open, and there ar
404, live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither sons nor daughters, but they only shall be delivered themselves. 
Or if I send a pestilence into that land, and pour out my fury upon it in blood, to cut off from it man and beast: 
Though Noah, Daniel, and Job were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall deliver neither son nor daughter; they shall but deliver their own souls by their rig
362,ve, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably unto thy servants: for I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will not tarry one with thee this night: and that will be worse unto thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the
420,fter the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
These things ye shall do unto the LORD in your set feasts, beside your vows, and your freewill offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings. 
And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that th
371,h all the fulness of God. 
Now unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly above all that we ask or think, according to the power that worketh in us, 
Unto him be glory in the church by Christ Jesus throughout all ages, world without end. Amen. 
I therefore, the prisoner of the Lord, beseech you that ye walk worthy of the vocation wherewith ye are called, 
With al
452,he Jews and religious proselytes followed Paul and Barnabas: who, speaking to them, persuaded them to continue in the grace of God. 
And the next sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with envy, and spake against those things which were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word 
382, the people, Come, and let us go to Gilgal, and renew the kingdom there. 
And all the people went to Gilgal; and there they made Saul king before the LORD in Gilgal; and there they sacrificed sacrifices of peace offerings before the LORD; and there Saul and all the men of Israel rejoiced greatly. 
And Samuel said unto all Israel, Behold, I have hearkened unto your voice in all th
344, give them provision for the way: and thus did he unto them. 
And they laded their asses with the corn, and departed thence. 
And as one of them opened his sack to give his ass provender in the inn, he espied his money; for, behold, it was in his sack's mouth. 
And he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it is even in my sac
442,not henceforth yield unto thee her strength; a fugitive and a vagabond shalt thou be in the earth. 
And Cain said unto the LORD, My punishment is greater than I can bear. 
Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the earth; and from thy face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and a vagabond in the earth; and it shall come to pass, that every one that findeth me shall slay me. 
And the LORD said unto him, Therefore 
368, noised that he was in the house. 
And straightway many were gathered together, insomuch that there was no room to receive them, no, not so much as about the door: and he preached the word unto them. 
And they come unto him, bringing one sick of the palsy, which was borne of four. 
And when they could not come nigh unto him for the press, they uncovered the roof whe
339,ell, and all the nations that forget God. 
For the needy shall not alway be forgotten: the expectation of the poor shall not perish for ever. 
Arise, O LORD; let not man prevail: let the heathen be judged in thy sight. 
Put them in fear, O LORD: that the nations may know themselves to be but men. Selah. 
Why standest thou afar off, O LOR
322,e wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was given unto him a mouth speaking great things
443,ds, having men's persons in admiration because of advantage. 
But, beloved, remember ye the words which were spoken before of the apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ; 
How that they told you there should be mockers in the last time, who should walk after their own ungodly lusts. 
These be they who separate themselves, sensual, having not the Spirit. 
But ye, beloved, building up yourselves on your most holy faith, praying in the Holy Ghost, 
320,hands. 
Pilate therefore went forth again, and saith unto them, Behold, I bring him forth to you, that ye may know that I find no fault in him. 
Then came Jesus forth, wearing the crown of thorns, and the purple robe. And Pilate saith unto them, Behold the man! 
When the chief priests therefore and officers saw him, th
331,h died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of Canaan: and Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her. 
And Abraham stood up from before his dead, and spake unto the sons of Heth, saying, 
I am a stranger and a sojourner with you: give me a possession of a buryingplace with you, that I may bury my dead out of 
461,f Aram, which was the son of Esrom, which was the son of Phares, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Jacob, which was the son of Isaac, which was the son of Abraham, which was the son of Thara, which was the son of Nachor, 
Which was the son of Saruch, which was the son of Ragau, which was the son of Phalec, which was the son of Heber, which was the son of Sala, 
Which was the son of Cainan, which was the son of Arphaxad, which was the son of S
474,st of the LORD am I now come. And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto him, What saith my Lord unto his servant? 
And the captain of the LORD's host said unto Joshua, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so. 
Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none went out, and none came in. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, See, I have given into thine hand Jericho, 
415,eth not his brother. 
For this is the message that ye heard from the beginning, that we should love one another. 
Not as Cain, who was of that wicked one, and slew his brother. And wherefore slew he him? Because his own works were evil, and his brother's righteous. 
Marvel not, my brethren, if the world hate you. 
We know that we have passed from death unto life, because we love the brethren. He that loveth not 
471,elf with a new garment; and they two were alone in the field: 
And Ahijah caught the new garment that was on him, and rent it in twelve pieces: 
And he said to Jeroboam, Take thee ten pieces: for thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, Behold, I will rend the kingdom out of the hand of Solomon, and will give ten tribes to thee: 
(But he shall have one tribe for my servant David's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake, the city which I have chosen out of all the tribes of Is
408,ne shall remain in it, neither man nor beast, but that it shall be desolate for ever. 
And it shall be, when thou hast made an end of reading this book, that thou shalt bind a stone to it, and cast it into the midst of Euphrates: 
And thou shalt say, Thus shall Babylon sink, and shall not rise from the evil that I will bring upon her: and they shall be weary. Thus far are the words of Jeremiah. 
Zedekiah 
320,fingers, the moon and the stars, which thou hast ordained; 
What is man, that thou art mindful of him? and the son of man, that thou visitest him? 
For thou hast made him a little lower than the angels, and hast crowned him with glory and honour. 
Thou madest him to have dominion over the works of thy hands; thou hast 
406,y departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in Pisidia, and went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down. 
And after the reading of the law and the prophets the rulers of the synagogue sent unto them, saying, Ye men and brethren, if ye have any word of exhortation for the people, say on. 
Then Paul stood up, and beckoning with his hand said, Men of Israel, and ye that fear God, give audience
408,ivity: and thou shalt come to Babylon, and there thou shalt die, and shalt be buried there, thou, and all thy friends, to whom thou hast prophesied lies. 
O LORD, thou hast deceived me, and I was deceived; thou art stronger than I, and hast prevailed: I am in derision daily, every one mocketh me. 
For since I spake, I cried out, I cried violence and spoil; because the word of the LORD was made a reproach 
436,ing unto him, sing psalms unto him, talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice that seek the LORD. 
Seek the LORD and his strength, seek his face continually. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done, his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Israel his servant, ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones. 
He is the LORD our God; his judgments are in all the earth
378,ith mine hand; I brought it forth in the twilight, and I bare it upon my shoulder in their sight. 
And in the morning came the word of the LORD unto me, saying, 
Son of man, hath not the house of Israel, the rebellious house, said unto thee, What doest thou? 
Say thou unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; This burden concerneth the prince in Jerusalem, and all the house of Isra
401,ming? 
For ye are our glory and joy. 
Wherefore when we could no longer forbear, we thought it good to be left at Athens alone; 
And sent Timotheus, our brother, and minister of God, and our fellowlabourer in the gospel of Christ, to establish you, and to comfort you concerning your faith: 
That no man should be moved by these afflictions: for yourselves know that we are appointed thereunto. 
For v
344,lame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them. 
The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run. 
Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devoure
406,d anointed them with the ointment. 
Now when the Pharisee which had bidden him saw it, he spake within himself, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have known who and what manner of woman this is that toucheth him: for she is a sinner. 
And Jesus answering said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say unto thee. And he saith, Master, say on. 
There was a certain creditor which had two debtors: 
390, the holy garments: 
And he shall make an atonement for the holy sanctuary, and he shall make an atonement for the tabernacle of the congregation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for the priests, and for all the people of the congregation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. 
417,for men to come from far, unto whom a messenger was sent; and, lo, they came: for whom thou didst wash thyself, paintedst thy eyes, and deckedst thyself with ornaments, 
And satest upon a stately bed, and a table prepared before it, whereupon thou hast set mine incense and mine oil. 
And a voice of a multitude being at ease was with her: and with the men of the common sort were brought Sabeans from the wilderness,
393,m until none was left to him remaining. 
And we took all his cities at that time, there was not a city which we took not from them, threescore cities, all the region of Argob, the kingdom of Og in Bashan. 
All these cities were fenced with high walls, gates, and bars; beside unwalled towns a great many. 
And we utterly destroyed them, as we did unto Sihon king of Heshbon, utterly destroying
435,son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of them that searched the land, rent their clothes: 
And they spake unto all the company of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to search it, is an exceeding good land. 
If the LORD delight in us, then he will bring us into this land, and give it us; a land which floweth with milk and honey. 
Only rebel not ye against the LORD, neither fear ye the 
420,sea, exceeding many. 
But the miry places thereof and the marishes thereof shall not be healed; they shall be given to salt. 
And by the river upon the bank thereof, on this side and on that side, shall grow all trees for meat, whose leaf shall not fade, neither shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new fruit according to his months, because their waters they issued out of the sanctuary: and the f
462,y not cast up; 
To make their land desolate, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head. 
I will scatter them as with an east wind before the enemy; I will shew them the back, and not the face, in the day of their calamity. 
Then said they, Come and let us devise devices against Jeremiah; for the law shall not perish from the priest, nor counsel from the wise, nor the word from the prophet. Come, and let us 
445,ce of our God into lasciviousness, and denying the only Lord God, and our Lord Jesus Christ. 
I will therefore put you in remembrance, though ye once knew this, how that the Lord, having saved the people out of the land of Egypt, afterward destroyed them that believed not. 
And the angels which kept not their first estate, but left their own habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains under darkness unto the judgment of the great day.
331, thy mouth, that thou shalt be dumb, and shalt not be to them a reprover: for they are a rebellious house. 
But when I speak with thee, I will open thy mouth, and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; He that heareth, let him hear; and he that forbeareth, let him forbear: for they are a rebellious house. 
Thou also, 
368,y in the temple, and in every house, they ceased not to teach and preach Jesus Christ. 
And in those days, when the number of the disciples was multiplied, there arose a murmuring of the Grecians against the Hebrews, because their widows were neglected in the daily ministration. 
Then the twelve called the multitude of the disciples unto them, and said, It is not re
426,so falling down on his face he will worship God, and report that God is in you of a truth. 
How is it then, brethren? when ye come together, every one of you hath a psalm, hath a doctrine, hath a tongue, hath a revelation, hath an interpretation. Let all things be done unto edifying. 
If any man speak in an unknown tongue, let it be by two, or at the most by three, and that by course; and let one interpret. 
But if there b
327,fitable servants: we have done that which was our duty to do. 
And it came to pass, as he went to Jerusalem, that he passed through the midst of Samaria and Galilee. 
And as he entered into a certain village, there met him ten men that were lepers, which stood afar off: 
And they lifted up their voices, and said, Jesus, Maste
425, enemies, and hast put them to shame that hated us. 
In God we boast all the day long, and praise thy name for ever. Selah. 
But thou hast cast off, and put us to shame; and goest not forth with our armies. 
Thou makest us to turn back from the enemy: and they which hate us spoil for themselves. 
Thou hast given us like sheep appointed for meat; and hast scattered us among the heathen. 
Thou sellest thy people for nought,
465,aves, he came, if haply he might find any thing thereon: and when he came to it, he found nothing but leaves; for the time of figs was not yet. 
And Jesus answered and said unto it, No man eat fruit of thee hereafter for ever. And his disciples heard it. 
And they come to Jerusalem: and Jesus went into the temple, and began to cast out them that sold and bought in the temple, and overthrew the tables of the moneychangers, and the seats of them that sold doves; 
381,d my father that which thou hast promised him; and spakest with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it with thine hand, as it is this day. 
Now therefore, O LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my father that which thou hast promised him, saying, There shall not fail thee a man in my sight to sit upon the throne of Israel; yet so that thy children take heed to their way to 
348,all rend it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warp, or out of the woof: 
And if it appear still in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin; it is a spreading plague: thou shalt burn that wherein the plague is with fire. 
And the garment, either warp, or woof, or whatsoever thing of skin it be, 
355,submit yourselves unto the elder. Yea, all of you be subject one to another, and be clothed with humility: for God resisteth the proud, and giveth grace to the humble. 
Humble yourselves therefore under the mighty hand of God, that he may exalt you in due time: 
Casting all your care upon him; for he careth for you. 
Be sober, be vigilant; because your 
433, which were about thirty persons. 
And Samuel said unto the cook, Bring the portion which I gave thee, of which I said unto thee, Set it by thee. 
And the cook took up the shoulder, and that which was upon it, and set it before Saul. And Samuel said, Behold that which is left! set it before thee, and eat: for unto this time hath it been kept for thee since I said, I have invited the people. So Saul did eat with Samuel that day. 

418,e ark of the testimony, 
And the table and all his vessels, and the candlestick and his vessels, and the altar of incense, 
And the altar of burnt offering with all his vessels, and the laver and his foot. 
And thou shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever toucheth them shall be holy. 
And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's of
327,e. 
I will run the way of thy commandments, when thou shalt enlarge my heart. 
Teach me, O LORD, the way of thy statutes; and I shall keep it unto the end. 
Give me understanding, and I shall keep thy law; yea, I shall observe it with my whole heart. 
Make me to go in the path of thy commandments; for therein do I delight. 
I
451, at the beginning; but the end thereof shall not be blessed. 
Say not thou, I will recompense evil; but wait on the LORD, and he shall save thee. 
Divers weights are an abomination unto the LORD; and a false balance is not good. 
Man's goings are of the LORD; how can a man then understand his own way? 
It is a snare to the man who devoureth that which is holy, and after vows to make enquiry. 
A wise king scattereth the wicked, and bringeth the whe
341,ar, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will set my glory among the heathen, and all the heathen shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them. 
So the house of Israel shall know that I am the LORD their God from that day and forward. 
And the heathen shall know that the house of Israel went into captivity for t
396, say every man to his neighbour, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this great city? 
Then they shall answer, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD their God, and worshipped other gods, and served them. 
Weep ye not for the dead, neither bemoan him: but weep sore for him that goeth away: for he shall return no more, nor see his native country. 
For thus saith the LORD touchin
421,ah. 
Surely men of low degree are vanity, and men of high degree are a lie: to be laid in the balance, they are altogether lighter than vanity. 
Trust not in oppression, and become not vain in robbery: if riches increase, set not your heart upon them. 
God hath spoken once; twice have I heard this; that power belongeth unto God. 
Also unto thee, O Lord, belongeth mercy: for thou renderest to every man according to his
389,nt; and Aaron whom he had chosen. 
They shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of Ham. 
He sent darkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not against his word. 
He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish. 
Their land brought forth frogs in abundance, in the chambers of their kings. 
He spake, and there came divers sorts of flies, and lice in all their coast
425,e that gathereth ears in the valley of Rephaim. 
Yet gleaning grapes shall be left in it, as the shaking of an olive tree, two or three berries in the top of the uppermost bough, four or five in the outmost fruitful branches thereof, saith the LORD God of Israel. 
At that day shall a man look to his Maker, and his eyes shall have respect to the Holy One of Israel. 
And he shall not look to the altars, the work of his hand
323,Mizpeh, and Joktheel, 
Lachish, and Bozkath, and Eglon, 
And Cabbon, and Lahmam, and Kithlish, 
And Gederoth, Bethdagon, and Naamah, and Makkedah; sixteen cities with their villages: 
Libnah, and Ether, and Ashan, 
And Jiphtah, and Ashnah, and Nezib, 
And Keilah, and Achzib, and Mareshah; nine cities with their villages: 
476,pare thyself to the search of their fathers: 
(For we are but of yesterday, and know nothing, because our days upon earth are a shadow:) 
Shall not they teach thee, and tell thee, and utter words out of their heart? 
Can the rush grow up without mire? can the flag grow without water? 
Whilst it is yet in his greenness, and not cut down, it withereth before any other herb. 
So are the paths of all that forget God; and the hypocrite's hope shall perish: 
Whose hope shall be
376,hath sent thee away. 
And as touching the matter which thou and I have spoken of, behold, the LORD be between thee and me for ever. 
So David hid himself in the field: and when the new moon was come, the king sat him down to eat meat. 
And the king sat upon his seat, as at other times, even upon a seat by the wall: and Jonathan arose, and Abner sat by Saul's side, and David
333,od. 
All things were made by him; and without him was not any thing made that was made. 
In him was life; and the life was the light of men. 
And the light shineth in darkness; and the darkness comprehended it not. 
There was a man sent from God, whose name was John. 
The same came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that 
388,me off. 
They came round about me daily like water; they compassed me about together. 
Lover and friend hast thou put far from me, and mine acquaintance into darkness. 
I will sing of the mercies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth will I make known thy faithfulness to all generations. 
For I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever: thy faithfulness shalt thou establish in the very
424,in of Judah. 
And on the other side Jordan by Jericho eastward, they assigned Bezer in the wilderness upon the plain out of the tribe of Reuben, and Ramoth in Gilead out of the tribe of Gad, and Golan in Bashan out of the tribe of Manasseh. 
These were the cities appointed for all the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them, that whosoever killeth any person at unawares might flee thither, and
378,three things which are too wonderful for me, yea, four which I know not: 
The way of an eagle in the air; the way of a serpent upon a rock; the way of a ship in the midst of the sea; and the way of a man with a maid. 
Such is the way of an adulterous woman; she eateth, and wipeth her mouth, and saith, I have done no wickedness. 
For three things the earth is disquieted, and f
474, it declineth: I am tossed up and down as the locust. 
My knees are weak through fasting; and my flesh faileth of fatness. 
I became also a reproach unto them: when they looked upon me they shaked their heads. 
Help me, O LORD my God: O save me according to thy mercy: 
That they may know that this is thy hand; that thou, LORD, hast done it. 
Let them curse, but bless thou: when they arise, let them be ashamed; but let thy servant rejoice. 
Let mine adversaries be clothe
441,eace to thine house; see, I have hearkened to thy voice, and have accepted thy person. 
And Abigail came to Nabal; and, behold, he held a feast in his house, like the feast of a king; and Nabal's heart was merry within him, for he was very drunken: wherefore she told him nothing, less or more, until the morning light. 
But it came to pass in the morning, when the wine was gone out of Nabal, and his wife had told him these things, that hi
447,aptain of the host of the LORD am I now come. And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto him, What saith my Lord unto his servant? 
And the captain of the LORD's host said unto Joshua, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so. 
Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none went out, and none came in. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, 
467,my bonds, and took joyfully the spoiling of your goods, knowing in yourselves that ye have in heaven a better and an enduring substance. 
Cast not away therefore your confidence, which hath great recompence of reward. 
For ye have need of patience, that, after ye have done the will of God, ye might receive the promise. 
For yet a little while, and he that shall come will come, and will not tarry. 
Now the just shall live by faith: but if any man draw back, my sou
443,n thy mouth any more because of thy shame, when I am pacified toward thee for all that thou hast done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, put forth a riddle, and speak a parable unto the house of Israel; 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; A great eagle with great wings, longwinged, full of feathers, which had divers colours, came unto Lebanon, and took the highest branch of the cedar: 
He cropp
413,far from me, O LORD, that I should do this: is not this the blood of the men that went in jeopardy of their lives? therefore he would not drink it. These things did these three mighty men. 
And Abishai, the brother of Joab, the son of Zeruiah, was chief among three. And he lifted up his spear against three hundred, and slew them, and had the name among three. 
Was he not most honourable of three? therefore he 
349,th the voice together shall they sing: for they shall see eye to eye, when the LORD shall bring again Zion. 
Break forth into joy, sing together, ye waste places of Jerusalem: for the LORD hath comforted his people, he hath redeemed Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath made bare his holy arm in the eyes of all the nations; and all the ends of the earth shall
411, Damascus to the synagogues, that if he found any of this way, whether they were men or women, he might bring them bound unto Jerusalem. 
And as he journeyed, he came near Damascus: and suddenly there shined round about him a light from heaven: 
And he fell to the earth, and heard a voice saying unto him, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me? 
And he said, Who art thou, Lord? And the Lord said, I am Jesus who
377,w that afterward, when he would have inherited the blessing, he was rejected: for he found no place of repentance, though he sought it carefully with tears. 
For ye are not come unto the mount that might be touched, and that burned with fire, nor unto blackness, and darkness, and tempest, 
And the sound of a trumpet, and the voice of words; which voice they that heard intrea
445,offscouring of all things unto this day. 
I write not these things to shame you, but as my beloved sons I warn you. 
For though ye have ten thousand instructers in Christ, yet have ye not many fathers: for in Christ Jesus I have begotten you through the gospel. 
Wherefore I beseech you, be ye followers of me. 
For this cause have I sent unto you Timotheus, who is my beloved son, and faithful in the Lord, who shall bring you into remembrance 
402,ut the rich answereth roughly. 
A man that hath friends must shew himself friendly: and there is a friend that sticketh closer than a brother. 
Better is the poor that walketh in his integrity, than he that is perverse in his lips, and is a fool. 
Also, that the soul be without knowledge, it is not good; and he that hasteth with his feet sinneth. 
The foolishness of man perverteth his way: and his h
432,y table; and likewise silver for the tables of silver: 
Also pure gold for the fleshhooks, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the golden basons he gave gold by weight for every bason; and likewise silver by weight for every bason of silver: 
And for the altar of incense refined gold by weight; and gold for the pattern of the chariot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the ark of the covenant of the LORD.
337, Gezer came up to help Lachish; and Joshua smote him and his people, until he had left him none remaining. 
And from Lachish Joshua passed unto Eglon, and all Israel with him; and they encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And they took it on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein 
375,es in all mine assemblies; and they shall hallow my sabbaths. 
And they shall come at no dead person to defile themselves: but for father, or for mother, or for son, or for daughter, for brother, or for sister that hath had no husband, they may defile themselves. 
And after he is cleansed, they shall reckon unto him seven days. 
And in the day that he goeth into the sanctu
361,us shalt thou say to the house of Jacob, and tell the children of Israel; 
Ye have seen what I did unto the Egyptians, and how I bare you on eagles' wings, and brought you unto myself. 
Now therefore, if ye will obey my voice indeed, and keep my covenant, then ye shall be a peculiar treasure unto me above all people: for all the earth is mine: 
And ye shall b
416, answereth me no more, neither by prophets, nor by dreams: therefore I have called thee, that thou mayest make known unto me what I shall do. 
Then said Samuel, Wherefore then dost thou ask of me, seeing the LORD is departed from thee, and is become thine enemy? 
And the LORD hath done to him, as he spake by me: for the LORD hath rent the kingdom out of thine hand, and given it to thy neighbour, even to David: 
B
468,or when they have begun to wax wanton against Christ, they will marry; 
Having damnation, because they have cast off their first faith. 
And withal they learn to be idle, wandering about from house to house; and not only idle, but tattlers also and busybodies, speaking things which they ought not. 
I will therefore that the younger women marry, bear children, guide the house, give none occasion to the adversary to speak reproachfully. 
For some are already turned 
434,the fire hath devoured it, and it is burned? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As the vine tree among the trees of the forest, which I have given to the fire for fuel, so will I give the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And I will set my face against them; they shall go out from one fire, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I set my face against them. 
And I will make the land desolate, becau
386,the place of the ashes: 
And he shall cleave it with the wings thereof, but shall not divide it asunder: and the priest shall burn it upon the altar, upon the wood that is upon the fire: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And when any will offer a meat offering unto the LORD, his offering shall be of fine flour; and he shall pour oil 
341,ain shall be one flesh? 
Wherefore they are no more twain, but one flesh. What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder. 
They say unto him, Why did Moses then command to give a writing of divorcement, and to put her away? 
He saith unto them, Moses because of the hardness of your hearts suffered you to put away your wiv
361,aleth the stroke of their wound. 
Behold, the name of the LORD cometh from far, burning with his anger, and the burden thereof is heavy: his lips are full of indignation, and his tongue as a devouring fire: 
And his breath, as an overflowing stream, shall reach to the midst of the neck, to sift the nations with the sieve of vanity: and there shall be a bridle
451,ns of the earth? 
Have ye forgotten the wickedness of your fathers, and the wickedness of the kings of Judah, and the wickedness of their wives, and your own wickedness, and the wickedness of your wives, which they have committed in the land of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem? 
They are not humbled even unto this day, neither have they feared, nor walked in my law, nor in my statutes, that I set before you and before your fathers. 
Therefor
477,ng said to Doeg, Turn thou, and fall upon the priests. And Doeg the Edomite turned, and he fell upon the priests, and slew on that day fourscore and five persons that did wear a linen ephod. 
And Nob, the city of the priests, smote he with the edge of the sword, both men and women, children and sucklings, and oxen, and asses, and sheep, with the edge of the sword. 
And one of the sons of Ahimelech the son of Ahitub, named Abiathar, escaped, and fled after David. 
And Abiat
444,uty. 
Thou hast been in Eden the garden of God; every precious stone was thy covering, the sardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that thou wast created. 
Thou art the anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set thee so: thou wast upon the holy mountain of God; thou hast wal
395, neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. 
For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them, and shall lead them unto living fountains of waters: and God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes. 
And when he had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour. 
And I saw the seven angels which stood before God; and to them were 
465,to drink; 
And she say to me, Both drink thou, and I will also draw for thy camels: let the same be the woman whom the LORD hath appointed out for my master's son. 
And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee. 
And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will giv
348, fire unto the LORD. 
And their drink offerings shall be half an hin of wine unto a bullock, and the third part of an hin unto a ram, and a fourth part of an hin unto a lamb: this is the burnt offering of every month throughout the months of the year. 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall be offered, beside the continua
330, tarry, till I come to thee, and shew thee what thou shalt do. 
And it was so, that when he had turned his back to go from Samuel, God gave him another heart: and all those signs came to pass that day. 
And when they came thither to the hill, behold, a company of prophets met him; and the Spirit of God came upon him, and he prop
354,on, the same hath not the Father: he that acknowledgeth the Son hath the Father also. 
Let that therefore abide in you, which ye have heard from the beginning. If that which ye have heard from the beginning shall remain in you, ye also shall continue in the Son, and in the Father. 
And this is the promise that he hath promised us, even eternal life. 
T
445, cheweth not the cud, it is unclean unto you: ye shall not eat of their flesh, nor touch their dead carcase. 
These ye shall eat of all that are in the waters: all that have fins and scales shall ye eat: 
And whatsoever hath not fins and scales ye may not eat; it is unclean unto you. 
Of all clean birds ye shall eat. 
But these are they of which ye shall not eat: the eagle, and the ossifrage, and the ospray, 
And the glede, and the kite, and
377,ye angry, and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your wrath: 
Neither give place to the devil. 
Let him that stole steal no more: but rather let him labour, working with his hands the thing which is good, that he may have to give to him that needeth. 
Let no corrupt communication proceed out of your mouth, but that which is good to the use of edifying, that it may ministe
388,for his iniquity: the dumb ass speaking with man's voice forbad the madness of the prophet. 
These are wells without water, clouds that are carried with a tempest; to whom the mist of darkness is reserved for ever. 
For when they speak great swelling words of vanity, they allure through the lusts of the flesh, through much wantonness, those that were clean escaped from them who live in
476,mountains were mountains of brass. 
In the first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot black horses; 
And in the third chariot white horses; and in the fourth chariot grisled and bay horses. 
Then I answered and said unto the angel that talked with me, What are these, my lord? 
And the angel answered and said unto me, These are the four spirits of the heavens, which go forth from standing before the LORD of all the earth. 
The black horses which are therein g
397,s which dwelt by them came, they said unto us ten times, From all places whence ye shall return unto us they will be upon you. 
Therefore set I in the lower places behind the wall, and on the higher places, I even set the people after their families with their swords, their spears, and their bows. 
And I looked, and rose up, and said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the pe
320,prophet Jeremiah, saying, Pray now unto the LORD our God for us. 
Now Jeremiah came in and went out among the people: for they had not put him into prison. 
Then Pharaoh's army was come forth out of Egypt: and when the Chaldeans that besieged Jerusalem heard tidings of them, they departed from Jerusalem. 
Then came the
450,he stones of Ramah, and the timber thereof, wherewith Baasha had builded; and king Asa built with them Geba of Benjamin, and Mizpah. 
The rest of all the acts of Asa, and all his might, and all that he did, and the cities which he built, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? Nevertheless in the time of his old age he was diseased in his feet. 
And Asa slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in t
413,ley and for pieces of bread, to slay the souls that should not die, and to save the souls alive that should not live, by your lying to my people that hear your lies? 
Wherefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against your pillows, wherewith ye there hunt the souls to make them fly, and I will tear them from your arms, and will let the souls go, even the souls that ye hunt to make them fly. 
Your kerchief
352,rejoice in him, because we have trusted in his holy name. 
Let thy mercy, O LORD, be upon us, according as we hope in thee. 
I will bless the LORD at all times: his praise shall continually be in my mouth. 
My soul shall make her boast in the LORD: the humble shall hear thereof, and be glad. 
O magnify the LORD with me, and let us exalt his name toge
361,death unto life. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, The hour is coming, and now is, when the dead shall hear the voice of the Son of God: and they that hear shall live. 
For as the Father hath life in himself; so hath he given to the Son to have life in himself; 
And hath given him authority to execute judgment also, because he is the Son of man. 
Marvel not at
341,ll tell you what I will do to my vineyard: I will take away the hedge thereof, and it shall be eaten up; and break down the wall thereof, and it shall be trodden down: 
And I will lay it waste: it shall not be pruned, nor digged; but there shall come up briers and thorns: I will also command the clouds that they rain no rain upon it. 
For 
444,l the congregation together on the first day of the second month, and they declared their pedigrees after their families, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, by their polls. 
As the LORD commanded Moses, so he numbered them in the wilderness of Sinai. 
And the children of Reuben, Israel's eldest son, by their generations, after their families, by the house of their fathers, 
351, the Gadites, and of the half tribe of Manasseh, with all manner of instruments of war for the battle, an hundred and twenty thousand. 
All these men of war, that could keep rank, came with a perfect heart to Hebron, to make David king over all Israel: and all the rest also of Israel were of one heart to make David king. 
And there they were with Da
381,cast. 
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and three looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and three looking toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them, and all their hinder parts were inward. 
And it was an hand breadth thick, and the brim thereof was wrought like the brim of a cup, with flowers of lilies: it contained two
437, not hearken unto them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David? and we have none inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to your tents, O Israel: and now, David, see to thine own house. So all Israel went to their tents. 
But as for the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities of Judah, Rehoboam reigned over them. 
Then king Rehoboam sent Hadoram that was over the tribute; and the children of Israel
345,ghter came up out of the city of David unto her house which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo. 
And three times in a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and peace offerings upon the altar which he built unto the LORD, and he burnt incense upon the altar that was before the LORD. So he finished the house. 
And king Solomon m
410,es. 
He was with David at Pasdammim, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of barley; and the people fled from before the Philistines. 
And they set themselves in the midst of that parcel, and delivered it, and slew the Philistines; and the LORD saved them by a great deliverance. 
Now three of the thirty captains went down to the rock to David, into th
462, for her honourable men, and all her great men were bound in chains. 
Thou also shalt be drunken: thou shalt be hid, thou also shalt seek strength because of the enemy. 
All thy strong holds shall be like fig trees with the firstripe figs: if they be shaken, they shall even fall into the mouth of the eater. 
Behold, thy people in the midst of thee are women: the gates of thy land shall be set wide open unto thine enemies: the fire shall devour thy bars. 
Dra
325, LORD than sacrifice. 
An high look, and a proud heart, and the plowing of the wicked, is sin. 
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of every one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to and fro of them that seek death. 
The robbery of the wicked s
379,el for inheritance, and these are their portions, saith the Lord GOD. 
And these are the goings out of the city on the north side, four thousand and five hundred measures. 
And the gates of the city shall be after the names of the tribes of Israel: three gates northward; one gate of Reuben, one gate of Judah, one gate of Levi. 
And at the east side four thousand and five hundr
439,Sinai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after their departing out of the land of Egypt. 
And the whole congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and Aaron in the wilderness: 
And the children of Israel said unto them, Would to God we had died by the hand of the LORD in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh pots, and when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us forth into this wilderness, t
381,the LORD, and there abide for ever. 
And Elkanah her husband said unto her, Do what seemeth thee good; tarry until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So the woman abode, and gave her son suck until she weaned him. 
And when she had weaned him, she took him up with her, with three bullocks, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought him unto th
340, wicked way, he shall die in his iniquity; but thou hast delivered thy soul. 
Again, When a righteous man doth turn from his righteousness, and commit iniquity, and I lay a stumbling-block before him, he shall die: because thou hast not given him warning, he shall die in his sin, and his righteousness which he hath done shall not be remem
388,ockets of brass twenty; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the west side were hangings of fifty cubits, their pillars ten, and their sockets ten; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the east side eastward fifty cubits. 
The hangings of the one side of the gate were fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And 
321, the slayer that killeth any person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and they shall be your refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city, they shall 
368,ed, and not pitied. 
Thou hast called as in a solemn day my terrors round about, so that in the day of the LORD's anger none escaped nor remained: those that I have swaddled and brought up hath mine enemy consumed. 
I AM the man that hath seen affliction by the rod of his wrath. 
He hath led me, and brought me into darkness, but not into light. 
Surely against me is
344, and possessed his land from Arnon unto Jabbok, even unto the children of Ammon: for the border of the children of Ammon was strong. 
And Israel took all these cities: and Israel dwelt in all the cities of the Amorites, in Heshbon, and in all the villages thereof. 
For Heshbon was the city of Sihon the king of the Amorites, who had fought aga
467, are destroyed for lack of knowledge: because thou hast rejected knowledge, I will also reject thee, that thou shalt be no priest to me: seeing thou hast forgotten the law of thy God, I will also forget thy children. 
As they were increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will I change their glory into shame. 
They eat up the sin of my people, and they set their heart on their iniquity. 
And there shall be, like people, like priest: and I will punish them f
403, thee all that debt, because thou desiredst me: 
Shouldest not thou also have had compassion on thy fellowservant, even as I had pity on thee? 
And his lord was wroth, and delivered him to the tormentors, till he should pay all that was due unto him. 
So likewise shall my heavenly Father do also unto you, if ye from your hearts forgive not every one his brother their trespasses. 
And it came to pass,
457, earth be blessed. 
Unto you first God, having raised up his Son Jesus, sent him to bless you, in turning away every one of you from his iniquities. 
And as they spake unto the people, the priests, and the captain of the temple, and the Sadducees, came upon them, 
Being grieved that they taught the people, and preached through Jesus the resurrection from the dead. 
And they laid hands on them, and put them in hold unto the next day: for it was now event
342,l this secret. 
Then the king made Daniel a great man, and gave him many great gifts, and made him ruler over the whole province of Babylon, and chief of the governors over all the wise men of Babylon. 
Then Daniel requested of the king, and he set Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, over the affairs of the province of Babylon: but Daniel sat 
442,eir pillars three, and their sockets three. 
And for the other side of the court gate, on this hand and that hand, were hangings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their sockets three. 
All the hangings of the court round about were of fine twined linen. 
And the sockets for the pillars were of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver; and the overlaying of their chapiters of silver; and all the pillars of the 
444, which is given for you: this do in remembrance of me. 
Likewise also the cup after supper, saying, This cup is the new testament in my blood, which is shed for you. 
But, behold, the hand of him that betrayeth me is with me on the table. 
And truly the Son of man goeth, as it was determined: but woe unto that man by whom he is betrayed! 
And they began to enquire among themselves, which of them it was that should do this thing. 
And there 
348,sand and six hundred and fifty. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Reuben were an hundred thousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty, throughout their armies. And they shall set forth in the second rank. 
Then the tabernacle of the congregation shall set forward with the camp of the Levites in the midst of the camp: as the
359,n for him, and all the trees of the field fainted for him. 
I made the nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I cast him down to hell with them that descend into the pit: and all the trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water, shall be comforted in the nether parts of the earth. 
They also went down into hell with him unto 
452,stuff to Tobiah out of the chamber. 
Then I commanded, and they cleansed the chambers: and thither brought I again the vessels of the house of God, with the meat offering and the frankincense. 
And I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been given them: for the Levites and the singers, that did the work, were fled every one to his field. 
Then contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of God forsaken? And I gathered them
386, have driven me out this day from abiding in the inheritance of the LORD, saying, Go, serve other gods. 
Now therefore, let not my blood fall to the earth before the face of the LORD: for the king of Israel is come out to seek a flea, as when one doth hunt a partridge in the mountains. 
Then said Saul, I have sinned: return, my son David: for I will no more do thee harm, because my s
325,; 
To hear the groaning of the prisoner; to loose those that are appointed to death; 
To declare the name of the LORD in Zion, and his praise in Jerusalem; 
When the people are gathered together, and the kingdoms, to serve the LORD. 
He weakened my strength in the way; he shortened my days. 
I said, O my God, take me not aw
425,uits, without partiality, and without hypocrisy. 
And the fruit of righteousness is sown in peace of them that make peace. 
From whence come wars and fightings among you? come they not hence, even of your lusts that war in your members? 
Ye lust, and have not: ye kill, and desire to have, and cannot obtain: ye fight and war, yet ye have not, because ye ask not. 
Ye ask, and receive not, because ye ask amiss, that ye may c
459,e worms shall cover them. 
Behold, I know your thoughts, and the devices which ye wrongfully imagine against me. 
For ye say, Where is the house of the prince? and where are the dwelling places of the wicked? 
Have ye not asked them that go by the way? and do ye not know their tokens, 
That the wicked is reserved to the day of destruction? they shall be brought forth to the day of wrath. 
Who shall declare his way to his face? and who shall repay him what
422,nd understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
Be it known therefore unto you, that the salvation of God is sent unto the Gentiles, and that they will hear it. 
And when he had said these words, the Jews departed, and had great reasoning among themselves. 
And Paul dwelt two whole years in his own hired house, and received all that came in unto him, 
Preaching the kingdom of God, and 
367,nto thee, after that thou shalt have known that the heavens do rule. 
Wherefore, O king, let my counsel be acceptable unto thee, and break off thy sins by righteousness, and thine iniquities by shewing mercy to the poor; if it may be a lengthening of thy tranquillity. 
All this came upon the king Nebuchadnezzar. 
At the end of twelve months he walked in the palace 
437, not certainly know that every bottle shall be filled with wine? 
Then shalt thou say unto them, Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will fill all the inhabitants of this land, even the kings that sit upon David's throne, and the priests, and the prophets, and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, with drunkenness. 
And I will dash them one against another, even the fathers and the sons together, saith the LORD: I will not pity, nor spare, no
382, again out of Macedonia unto you, and of you to be brought on my way toward Judaea. 
When I therefore was thus minded, did I use lightness? or the things that I purpose, do I purpose according to the flesh, that with me there should be yea yea, and nay nay? 
But as God is true, our word toward you was not yea and nay. 
For the Son of God, Jesus Christ, who was preached among you 
441,was called Judas, one of the twelve, went before them, and drew near unto Jesus to kiss him. 
But Jesus said unto him, Judas, betrayest thou the Son of man with a kiss? 
When they which were about him saw what would follow, they said unto him, Lord, shall we smite with the sword? 
And one of them smote the servant of the high priest, and cut off his right ear. 
And Jesus answered and said, Suffer ye thus far. And he touched his ear, and 
440, all are your's; 
And ye are Christ's; and Christ is God's. 
Let a man so account of us, as of the ministers of Christ, and stewards of the mysteries of God. 
Moreover it is required in stewards, that a man be found faithful. 
But with me it is a very small thing that I should be judged of you, or of man's judgment: yea, I judge not mine own self. 
For I know nothing by myself; yet am I not hereby justified: but he that judgeth me is th
440, the moon shall be dark, and the stars shall withdraw their shining: 
And the LORD shall utter his voice before his army: for his camp is very great: for he is strong that executeth his word: for the day of the LORD is great and very terrible; and who can abide it? 
Therefore also now, saith the LORD, turn ye even to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning: 
And rend your heart, and not your garment
333,n himself: he that believeth not God hath made him a liar; because he believeth not the record that God gave of his Son. 
And this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son. 
He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life. 
These things have I written unto 
423,e ark of the covenant of the LORD, and unto all the elders of Israel. 
And Moses commanded them, saying, At the end of every seven years, in the solemnity of the year of release, in the feast of tabernacles, 
When all Israel is come to appear before the LORD thy God in the place which he shall choose, thou shalt read this law before all Israel in their hearing. 
Gather the people together, men and women, and children, a
453, have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewd
368,hem that have sworn oaths: but he will call to remembrance the iniquity, that they may be taken. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have made your iniquity to be remembered, in that your transgressions are discovered, so that in all your doings your sins do appear; because, I say, that ye are come to remembrance, ye shall be taken with the hand. 
And tho
379, son, and called his name Seth: For God, said she, hath appointed me another seed instead of Abel, whom Cain slew. 
And to Seth, to him also there was born a son; and he called his name Enos: then began men to call upon the name of the LORD. 
This is the book of the generations of Adam. In the day that God created man, in the likeness of God made he him; 
Male and female creat
375,as gone out into the porch, another maid saw him, and said unto them that were there, This fellow was also with Jesus of Nazareth. 
And again he denied with an oath, I do not know the man. 
And after a while came unto him they that stood by, and said to Peter, Surely thou also art one of them; for thy speech bewrayeth thee. 
Then began he to curse and to swear, saying, I k
399,woman which hath an husband is bound by the law to her husband so long as he liveth; but if the husband be dead, she is loosed from the law of her husband. 
So then if, while her husband liveth, she be married to another man, she shall be called an adulteress: but if her husband be dead, she is free from that law; so that she is no adulteress, though she be married to another man. 
Wherefore, my 
337,my God, in thee do I put my trust: save me from all them that persecute me, and deliver me: 
Lest he tear my soul like a lion, rending it in pieces, while there is none to deliver. 
O LORD my God, If I have done this; if there be iniquity in my hands; 
If I have rewarded evil unto him that was at peace with me; (yea, I have delivered h
465,maria. 
And Ahab called Obadiah, which was the governor of his house. (Now Obadiah feared the LORD greatly: 
For it was so, when Jezebel cut off the prophets of the LORD, that Obadiah took an hundred prophets, and hid them by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water.) 
And Ahab said unto Obadiah, Go into the land, unto all fountains of water, and unto all brooks: peradventure we may find grass to save the horses and mules alive, that we lose not all t
362,e from the ruler of the synagogue's house, saying to him, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not the Master. 
But when Jesus heard it, he answered him, saying, Fear not: believe only, and she shall be made whole. 
And when he came into the house, he suffered no man to go in, save Peter, and James, and John, and the father and the mother of the maiden. 
And all wept
324,Jacob, and the number of the fourth part of Israel? Let me die the death of the righteous, and let my last end be like his! 
And Balak said unto Balaam, What hast thou done unto me? I took thee to curse mine enemies, and, behold, thou hast blessed them altogether. 
And he answered and said, Must I not take heed to speak th
464,aying, that they had also seen a vision of angels, which said that he was alive. 
And certain of them which were with us went to the sepulchre, and found it even so as the women had said: but him they saw not. 
Then he said unto them, O fools, and slow of heart to believe all that the prophets have spoken: 
Ought not Christ to have suffered these things, and to enter into his glory? 
And beginning at Moses and all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all th
439, thou hearkenedst not unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which he commanded thee: 
And they shall be upon thee for a sign and for a wonder, and upon thy seed for ever. 
Because thou servedst not the LORD thy God with joyfulness, and with gladness of heart, for the abundance of all things; 
Therefore shalt thou serve thine enemies which the LORD shall send against thee, in hunger, and in thirst
344,y lies in my name: I sent them not, neither have I commanded them, neither spake unto them: they prophesy unto you a false vision and divination, and a thing of nought, and the deceit of their heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that prophesy in my name, and I sent them not, yet they say, Sword and famine shall not b
325,ng water, there shall they rehearse the righteous acts of the LORD, even the righteous acts toward the inhabitants of his villages in Israel: then shall the people of the LORD go down to the gates. 
Awake, awake, Deborah: awake, awake, utter a song: arise, Barak, and lead thy captivity captive, thou son of Abinoam. 
Then he
358,fied, which hath pleasure in the prosperity of his servant. 
And my tongue shall speak of thy righteousness and of thy praise all the day long. 
The transgression of the wicked saith within my heart, that there is no fear of God before his eyes. 
For he flattereth himself in his own eyes, until his iniquity be found to be hateful. 
The words of his mouth a
467,e; 
And had taken the women captives, that were therein: they slew not any, either great or small, but carried them away, and went on their way. 
So David and his men came to the city, and, behold, it was burned with fire; and their wives, and their sons, and their daughters, were taken captives. 
Then David and the people that were with him lifted up their voice and wept, until they had no more power to weep. 
And David's two wives were taken captives, Ahinoam t
460,esh, the river to the great sea. And this is the south side southward. 
The west side also shall be the great sea from the border, till a man come over against Hamath. This is the west side. 
So shall ye divide this land unto you according to the tribes of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that ye shall divide it by lot for an inheritance unto you, and to the strangers that sojourn among you, which shall beget children among you: and they shall be unto y
362,the man also by the woman; but all things of God. 
Judge in yourselves: is it comely that a woman pray unto God uncovered? 
Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? 
But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. 
But if any man seem to be contentious, we have 
422,ss, and he shall not make good that which was torn. 
And if a man borrow ought of his neighbour, and it be hurt, or die, the owner thereof being not with it, he shall surely make it good. 
But if the owner thereof be with it, he shall not make it good: if it be an hired thing, it came for his hire. 
And if a man entice a maid that is not betrothed, and lie with her, he shall surely endow her to be his wife. 
If her fat
380,y me: but I thy servant fear the LORD from my youth. 
Was it not told my lord what I did when Jezebel slew the prophets of the LORD, how I hid an hundred men of the LORD's prophets by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water? 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here: and he shall slay me. 
And Elijah said, As the LORD of hosts liveth, before who
365,even. 
And he commanded the people to sit down on the ground: and he took the seven loaves, and gave thanks, and brake, and gave to his disciples to set before them; and they did set them before the people. 
And they had a few small fishes: and he blessed, and commanded to set them also before them. 
So they did eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broke
355,in Jerusalem. 
And at Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon; whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Nadab, 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeah. And these also dwelt with their brethren in Jerusalem, over against them. 
And Ner begat Kish, and Kish begat Saul, and Saul begat Jona
476,And he answered, I have not troubled Israel; but thou, and thy father's house, in that ye have forsaken the commandments of the LORD, and thou hast followed Baalim. 
Now therefore send, and gather to me all Israel unto mount Carmel, and the prophets of Baal four hundred and fifty, and the prophets of the groves four hundred, which eat at Jezebel's table. 
So Ahab sent unto all the children of Israel, and gathered the prophets together unto mount Carmel. 
And Elijah came u
421,is own grief, and shall spread forth his hands in this house: 
Then hear thou from heaven thy dwelling place, and forgive, and render unto every man according unto all his ways, whose heart thou knowest; (for thou only knowest the hearts of the children of men:) 
That they may fear thee, to walk in thy ways, so long as they live in the land which thou gavest unto our fathers. 
Moreover concerning the stranger, which i
450,of the tabernacle of the congregation day and night seven days, and keep the charge of the LORD, that ye die not: for so I am commanded. 
So Aaron and his sons did all things which the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses. 
And it came to pass on the eighth day, that Moses called Aaron and his sons, and the elders of Israel; 
And he said unto Aaron, Take thee a young calf for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering, without blemish, and off
396, saith, Behold, the days come, saith the Lord, when I will make a new covenant with the house of Israel and with the house of Judah: 
Not according to the covenant that I made with their fathers in the day when I took them by the hand to lead them out of the land of Egypt; because they continued not in my covenant, and I regarded them not, saith the Lord. 
For this is the covenant that I will 
411,dad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot. 
And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took from thy father, I will restore; and thou shalt make streets for thee in Damascus, as my father made in Samaria. Then said Ahab, I will send thee away with this covenant. So he made a covenant with him, and sent him away. 
And a certain man of the sons of the prophets said unto
457,of the wine of the wrath of her fornication. 
And the third angel followed them, saying with a loud voice, If any man worship the beast and his image, and receive his mark in his forehead, or in his hand, 
The same shall drink of the wine of the wrath of God, which is poured out without mixture into the cup of his indignation; and he shall be tormented with fire and brimstone in the presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb: 
And the 
472, by Bethlehem, to go to enter into Egypt, 
Because of the Chaldeans: for they were afraid of them, because Ishmael the son of Nethaniah had slain Gedaliah the son of Ahikam, whom the king of Babylon made governor in the land. 
Then all the captains of the forces, and Johanan the son of Kareah, and Jezaniah the son of Hoshaiah, and all the people from the least even unto the greatest, came near, 
And said unto Jeremiah the prophet, Let, we beseech thee, our supplicatio
337,herubims, and took thereof, and put it into the hands of him that was clothed with linen: who took it, and went out. 
And there appeared in the cherubims the form of a man's hand under their wings. 
And when I looked, behold the four wheels by the cherubims, one wheel by one cherub, and another wheel by another cherub: and the appearan
400,his neighbour, and lie in wait for him, and rise up against him, and smite him mortally that he die, and fleeth into one of these cities: 
Then the elders of his city shall send and fetch him thence, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of blood, that he may die. 
Thine eye shall not pity him, but thou shalt put away the guilt of innocent blood from Israel, that it may go well with thee. 

410,, and I will do whatsoever thou sayest unto me: come therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people. 
And Balaam answered and said unto the servants of Balak, If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the word of the LORD my God, to do less or more. 
Now therefore, I pray you, tarry ye also here this night, that I may know what the LORD will say unto me more. 
And God came u
443, me to go to Bethlehem: 
And he said, Let me go, I pray thee; for our family hath a sacrifice in the city; and my brother, he hath commanded me to be there: and now, if I have found favour in thine eyes, let me get away, I pray thee, and see my brethren. Therefore he cometh not unto the king's table. 
Then Saul's anger was kindled against Jonathan, and he said unto him, Thou son of the perverse rebellious woman, do not I know that thou has
325,fall like a pleasant vessel. 
And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal of the flock to escape. 
A voice of the cry of the shepherds, and an howling of the principal of the flock, shall be heard: for the LORD hath spoiled their pasture. 
And the peaceable habitations are cut down because of the fierce a
473,ast been a man of war, and hast shed blood. 
Howbeit the LORD God of Israel chose me before all the house of my father to be king over Israel for ever: for he hath chosen Judah to be the ruler; and of the house of Judah, the house of my father; and among the sons of my father he liked me to make me king over all Israel: 
And of all my sons, (for the LORD hath given me many sons,) he hath chosen Solomon my son to sit upon the throne of the kingdom of the LORD over Israe
461,lf beseech you by the meekness and gentleness of Christ, who in presence am base among you, but being absent am bold toward you: 
But I beseech you, that I may not be bold when I am present with that confidence, wherewith I think to be bold against some, which think of us as if we walked according to the flesh. 
For though we walk in the flesh, we do not war after the flesh: 
(For the weapons of our warfare are not carnal, but mighty through God to the pull
444,ery hand six fingers, and on every foot six toes, four and twenty in number; and he also was born to the giant. 
And when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimeah the brother of David slew him. 
These four were born to the giant in Gath, and fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And David spake unto the LORD the words of this song in the day that the LORD had delivered him out of the hand of all his enemies, and 
460,ence: 
For it is written, He shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee: 
And in their hands they shall bear thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
And Jesus answering said unto him, It is said, Thou shalt not tempt the Lord thy God. 
And when the devil had ended all the temptation, he departed from him for a season. 
And Jesus returned in the power of the Spirit into Galilee: and there went out a fame of him through all t
435,kings of Israel? 
So Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in Tirzah: and Elah his son reigned in his stead. 
And also by the hand of the prophet Jehu the son of Hanani came the word of the LORD against Baasha, and against his house, even for all the evil that he did in the sight of the LORD, in provoking him to anger with the work of his hands, in being like the house of Jeroboam; and because he killed him. 
In the twenty 
355, the land that he hath trodden upon, and to his children, because he hath wholly followed the LORD. 
Also the LORD was angry with me for your sakes, saying, Thou also shalt not go in thither. 
But Joshua the son of Nun, which standeth before thee, he shall go in thither: encourage him: for he shall cause Israel to inherit it. 
Moreover your little ones,
425,alt be as the morning. 
And thou shalt be secure, because there is hope; yea, thou shalt dig about thee, and thou shalt take thy rest in safety. 
Also thou shalt lie down, and none shall make thee afraid; yea, many shall make suit unto thee. 
But the eyes of the wicked shall fail, and they shall not escape, and their hope shall be as the giving up of the ghost. 
And Job answered and said, 
No doubt but ye are the people, 
478,ur feasts into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing the words of the LORD: 
And they shall wander from sea to sea, and from the north even to the east, they sh
385,thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it so quickly, my son? And he said, Because the LORD thy God brought it to me. 
And Isaac said unto Jacob, Come near, I pray thee, that
389,nt for him before the LORD. 
And he shall offer the one of the turtledoves, or of the young pigeons, such as he can get; 
Even such as he is able to get, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, with the meat offering: and the priest shall make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed before the LORD. 
This is the law of him in whom is the plague of leprosy, wh
355,are rule over the people that wrought in the work. 
But Pharaoh's daughter came up out of the city of David unto her house which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo. 
And three times in a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and peace offerings upon the altar which he built unto the LORD, and he burnt incense upon the altar that was bef
325,e sons of Kohath by their families; Amram, and Izehar, Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the sons of Merari by their families; Mahli, and Mushi. These are the families of the Levites according to the house of their fathers. 
Of Gershon was the family of the Libnites, and the family of the Shimites: these are the families of the Gers
410,rn all on the altar, to be a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering be of the flocks, namely, of the sheep, or of the goats, for a burnt sacrifice; he shall bring it a male without blemish. 
And he shall kill it on the side of the altar northward before the LORD: and the priests, Aaron's sons, shall sprinkle his blood round about upon the altar. 
And
454,r a writing of divorcement: 
But I say unto you, That whosoever shall put away his wife, saving for the cause of fornication, causeth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry her that is divorced committeth adultery. 
Again, ye have heard that it hath been said by them of old time, Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto the Lord thine oaths: 
But I say unto you, Swear not at all; neither by heaven; for it is God's throne: 
N
346,arth. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, I will do this thing also that thou hast spoken: for thou hast found grace in my sight, and I know thee by name. 
And he said, I beseech thee, shew me thy glory. 
And he said, I will make all my goodness pass before thee, and I will proclaim the name of the LORD before thee; and will be gracious to whom I wi
357,blished throughout all his empire, (for it is great,) all the wives shall give to their husbands honour, both to great and small. 
And the saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan: 
For he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people 
444,uity. 
And he shall bring a ram without blemish out of the flock, with thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him concerning his ignorance wherein he erred and wist it not, and it shall be forgiven him. 
It is a trespass offering: he hath certainly trespassed against the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
If a soul sin, and commit a trespass against the LORD, and lie 
376, unto the rest in Thyatira, as many as have not this doctrine, and which have not known the depths of Satan, as they speak; I will put upon you none other burden. 
But that which ye have already hold fast till I come. 
And he that overcometh, and keepeth my works unto the end, to him will I give power over the nations: 
And he shall rule them with a rod of iron; as the vess
433,he righteous with the wicked? 
Peradventure there be fifty righteous within the city: wilt thou also destroy and not spare the place for the fifty righteous that are therein? 
That be far from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far from thee: Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right? 
And the LORD said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteou
445,, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building, 
And hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in th
355,a portion for Naphtali. 
And by the border of Naphtali, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Manasseh. 
And by the border of Manasseh, from the east side unto the west side, a portion for Ephraim. 
And by the border of Ephraim, from the east side even unto the west side, a portion for Reuben. 
And by the border of Reuben, from the east s
432,hered sticks upon the sabbath day. 
And they that found him gathering sticks brought him unto Moses and Aaron, and unto all the congregation. 
And they put him in ward, because it was not declared what should be done to him. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, The man shall be surely put to death: all the congregation shall stone him with stones without the camp. 
And all the congregation brought him without the camp, and stoned him 
351,d, all that he hath is in thy power; only upon himself put not forth thine hand. So Satan went forth from the presence of the LORD. 
And there was a day when his sons and his daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And there came a messenger unto Job, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses feeding beside the
414,sed thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go forth, and speak comfortably unto thy servants: for I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will not tarry one with thee this night: and that will be worse unto thee than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now. 
Then the king arose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all the people, saying, Behold, the king doth sit in the gate. And all the p
442,ember me, and visit me, and revenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that for thy sake I have suffered rebuke. 
Thy words were found, and I did eat them; and thy word was unto me the joy and rejoicing of mine heart: for I am called by thy name, O LORD God of hosts. 
I sat not in the assembly of the mockers, nor rejoiced; I sat alone because of thy hand: for thou hast filled me with indignation. 
Why is my 
392,Almighty scattered kings in it, it was white as snow in Salmon. 
The hill of God is as the hill of Bashan; an high hill as the hill of Bashan. 
Why leap ye, ye high hills? this is the hill which God desireth to dwell in; yea, the LORD will dwell in it for ever. 
The chariots of God are twenty thousand, even thousands of angels: the Lord is among them, as in Sinai, in the holy place. 
Thou 
409,persecute you: bless, and curse not. 
Rejoice with them that do rejoice, and weep with them that weep. 
Be of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate. Be not wise in your own conceits. 
Recompense to no man evil for evil. Provide things honest in the sight of all men. 
If it be possible, as much as lieth in you, live peaceably with all men. 
Dearly belove
392,nd of God: that which is with the Almighty will I not conceal. 
Behold, all ye yourselves have seen it; why then are ye thus altogether vain? 
This is the portion of a wicked man with God, and the heritage of oppressors, which they shall receive of the Almighty. 
If his children be multiplied, it is for the sword: and his offspring shall not be satisfied with bread. 
Those that remain of h
452,e evil before me from their youth: for the children of Israel have only provoked me to anger with the work of their hands, saith the LORD. 
For this city hath been to me as a provocation of mine anger and of my fury from the day that they built it even unto this day; that I should remove it from before my face, 
Because of all the evil of the children of Israel and of the children of Judah, which they have done to provoke me to anger, they, their k
471,s sprinkled in the holy place. 
But the earthen vessel wherein it is sodden shall be broken: and if it be sodden in a brasen pot, it shall be both scoured, and rinsed in water. 
All the males among the priests shall eat thereof: it is most holy. 
And no sin offering, whereof any of the blood is brought into the tabernacle of the congregation to reconcile withal in the holy place, shall be eaten: it shall be burnt in the fire. 
Likewise this is the law of the trespass
384,. And the messengers departed, and brought him word again. 
And Benhadad sent unto him, and said, The gods do so unto me, and more also, if the dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for all the people that follow me. 
And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him that girdeth on his harness boast himself as he that putteth it off. 
And it came to pass, when B
336,me, shall ye observe to offer unto me in their due season. 
And thou shalt say unto them, This is the offering made by fire which ye shall offer unto the LORD; two lambs of the first year without spot day by day, for a continual burnt offering. 
The one lamb shalt thou offer in the morning, and the other lamb shalt thou offer at even;
445,of the young men was very great before the LORD: for men abhorred the offering of the LORD. 
But Samuel ministered before the LORD, being a child, girded with a linen ephod. 
Moreover his mother made him a little coat, and brought it to him from year to year, when she came up with her husband to offer the yearly sacrifice. 
And Eli blessed Elkanah and his wife, and said, The LORD give thee seed of this woman for the loan which is lent to the
475, 
His glory is like the firstling of his bullock, and his horns are like the horns of unicorns: with them he shall push the people together to the ends of the earth: and they are the ten thousands of Ephraim, and they are the thousands of Manasseh. 
And of Zebulun he said, Rejoice, Zebulun, in thy going out; and, Issachar, in thy tents. 
They shall call the people unto the mountain; there they shall offer sacrifices of righteousness: for they shall suck of the abundance 
347,udgments, to deal truly; he is just, he shall surely live, saith the Lord GOD. 
If he beget a son that is a robber, a shedder of blood, and that doeth the like to any one of these things, 
And that doeth not any of those duties, but even hath eaten upon the mountains, and defiled his neighbour's wife, 
Hath oppressed the poor and needy, hath spo
424,nd will bring them again to their folds; and they shall be fruitful and increase. 
And I will set up shepherds over them which shall feed them: and they shall fear no more, nor be dismayed, neither shall they be lacking, saith the LORD. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will raise unto David a righteous Branch, and a King shall reign and prosper, and shall execute judgment and justice in the earth. 
In his d
480,d with the glory which shall be revealed in us. 
For the earnest expectation of the creature waiteth for the manifestation of the sons of God. 
For the creature was made subject to vanity, not willingly, but by reason of him who hath subjected the same in hope, 
Because the creature itself also shall be delivered from the bondage of corruption into the glorious liberty of the children of God. 
For we know that the whole creation groaneth and travaileth in pain together until 
442,I pray thee, pardon my sin, and turn again with me, that I may worship the LORD. 
And Samuel said unto Saul, I will not return with thee: for thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, and the LORD hath rejected thee from being king over Israel. 
And as Samuel turned about to go away, he laid hold upon the skirt of his mantle, and it rent. 
And Samuel said unto him, The LORD hath rent the kingdom of Israel from thee this day, and hath given
323,first resurrection. 
Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection: on such the second death hath no power, but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years. 
And when the thousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed out of his prison, 
And shall go out to de
365,ssed thee. 
Ye shall not do after all the things that we do here this day, every man whatsoever is right in his own eyes. 
For ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which the LORD your God giveth you. 
But when ye go over Jordan, and dwell in the land which the LORD your God giveth you to inherit, and when he giveth you rest from all your ene
378,d to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone from me: if ye will not make known unto me the dream, with the interpretation thereof, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses shall be made a dunghill. 
But if ye shew the dream, and the interpretation thereof, ye shall receive of me gifts and rewards and great honour: therefore shew me the dream, and the interpretation thereof. 
They
362,or to provoke them to jealousy. 
Now if the fall of them be the riches of the world, and the diminishing of them the riches of the Gentiles; how much more their fulness? 
For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 
If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of t
435,ay of the month, that Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon came, he and all his army, against Jerusalem, and pitched against it, and built forts against it round about. 
So the city was besieged unto the eleventh year of king Zedekiah. 
And in the fourth month, in the ninth day of the month, the famine was sore in the city, so that there was no bread for the people of the land. 
Then the city was broken up, and all the men of war fled, a
365,night. 
These chief fathers of the Levites were chief throughout their generations; these dwelt at Jerusalem. 
And in Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon, Jehiel, whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, then Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab. 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zechariah, and Mikloth. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeam. And they also d
479,mmandments of men, that turn from the truth. 
Unto the pure all things are pure: but unto them that are defiled and unbelieving is nothing pure; but even their mind and conscience is defiled. 
They profess that they know God; but in works they deny him, being abominable, and disobedient, and unto every good work reprobate. 
But speak thou the things which become sound doctrine: 
That the aged men be sober, grave, temperate, sound in faith, in charity, in patience. 
The aged 
404, and Shomer, and Hotham, and Shua their sister. 
And the sons of Japhlet; Pasach, and Bimhal, and Ashvath. These are the children of Japhlet. 
And the sons of Shamer; Ahi, and Rohgah, Jehubbah, and Aram. 
And the sons of his brother Helem; Zophah, and Imna, and Shelesh, and Amal. 
The sons of Zophah; Suah, and Harnepher, and Shual, and Beri, and Imrah, 
Bezer, and Hod, and Shamma, and Shilshah, and It
423,at loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love. 
In this was manifested the love of God toward us, because that God sent his only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through him. 
Herein is love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for our sins. 
Beloved, if God so loved us, we ought also to love one another. 
No man hath seen God at any time. If we love one a
451,RD be of fowls, then he shall bring his offering of turtledoves, or of young pigeons. 
And the priest shall bring it unto the altar, and wring off his head, and burn it on the altar; and the blood thereof shall be wrung out at the side of the altar: 
And he shall pluck away his crop with his feathers, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, by the place of the ashes: 
And he shall cleave it with the wings thereof, but shall not divide it as
371,vied her sister; and said unto Jacob, Give me children, or else I die. 
And Jacob's anger was kindled against Rachel: and he said, Am I in God's stead, who hath withheld from thee the fruit of the womb? 
And she said, Behold my maid Bilhah, go in unto her; and she shall bear upon my knees, that I may also have children by her. 
And she gave him Bilhah her handmaid to w
423,did sit and speak against me: but thy servant did meditate in thy statutes. 
Thy testimonies also are my delight and my counsellors.leth. 
My soul cleaveth unto the dust: quicken thou me according to thy word. 
I have declared my ways, and thou heardest me: teach me thy statutes. 
Make me to understand the way of thy precepts: so shall I talk of thy wondrous works. 
My soul melteth for heaviness: strengthen thou me acco
363, of contention to the whole earth! I have neither lent on usury, nor men have lent to me on usury; yet every one of them doth curse me. 
The LORD said, Verily it shall be well with thy remnant; verily I will cause the enemy to entreat thee well in the time of evil and in the time of affliction. 
Shall iron break the northern iron and the steel? 
Thy substance a
341,where there is no way. 
They grope in the dark without light, and he maketh them to stagger like a drunken man. 
Lo, mine eye hath seen all this, mine ear hath heard and understood it. 
What ye know, the same do I know also: I am not inferior unto you. 
Surely I would speak to the Almighty, and I desire to reason with God. 
But ye are forg
422,e time of their trouble. 
For according to the number of thy cities were thy gods, O Judah; and according to the number of the streets of Jerusalem have ye set up altars to that shameful thing, even altars to burn incense unto Baal. 
Therefore pray not thou for this people, neither lift up a cry or prayer for them: for I will not hear them in the time that they cry unto me for their trouble. 
What hath my beloved to do
472,were edified; and walking in the fear of the Lord, and in the comfort of the Holy Ghost, were multiplied. 
And it came to pass, as Peter passed throughout all quarters, he came down also to the saints which dwelt at Lydda. 
And there he found a certain man named Aeneas, which had kept his bed eight years, and was sick of the palsy. 
And Peter said unto him, Aeneas, Jesus Christ maketh thee whole: arise, and make thy bed. And he arose immediately. 
And all that dwelt a
398,hee: and we said, Let there be now an oath betwixt us, even betwixt us and thee, and let us make a covenant with thee; 
That thou wilt do us no hurt, as we have not touched thee, and as we have done unto thee nothing but good, and have sent thee away in peace: thou art now the blessed of the LORD. 
And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink. 
And they rose up betimes in the morning, an
431, I know the loss of children: 
But these two things shall come to thee in a moment in one day, the loss of children, and widowhood: they shall come upon thee in their perfection for the multitude of thy sorceries, and for the great abundance of thine enchantments. 
For thou hast trusted in thy wickedness: thou hast said, None seeth me. Thy wisdom and thy knowledge, it hath perverted thee; and thou hast said in thine heart, I am
354,thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, I have seen this people, and, behold, it is a stiffnecked people: 
Now therefore let me alone, that my wrath may wax hot against them, and that I may consume them: and I will make of thee a great nation. 
And Moses besought the LORD his God, and said, LORD, why doth thy wrath wax hot agai
322,nd they were afraid to come nigh him. 
And Moses called unto them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the congregation returned unto him: and Moses talked with them. 
And afterward all the children of Israel came nigh: and he gave them in commandment all that the LORD had spoken with him in mount Sinai. 
And till Moses had 
466, thou seekest. And when he came into her tent, behold, Sisera lay dead, and the nail was in his temples. 
So God subdued on that day Jabin the king of Canaan before the children of Israel. 
And the hand of the children of Israel prospered, and prevailed against Jabin the king of Canaan, until they had destroyed Jabin king of Canaan. 
Then sang Deborah and Barak the son of Abinoam on that day, saying, 
Praise ye the LORD for the avenging of Israel, when the peopl
394,arth, who hath given to David the king a wise son, endued with prudence and understanding, that might build an house for the LORD, and an house for his kingdom. 
And now I have sent a cunning man, endued with understanding, of Huram my father's, 
The son of a woman of the daughters of Dan, and his father was a man of Tyre, skilful to work in gold, and in silver, in brass, in iron, in stone, 
322,s, why do ye these things? We also are men of like passions with you, and preach unto you that ye should turn from these vanities unto the living God, which made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and all things that are therein: 
Who in times past suffered all nations to walk in their own ways. 
Nevertheless he left not hi
446,he LORD thy God, to keep his commandments and his statutes which are written in this book of the law, and if thou turn unto the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul. 
For this commandment which I command thee this day, it is not hidden from thee, neither is it far off. 
It is not in heaven, that thou shouldest say, Who shall go up for us to heaven, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do it? 
Neither is it beyond
417,heir trouble. 
What hath my beloved to do in mine house, seeing she hath wrought lewdness with many, and the holy flesh is passed from thee? when thou doest evil, then thou rejoicest. 
The LORD called thy name, A green olive tree, fair, and of goodly fruit: with the noise of a great tumult he hath kindled fire upon it, and the branches of it are broken. 
For the LORD of hosts, that planted thee, hath pronounced ev
451, LORD upholdeth him with his hand. 
I have been young, and now am old; yet have I not seen the righteous forsaken, nor his seed begging bread. 
He is ever merciful, and lendeth; and his seed is blessed. 
Depart from evil, and do good; and dwell for evermore. 
For the LORD loveth judgment, and forsaketh not his saints; they are preserved for ever: but the seed of the wicked shall be cut off. 
The righteous shall inherit the land, and dwell therein 
340,m Saul with his clothes rent, and earth upon his head: and so it was, when he came to David, that he fell to the earth, and did obeisance. 
And David said unto him, From whence comest thou? And he said unto him, Out of the camp of Israel am I escaped. 
And David said unto him, How went the matter? I pray thee, tell me. And he answered, Th
467, altar under the hill, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the LORD. 
And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basons; and half of the blood he sprinkled on the altar. 
And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of the people: and they said, All that the LORD hath said will we do, and be 
440,and thee to do this thing. 
If there be a controversy between men, and they come unto judgment, that the judges may judge them; then they shall justify the righteous, and condemn the wicked. 
And it shall be, if the wicked man be worthy to be beaten, that the judge shall cause him to lie down, and to be beaten before his face, according to his fault, by a certain number. 
Forty stripes he may give him, and not exceed: lest, if he should
466,all this was done, that the scriptures of the prophets might be fulfilled. Then all the disciples forsook him, and fled. 
And they that had laid hold on Jesus led him away to Caiaphas the high priest, where the scribes and the elders were assembled. 
But Peter followed him afar off unto the high priest's palace, and went in, and sat with the servants, to see the end. 
Now the chief priests, and elders, and all the council, sought false witness against Jesus, to 
349, who were once enlightened, and have tasted of the heavenly gift, and were made partakers of the Holy Ghost, 
And have tasted the good word of God, and the powers of the world to come, 
If they shall fall away, to renew them again unto repentance; seeing they crucify to themselves the Son of God afresh, and put him to an open shame. 
For the earth
407,e water, then it shall come to pass, that, if she be defiled, and have done trespass against her husband, that the water that causeth the curse shall enter into her, and become bitter, and her belly shall swell, and her thigh shall rot: and the woman shall be a curse among her people. 
And if the woman be not defiled, but be clean; then she shall be free, and shall conceive seed. 
This is the law of jeal
373,ad hoped; they came thither, and were ashamed. 
For now ye are nothing; ye see my casting down, and are afraid. 
Did I say, Bring unto me? or, Give a reward for me of your substance? 
Or, Deliver me from the enemy's hand? or, Redeem me from the hand of the mighty? 
Teach me, and I will hold my tongue: and cause me to understand wherein I have erred. 
How forcible are rig
444, through the city, when I prepared my seat in the street! 
The young men saw me, and hid themselves: and the aged arose, and stood up. 
The princes refrained talking, and laid their hand on their mouth. 
The nobles held their peace, and their tongue cleaved to the roof of their mouth. 
When the ear heard me, then it blessed me; and when the eye saw me, it gave witness to me: 
Because I delivered the poor that cried, and the fatherless, and 
429,rom whom the children of Israel have deeply revolted. 
For in that day every man shall cast away his idols of silver, and his idols of gold, which your own hands have made unto you for a sin. 
Then shall the Assyrian fall with the sword, not of a mighty man; and the sword, not of a mean man, shall devour him: but he shall flee from the sword, and his young men shall be discomfited. 
And he shall pass over to his strong hold f
395, king; who slew him with the sword, and cast his dead body into the graves of the common people. 
Nevertheless the hand of Ahikam the son of Shaphan was with Jeremiah, that they should not give him into the hand of the people to put him to death. 
In the beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah came this word unto Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD
453,and patience of Jesus Christ, was in the isle that is called Patmos, for the word of God, and for the testimony of Jesus Christ. 
I was in the Spirit on the Lord's day, and heard behind me a great voice, as of a trumpet, 
Saying, I am Alpha and Omega, the first and the last: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it unto the seven churches which are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto Smyrna, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardi
477,uth side of the altar. 
Then brought he me out of the way of the gate northward, and led me about the way without unto the utter gate by the way that looketh eastward; and, behold, there ran out waters on the right side. 
And when the man that had the line in his hand went forth eastward, he measured a thousand cubits, and he brought me through the waters; the waters were to the ankles. 
Again he measured a thousand, and brought me through the waters; the waters were to th
346,f wood, to make any manner of cunning work. 
And he hath put in his heart that he may teach, both he, and Aholiab, the son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan. 
Them hath he filled with wisdom of heart, to work all manner of work, of the engraver, and of the cunning workman, and of the embroiderer, in blue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine 
479,nswer me. 
When thou saidst, Seek ye my face; my heart said unto thee, Thy face, LORD, will I seek. 
Hide not thy face far from me; put not thy servant away in anger: thou hast been my help; leave me not, neither forsake me, O God of my salvation. 
When my father and my mother forsake me, then the LORD will take me up. 
Teach me thy way, O LORD, and lead me in a plain path, because of mine enemies. 
Deliver me not over unto the will of mine enemies: for false witnesses are r
337, I must by all means keep this feast that cometh in Jerusalem: but I will return again unto you, if God will. And he sailed from Ephesus. 
And when he had landed at Caesarea, and gone up, and saluted the church, he went down to Antioch. 
And after he had spent some time there, he departed, and went over all the country of Galatia and P
351,ay unto Aaron, Stretch out thy rod, and smite the dust of the land, that it may become lice throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And they did so; for Aaron stretched out his hand with his rod, and smote the dust of the earth, and it became lice in man, and in beast; all the dust of the land became lice throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And the magici
401,th of Caleb; and we burned Ziklag with fire. 
And David said to him, Canst thou bring me down to this company? And he said, Swear unto me by God, that thou wilt neither kill me, nor deliver me into the hands of my master, and I will bring thee down to this company. 
And when he had brought him down, behold, they were spread abroad upon all the earth, eating and drinking, and dancing, because of all
461,is heart's desire, and blesseth the covetous, whom the LORD abhorreth. 
The wicked, through the pride of his countenance, will not seek after God: God is not in all his thoughts. 
His ways are always grievous; thy judgments are far above out of his sight: as for all his enemies, he puffeth at them. 
He hath said in his heart, I shall not be moved: for I shall never be in adversity. 
His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his tongue is misc
384, thousand talents of iron. 
And they with whom precious stones were found gave them to the treasure of the house of the LORD, by the hand of Jehiel the Gershonite. 
Then the people rejoiced, for that they offered willingly, because with perfect heart they offered willingly to the LORD: and David the king also rejoiced with great joy. 
Wherefore David blessed the LORD before all the
342,fear and tremble for all the goodness and for all the prosperity that I procure unto it. 
Thus saith the LORD; Again there shall be heard in this place, which ye say shall be desolate without man and without beast, even in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, that are desolate, without man, and without inhabitant, and witho
462, Gibeon. 
Now it came to pass, that when all the people which were with Ishmael saw Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces that were with him, then they were glad. 
So all the people that Ishmael had carried away captive from Mizpah cast about and returned, and went unto Johanan the son of Kareah. 
But Ishmael the son of Nethaniah escaped from Johanan with eight men, and went to the Ammonites. 
Then took Johanan the son of Kareah, and 
440,enerations; that they may see the bread wherewith I have fed you in the wilderness, when I brought you forth from the land of Egypt. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a pot, and put an omer full of manna therein, and lay it up before the LORD, to be kept for your generations. 
As the LORD commanded Moses, so Aaron laid it up before the Testimony, to be kept. 
And the children of Israel did eat manna forty years, until they came to a land
345,roubleth me, I will avenge her, lest by her continual coming she weary me. 
And the Lord said, Hear what the unjust judge saith. 
And shall not God avenge his own elect, which cry day and night unto him, though he bear long with them? 
I tell you that he will avenge them speedily. Nevertheless when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on
321,e: and if thou wilt put away thine abominations out of my sight, then shalt thou not remove. 
And thou shalt swear, The LORD liveth, in truth, in judgment, and in righteousness; and the nations shall bless themselves in him, and in him shall they glory. 
For thus saith the LORD to the men of Judah and Jerusalem, Break u
328, thirty and nine. 
The Nethinims: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the children of Tabbaoth, 
The children of Keros, the children of Siaha, the children of Padon, 
The children of Lebanah, the children of Hagabah, the children of Akkub, 
The children of Hagab, the children of Shalmai, the children of Hanan, 
The 
467,e been in the deep; 
In journeyings often, in perils of waters, in perils of robbers, in perils by mine own countrymen, in perils by the heathen, in perils in the city, in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils among false brethren; 
In weariness and painfulness, in watchings often, in hunger and thirst, in fastings often, in cold and nakedness. 
Beside those things that are without, that which cometh upon me daily, the care of all the churches
426, be accursed. 
And they shall build houses, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and eat the fruit of them. 
They shall not build, and another inhabit; they shall not plant, and another eat: for as the days of a tree are the days of my people, and mine elect shall long enjoy the work of their hands. 
They shall not labour in vain, nor bring forth for trouble; for they are the seed of the blessed of the LORD, a
475,to their works. 
And the sea gave up the dead which were in it; and death and hell delivered up the dead which were in them: and they were judged every man according to their works. 
And death and hell were cast into the lake of fire. This is the second death. 
And whosoever was not found written in the book of life was cast into the lake of fire. 
And I saw a new heaven and a new earth: for the first heaven and the first earth were passed away; and there was no more sea
344,s of Jordan: and there fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and two thousand. 
And Jephthah judged Israel six years. Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daug
455,ong their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep mine ordinance, that ye commit not any one of these abominable customs, which were committed before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy. 
Ye shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my sabba
320, you, That whosoever shall put away his wife, saving for the cause of fornication, causeth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry her that is divorced committeth adultery. 
Again, ye have heard that it hath been said by them of old time, Thou shalt not forswear thyself, but shalt perform unto the Lord thine 
439,m, and were come to the desert of Sinai, and had pitched in the wilderness; and there Israel camped before the mount. 
And Moses went up unto God, and the LORD called unto him out of the mountain, saying, Thus shalt thou say to the house of Jacob, and tell the children of Israel; 
Ye have seen what I did unto the Egyptians, and how I bare you on eagles' wings, and brought you unto myself. 
Now therefore, if ye will obey my voice indeed
422,eparated from thy bowels; and the one people shall be stronger than the other people; and the elder shall serve the younger. 
And when her days to be delivered were fulfilled, behold, there were twins in her womb. 
And the first came out red, all over like an hairy garment; and they called his name Esau. 
And after that came his brother out, and his hand took hold on Esau's heel; and his name was called Jacob: and Isaa
321,ves in array against Israel: and when they joined battle, Israel was smitten before the Philistines: and they slew of the army in the field about four thousand men. 
And when the people were come into the camp, the elders of Israel said, Wherefore hath the LORD smitten us to day before the Philistines? Let us fetch the 
424,in their hands, lest thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
Thou shalt tread upon the lion and adder: the young lion and the dragon shalt thou trample under feet. 
Because he hath set his love upon me, therefore will I deliver him: I will set him on high, because he hath known my name. 
He shall call upon me, and I will answer him: I will be with him in trouble; I will deliver him, and honour him. 
With long life will I sa
338, my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it. 
Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth. 
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they we
452,se are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife. 
These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes. 
These are the sons o
320,n high? even against the Holy One of Israel. 
By thy servants hast thou reproached the Lord, and hast said, By the multitude of my chariots am I come up to the height of the mountains, to the sides of Lebanon; and I will cut down the tall cedars thereof, and the choice fir trees thereof: and I will enter into the heigh
340,e LORD of hosts, and I repented not: 
So again have I thought in these days to do well unto Jerusalem and to the house of Judah: fear ye not. 
These are the things that ye shall do; Speak ye every man the truth to his neighbour; execute the judgment of truth and peace in your gates: 
And let none of you imagine evil in your hearts against
329,d Enoch walked with God: and he was not; for God took him. 
And Methuselah lived an hundred eighty and seven years, and begat Lamech. 
And Methuselah lived after he begat Lamech seven hundred eighty and two years, and begat sons and daughters: 
And all the days of Methuselah were nine hundred sixty and nine years: and he died. 
438, the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, that he take up the censers out of the burning, and scatter thou the fire yonder; for they are hallowed. 
The censers of these sinners against their own souls, let them make them broad plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered them before the LORD, therefore they are hallowed: and they shall be a sign unto the children of Israel. 
And Eleaz
328,r ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood that day that it was not of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner. 
And the king said unto his servants, Know ye not that there is a pr
338,men, and smote Shobach the captain of their host, who died there. 
And when all the kings that were servants to Hadarezer saw that they were smitten before Israel, they made peace with Israel, and served them. So the Syrians feared to help the children of Ammon any more. 
And it came to pass, after the year was expired, at the time when
395, clean in thy house shall eat of it. 
All the best of the oil, and all the best of the wine, and of the wheat, the firstfruits of them which they shall offer unto the LORD, them have I given thee. 
And whatsoever is first ripe in the land, which they shall bring unto the LORD, shall be thine; every one that is clean in thine house shall eat of it. 
Every thing devoted in Israel shall be thine
354,be exalted in the earth. 
The LORD of hosts is with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge. Selah. 
O clap your hands, all ye people; shout unto God with the voice of triumph. 
For the LORD most high is terrible; he is a great King over all the earth. 
He shall subdue the people under us, and the nations under our feet. 
He shall choose our inheritance for
323, month. 
For the priests and the Levites were purified together, all of them were pure, and killed the passover for all the children of the captivity, and for their brethren the priests, and for themselves. 
And the children of Israel, which were come again out of captivity, and all such as had separated themselves unto t
455,nt out against them, he, and all his people, to the battle at edrei. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Fear him not: for I have delivered him into thy hand, and all his people, and his land; and thou shalt do to him as thou didst unto Sihon king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon. 
So they smote him, and his sons, and all his people, until there was none left him alive: and they possessed his land. 
And the children of Israel set forward, and pitche
354,ptivity all the things that the LORD had shewed me. 
The word of the LORD also came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, thou dwellest in the midst of a rebellious house, which have eyes to see, and see not; they have ears to hear, and hear not: for they are a rebellious house. 
Therefore, thou son of man, prepare thee stuff for removing, and remove by day in
421,ice bullocks in Gilgal; yea, their altars are as heaps in the furrows of the fields. 
And Jacob fled into the country of Syria, and Israel served for a wife, and for a wife he kept sheep. 
And by a prophet the LORD brought Israel out of Egypt, and by a prophet was he preserved. 
Ephraim provoked him to anger most bitterly: therefore shall he leave his blood upon him, and his reproach shall his LORD return unto him. 
W
442,name is the LORD of hosts. 
The calamity of Moab is near to come, and his affliction hasteth fast. 
All ye that are about him, bemoan him; and all ye that know his name, say, How is the strong staff broken, and the beautiful rod! 
Thou daughter that dost inhabit Dibon, come down from thy glory, and sit in thirst; for the spoiler of Moab shall come upon thee, and he shall destroy thy strong holds. 
O inhabitant of Aroer, stand by the way, 
419,comest into thy neighbour's vineyard, then thou mayest eat grapes thy fill at thine own pleasure; but thou shalt not put any in thy vessel. 
When thou comest into the standing corn of thy neighbour, then thou mayest pluck the ears with thine hand; but thou shalt not move a sickle unto thy neighbour's standing corn. 
When a man hath taken a wife, and married her, and it come to pass that she find no favour in his eye
370,may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, This shall be an holy anointing oil unto me throughout your generations. 
Upon man's flesh shall it not be poured, neither shall ye make any other like it, after the composition of it: it is holy, and it shall be holy unto you. 
Whosoever compoundeth any like it, or
396, hand was a spear like a weaver's beam; and he went down to him with a staff, and plucked the spear out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name among the three mighties. 
Behold, he was honourable among the thirty, but attained not to the first three: and David set him over his guard. 
Also the valiant men of the 
467,If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself down from hence: 
For it is written, He shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee: 
And in their hands they shall bear thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
And Jesus answering said unto him, It is said, Thou shalt not tempt the Lord thy God. 
And when the devil had ended all the temptation, he departed from him for a season. 
And Jesus returned in the power of the Spirit into Galilee: an
411,od and drawers of water unto all the congregation; as the princes had promised them. 
And Joshua called for them, and he spake unto them, saying, Wherefore have ye beguiled us, saying, We are very far from you; when ye dwell among us? 
Now therefore ye are cursed, and there shall none of you be freed from being bondmen, and hewers of wood and drawers of water for the house of my God. 
And they answered Joshu
323,, There is yet one man, by whom we may enquire of the LORD: but I hate him; for he never prophesied good unto me, but always evil: the same is Micaiah the son of Imla. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so. 
And the king of Israel called for one of his officers, and said, Fetch quickly Micaiah the son of Imla. 
An
391,ing, 
Only thou shalt not number the tribe of Levi, neither take the sum of them among the children of Israel: 
But thou shalt appoint the Levites over the tabernacle of testimony, and over all the vessels thereof, and over all things that belong to it: they shall bear the tabernacle, and all the vessels thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle
472,r end of Job more than his beginning: for he had fourteen thousand sheep, and six thousand camels, and a thousand yoke of oxen, and a thousand she asses. 
He had also seven sons and three daughters. 
And he called the name of the first, Jemima; and the name of the second, Kezia; and the name of the third, Kerenhappuch. 
And in all the land were no women found so fair as the daughters of Job: and their father gave them inheritance among their brethren. 
After this live
413,at offering for it every morning, the sixth part of an ephah, and the third part of an hin of oil, to temper with the fine flour; a meat offering continually by a perpetual ordinance unto the LORD. 
Thus shall they prepare the lamb, and the meat offering, and the oil, every morning for a continual burnt offering. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; If the prince give a gift unto any of his sons, the inheritance thereof 
411,the congregation, and made him king over all Israel: there was none that followed the house of David, but the tribe of Judah only. 
And when Rehoboam was come to Jerusalem, he assembled all the house of Judah, with the tribe of Benjamin, an hundred and fourscore thousand chosen men, which were warriors, to fight against the house of Israel, to bring the kingdom again to Rehoboam the son of Solomon. 
But the 
355, shall be unstopped. 
Then shall the lame man leap as an hart, and the tongue of the dumb sing: for in the wilderness shall waters break out, and streams in the desert. 
And the parched ground shall become a pool, and the thirsty land springs of water: in the habitation of dragons, where each lay, shall be grass with reeds and rushes. 
And an highway sh
400,r and the mother of the damsel, and them that were with him, and entereth in where the damsel was lying. 
And he took the damsel by the hand, and said unto her, Talitha cumi; which is, being interpreted, Damsel, I say unto thee, arise. 
And straightway the damsel arose, and walked; for she was of the age of twelve years. And they were astonished with a great astonishment. 
And he charged them stra
416, thank Christ Jesus our Lord, who hath enabled me, for that he counted me faithful, putting me into the ministry; 
Who was before a blasphemer, and a persecutor, and injurious: but I obtained mercy, because I did it ignorantly in unbelief. 
And the grace of our Lord was exceeding abundant with faith and love which is in Christ Jesus. 
This is a faithful saying, and worthy of all acceptation, that Christ Jesus cam
445,ing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory: 
Receiving the end of your faith, even the salvation of your souls. 
Of which salvation the prophets have enquired and searched diligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you: 
Searching what, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which was in them did signify, whe
350,n the hand of his neighbour, and his hand shall rise up against the hand of his neighbour. 
And Judah also shall fight at Jerusalem; and the wealth of all the heathen round about shall be gathered together, gold, and silver, and apparel, in great abundance. 
And so shall be the plague of the horse, of the mule, of the camel, and of the ass, and of 
321,nts, and them that fear thy name, small and great; and shouldest destroy them which destroy the earth. 
And the temple of God was opened in heaven, and there was seen in his temple the ark of his testament: and there were lightnings, and voices, and thunderings, and an earthquake, and great hail. 
And there appeared a g
465,nd put the testimony into the ark, and set the staves on the ark, and put the mercy seat above upon the ark: 
And he brought the ark into the tabernacle, and set up the vail of the covering, and covered the ark of the testimony; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he put the table in the tent of the congregation, upon the side of the tabernacle northward, without the vail. 
And he set the bread in order upon it before the LORD; as the LORD had commanded Moses. 
A
439,to him, Timotheus and Erastus; but he himself stayed in Asia for a season. 
And the same time there arose no small stir about that way. 
For a certain man named Demetrius, a silversmith, which made silver shrines for Diana, brought no small gain unto the craftsmen; 
Whom he called together with the workmen of like occupation, and said, Sirs, ye know that by this craft we have our wealth. 
Moreover ye see and hear, that not alone at Eph
421, waters, and of every creature that creepeth upon the earth: 
To make a difference between the unclean and the clean, and between the beast that may be eaten and the beast that may not be eaten. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a woman have conceived seed, and born a man child: then she shall be unclean seven days; according to the days of the separation for her in
356, fell down there, and died in the same place: and it came to pass, that as many as came to the place where Asahel fell down and died stood still. 
Joab also and Abishai pursued after Abner: and the sun went down when they were come to the hill of Ammah, that lieth before Giah by the way of the wilderness of Gibeon. 
And the children of Benjamin gathered 
381,their lives for the name of our Lord Jesus Christ. 
We have sent therefore Judas and Silas, who shall also tell you the same things by mouth. 
For it seemed good to the Holy Ghost, and to us, to lay upon you no greater burden than these necessary things; 
That ye abstain from meats offered to idols, and from blood, and from things strangled, and from fornication: from which if y
480,captives and the spoil before the princes and all the congregation. 
And the men which were expressed by name rose up, and took the captives, and with the spoil clothed all that were naked among them, and arrayed them, and shod them, and gave them to eat and to drink, and anointed them, and carried all the feeble of them upon asses, and brought them to Jericho, the city of palm trees, to their brethren: then they returned to Samaria. 
At that time did king Ahaz send unto the 
411,se to come down for you the rain, the former rain, and the latter rain in the first month. 
And the floors shall be full of wheat, and the vats shall overflow with wine and oil. 
And I will restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten, the cankerworm, and the caterpiller, and the palmerworm, my great army which I sent among you. 
And ye shall eat in plenty, and be satisfied, and praise the name of the
340,his drink offering. 
These things ye shall do unto the LORD in your set feasts, beside your vows, and your freewill offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings. 
And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses 
336,hey pitched by Jordan, from Bethjesimoth even unto Abelshittim in the plains of Moab. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye are passed over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall drive out all the inhabitants of the la
350,eepeth his commandments dwelleth in him, and he in him. And hereby we know that he abideth in us, by the Spirit which he hath given us. 
Beloved, believe not every spirit, but try the spirits whether they are of God: because many false prophets are gone out into the world. 
Hereby know ye the Spirit of God: Every spirit that confesseth that Jesus C
404, treasures in Egypt: for he had respect unto the recompence of the reward. 
By faith he forsook Egypt, not fearing the wrath of the king: for he endured, as seeing him who is invisible. 
Through faith he kept the passover, and the sprinkling of blood, lest he that destroyed the firstborn should touch them. 
By faith they passed through the Red sea as by dry land: which the Egyptians assaying to do wer
420,, and I will consider in my dwelling place like a clear heat upon herbs, and like a cloud of dew in the heat of harvest. 
For afore the harvest, when the bud is perfect, and the sour grape is ripening in the flower, he shall both cut off the sprigs with pruning hooks, and take away and cut down the branches. 
They shall be left together unto the fowls of the mountains, and to the beasts of the earth: and the fowls sh
425,em unto me as Sodom, and the inhabitants thereof as Gomorrah. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts concerning the prophets; Behold, I will feed them with wormwood, and make them drink the water of gall: for from the prophets of Jerusalem is profaneness gone forth into all the land. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Hearken not unto the words of the prophets that prophesy unto you: they make you vain: they speak a vision o
457,e eyes of the LORD, and did worse than all that were before him. 
For he walked in all the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin, to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger with their vanities. 
Now the rest of the acts of Omri which he did, and his might that he shewed, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
So Omri slept with his fathers, and was buried in Samaria: and Aha
390,aid unto Balak, Spake I not also to thy messengers which thou sentest unto me, saying, 
If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the commandment of the LORD, to do either good or bad of mine own mind; but what the LORD saith, that will I speak? 
And now, behold, I go unto my people: come therefore, and I will advertise thee what this people shall do to
342,nd, and for their idols wherewith they had polluted it: 
And I scattered them among the heathen, and they were dispersed through the countries: according to their way and according to their doings I judged them. 
And when they entered unto the heathen, whither they went, they profaned my holy name, when they said to them, These are the peop
348, the nations whom they knew not. Thus the land was desolate after them, that no man passed through nor returned: for they laid the pleasant land desolate. 
Again the word of the LORD of hosts came to me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I was jealous for Zion with great jealousy, and I was jealous for her with great fury. 
Thus saith the LO
355,oseph brought them out from between his knees, and he bowed himself with his face to the earth. 
And Joseph took them both, Ephraim in his right hand toward Israel's left hand, and Manasseh in his left hand toward Israel's right hand, and brought them near unto him. 
And Israel stretched out his right hand, and laid it upon Ephraim's head, who was the y
326,Saul and Jonathan his son be dead? 
And the young man that told him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul leaned upon his spear; and, lo, the chariots and horsemen followed hard after him. 
And when he looked behind him, he saw me, and called unto me. And I answered, Here am I. 
And he said unto me, W
439,elf saved you out of all your adversities and your tribulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us. Now therefore present yourselves before the LORD by your tribes, and by your thousands. 
And when Samuel had caused all the tribes of Israel to come near, the tribe of Benjamin was taken. 
When he had caused the tribe of Benjamin to come near by their families, the family of Matri was taken, and Saul the son of Kish 
471,d the words of Haggai the prophet, as the LORD their God had sent him, and the people did fear before the LORD. 
Then spake Haggai the LORD's messenger in the LORD's message unto the people, saying, I am with you, saith the LORD. 
And the LORD stirred up the spirit of Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and the spirit of Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, and the spirit of all the remnant of the people; and they came and did work in the hous
478,nto me. And David sent to comfort him by the hand of his servants for his father. And David's servants came into the land of the children of Ammon. 
And the princes of the children of Ammon said unto Hanun their lord, Thinkest thou that David doth honour thy father, that he hath sent comforters unto thee? hath not David rather sent his servants unto thee, to search the city, and to spy it out, and to overthrow it? 
Wherefore Hanun took David's servants, and shaved off the o
349,ich were on the other side Jordan; 
Because the daughters of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons: and the rest of Manasseh's sons had the land of Gilead. 
And the coast of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethah, that lieth before Shechem; and the border went along on the right hand unto the inhabitants of Entappuah. 
Now Manasseh had the lan
345,n him, he is not clean; surely he is not clean. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, which was the second day of the month, that David's place was empty: and Saul said unto Jonathan his son, Wherefore cometh not the son of Jesse to meat, neither yesterday, nor to day? 
And Jonathan answered Saul, David earnestly asked leave of me to go to Bethl
327,ve the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And I will set my face against them; they shall go out from one fire, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I set my face against them. 
And I will make the land desolate, because they have committed a trespass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of t
457,lars, and purple raiment that was on the kings of Midian, and beside the chains that were about their camels' necks. 
And Gideon made an ephod thereof, and put it in his city, even in Ophrah: and all Israel went thither a whoring after it: which thing became a snare unto Gideon, and to his house. 
Thus was Midian subdued before the children of Israel, so that they lifted up their heads no more. And the country was in quietness forty years in the days of
365,ore them: and his face did shine as the sun, and his raiment was white as the light. 
And, behold, there appeared unto them Moses and Elias talking with him. 
Then answered Peter, and said unto Jesus, Lord, it is good for us to be here: if thou wilt, let us make here three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias. 
While he yet spake, behol
351,reins. 
I was a derision to all my people; and their song all the day. 
He hath filled me with bitterness, he hath made me drunken with wormwood. 
He hath also broken my teeth with gravel stones, he hath covered me with ashes. 
And thou hast removed my soul far off from peace: I forgat prosperity. 
And I said, My strength and my hope is perished fro
380,her shall the shepherds feed themselves any more; for I will deliver my flock from their mouth, that they may not be meat for them. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, will both search my sheep, and seek them out. 
As a shepherd seeketh out his flock in the day that he is among his sheep that are scattered; so will I seek out my sheep, and will deliver them out of 
363,p the tares, ye root up also the wheat with them. 
Let both grow together until the harvest: and in the time of harvest I will say to the reapers, Gather ye together first the tares, and bind them in bundles to burn them: but gather the wheat into my barn. 
Another parable put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom of heaven is like to a grain of mustard seed,
344,led his name Onan. 
And she yet again conceived, and bare a son; and called his name Shelah: and he was at Chezib, when she bare him. 
And Judah took a wife for Er his firstborn, whose name was Tamar. 
And Er, Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD slew him. 
And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wif
385,rethren far from me, and mine acquaintance are verily estranged from me. 
My kinsfolk have failed, and my familiar friends have forgotten me. 
They that dwell in mine house, and my maids, count me for a stranger: I am an alien in their sight. 
I called my servant, and he gave me no answer; I intreated him with my mouth. 
My breath is strange to my wife, though I intreated for the ch
407, hand, O LORD, is become glorious in power: thy right hand, O LORD, hath dashed in pieces the enemy. 
And in the greatness of thine excellency thou hast overthrown them that rose up against thee: thou sentest forth thy wrath, which consumed them as stubble. 
And with the blast of thy nostrils the waters were gathered together, the floods stood upright as an heap, and the depths were congealed in the hear
460,of Syria; and they smote him, and carried away a great multitude of them captives, and brought them to Damascus. And he was also delivered into the hand of the king of Israel, who smote him with a great slaughter. 
For Pekah the son of Remaliah slew in Judah an hundred and twenty thousand in one day, which were all valiant men; because they had forsaken the LORD God of their fathers. 
And Zichri, a mighty man of Ephraim, slew Maaseiah the king's son, and A
370,will lay siege against thee with a mount, and I will raise forts against thee. 
And thou shalt be brought down, and shalt speak out of the ground, and thy speech shall be low out of the dust, and thy voice shall be, as of one that hath a familiar spirit, out of the ground, and thy speech shall whisper out of the dust. 
Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be 
399,one to his brother, and every man to his neighbour: behold, I proclaim a liberty for you, saith the LORD, to the sword, to the pestilence, and to the famine; and I will make you to be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And I will give the men that have transgressed my covenant, which have not performed the words of the covenant which they had made before me, when they cut the calf in tw
456,mah the daughter of Anah. 
And these are the children of Dishon; Hemdan, and Eshban, and Ithran, and Cheran. 
The children of Ezer are these; Bilhan, and Zaavan, and Akan. 
The children of Dishan are these; Uz, and Aran. 
These are the dukes that came of the Horites; duke Lotan, duke Shobal, duke Zibeon, duke Anah, 
Duke Dishon, duke Ezer, duke Dishan: these are the dukes that came of Hori, among their dukes in the land of Seir. 
And these are the king
362,his possession. 
So these things shall be for a statute of judgment unto you throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
Whoso killeth any person, the murderer shall be put to death by the mouth of witnesses: but one witness shall not testify against any person to cause him to die. 
Moreover ye shall take no satisfaction for the life of a murderer, whi
454, stretch out his hand against the north, and destroy Assyria; and will make Nineveh a desolation, and dry like a wilderness. 
And flocks shall lie down in the midst of her, all the beasts of the nations: both the cormorant and the bittern shall lodge in the upper lintels of it; their voice shall sing in the windows; desolation shall be in the thresholds; for he shall uncover the cedar work. 
This is the rejoicing city that dwelt carelessly, that said
410,e thousand to be hewers in the mountain, and three thousand and six hundred overseers to set the people a work. 
Then Solomon began to build the house of the LORD at Jerusalem in mount Moriah, where the Lord appeared unto David his father, in the place that David had prepared in the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite. 
And he began to build in the second day of the second month, in the fourth year of his 
321, come, they say unto him, Master, we know that thou art true, and carest for no man: for thou regardest not the person of men, but teachest the way of God in truth: Is it lawful to give tribute to Caesar, or not? 
Shall we give, or shall we not give? But he, knowing their hypocrisy, said unto them, Why tempt ye me? brin
472,ll point out your border unto the entrance of Hamath; and the goings forth of the border shall be to Zedad: 
And the border shall go on to Ziphron, and the goings out of it shall be at Hazarenan: this shall be your north border. 
And ye shall point out your east border from Hazarenan to Shepham: 
And the coast shall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on the east side of Ain; and the border shall descend, and shall reach unto the side of the sea of Chinnereth eastward: 
A
381,nto Moses and unto Aaron saying, 
Cut ye not off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the Levites: 
But thus do unto them, that they may live, and not die, when they approach unto the most holy things: Aaron and his sons shall go in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden: 
But they shall not go in to see when the holy things are covered, l
436, heard the angel of the waters say, Thou art righteous, O Lord, which art, and wast, and shalt be, because thou hast judged thus. 
For they have shed the blood of saints and prophets, and thou hast given them blood to drink; for they are worthy. 
And I heard another out of the altar say, Even so, Lord God Almighty, true and righteous are thy judgments. 
And the fourth angel poured out his vial upon the sun; and power was given unto 
429,ith him that flattereth with his lips. 
Whoso curseth his father or his mother, his lamp shall be put out in obscure darkness. 
An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; but the end thereof shall not be blessed. 
Say not thou, I will recompense evil; but wait on the LORD, and he shall save thee. 
Divers weights are an abomination unto the LORD; and a false balance is not good. 
Man's goings are of the LORD; how c
452, and bowed themselves: and after came Joseph near and Rachel, and they bowed themselves. 
And he said, What meanest thou by all this drove which I met? And he said, These are to find grace in the sight of my lord. 
And Esau said, I have enough, my brother; keep that thou hast unto thyself. 
And Jacob said, Nay, I pray thee, if now I have found grace in thy sight, then receive my present at my hand: for therefore I have seen thy face, as though I ha
425,fierce winds, yet are they turned about with a very small helm, whithersoever the governor listeth. 
Even so the tongue is a little member, and boasteth great things. Behold, how great a matter a little fire kindleth! 
And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniquity: so is the tongue among our members, that it defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature; and it is set on fire of hell. 
For every kind o
424,the people of Syria shall go into captivity unto Kir, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Gaza, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they carried away captive the whole captivity, to deliver them up to Edom: 
But I will send a fire on the wall of Gaza, which shall devour the palaces thereof: 
And I will cut off the inhabitant from Ashdod, and him that holdeth th
375,, Sibraim, which is between the border of Damascus and the border of Hamath; Hazarhatticon, which is by the coast of Hauran. 
And the border from the sea shall be Hazarenan, the border of Damascus, and the north northward, and the border of Hamath. And this is the north side. 
And the east side ye shall measure from Hauran, and from Damascus, and from Gilead, and from the 
323,LORD, and give ear unto my cry; hold not thy peace at my tears: for I am a stranger with thee, and a sojourner, as all my fathers were. 
O spare me, that I may recover strength, before I go hence, and be no more. 
I waited patiently for the LORD; and he inclined unto me, and heard my cry. 
He brought me up also out of an 
421,as coming, went and met him: but Mary sat still in the house. 
Then said Martha unto Jesus, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my brother had not died. 
But I know, that even now, whatsoever thou wilt ask of God, God will give it thee. 
Jesus saith unto her, Thy brother shall rise again. 
Martha saith unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the resurrection at the last day. 
Jesus said unto her, I am the resurrection
385,Ephrathite of Zereda, Solomon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built Millo, and repaired the breaches of the city of David his father. 
And the man Jeroboam was a mighty man of valour: and Solomon seeing the young man that he was industri
357,e king and all that were present with him bowed themselves, and worshipped. 
Moreover Hezekiah the king and the princes commanded the Levites to sing praise unto the LORD with the words of David, and of Asaph the seer. And they sang praises with gladness, and they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
Then Hezekiah answered and said, Now ye have consecrated 
441,him, I spake openly to the world; I ever taught in the synagogue, and in the temple, whither the Jews always resort; and in secret have I said nothing. 
Why askest thou me? ask them which heard me, what I have said unto them: behold, they know what I said. 
And when he had thus spoken, one of the officers which stood by struck Jesus with the palm of his hand, saying, Answerest thou the high priest so? 
Jesus answered him, If I have spoke
373,lluted: then I said, I would pour out my fury upon them in the wilderness, to consume them. 
But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted before the heathen, in whose sight I brought them out. 
Yet also I lifted up my hand unto them in the wilderness, that I would not bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing with milk and honey, which 
351,lso the house of Judah have anointed me king over them. 
But Abner the son of Ner, captain of Saul's host, took Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and brought him over to Mahanaim; 
And made him king over Gilead, and over the Ashurites, and over Jezreel, and over Ephraim, and over Benjamin, and over all Israel. 
Ishbosheth Saul's son was forty years old wh
476,ngs, the silver, and the gold, and the spices, and the precious ointment, and all the house of his armour, and all that was found in his treasures: there was nothing in his house, nor in all his dominion, that Hezekiah shewed them not. 
Then came Isaiah the prophet unto king Hezekiah, and said unto him, What said these men? and from whence came they unto thee? And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country unto me, even from Babylon. 
Then said he, What have they see
381,grave? 
Why is light given to a man whose way is hid, and whom God hath hedged in? 
For my sighing cometh before I eat, and my roarings are poured out like the waters. 
For the thing which I greatly feared is come upon me, and that which I was afraid of is come unto me. 
I was not in safety, neither had I rest, neither was I quiet; yet trouble came. 
Then Eliphaz the Temanite an
445,beast that was, and is not, and yet is. 
And here is the mind which hath wisdom. The seven heads are seven mountains, on which the woman sitteth. 
And there are seven kings: five are fallen, and one is, and the other is not yet come; and when he cometh, he must continue a short space. 
And the beast that was, and is not, even he is the eighth, and is of the seven, and goeth into perdition. 
And the ten horns which thou sawest are ten kings, 
417,transgressors shall be taken in their own naughtiness. 
When a wicked man dieth, his expectation shall perish: and the hope of unjust men perisheth. 
The righteous is delivered out of trouble, and the wicked cometh in his stead. 
An hypocrite with his mouth destroyeth his neighbour: but through knowledge shall the just be delivered. 
When it goeth well with the righteous, the city rejoiceth: and when the wicked pe
415,For which cause we faint not; but though our outward man perish, yet the inward man is renewed day by day. 
For our light affliction, which is but for a moment, worketh for us a far more exceeding and eternal weight of glory; 
While we look not at the things which are seen, but at the things which are not seen: for the things which are seen are temporal; but the things which are not seen are eternal. 
For we kno
406,seth up? and when he visiteth, what shall I answer him? 
Did not he that made me in the womb make him? and did not one fashion us in the womb? 
If I have withheld the poor from their desire, or have caused the eyes of the widow to fail; 
Or have eaten my morsel myself alone, and the fatherless hath not eaten thereof; 
(For from my youth he was brought up with me, as with a father, and I have guided her 
343, he goeth out. 
So the Levites and all Judah did according to all things that Jehoiada the priest had commanded, and took every man his men that were to come in on the sabbath, with them that were to go out on the sabbath: for Jehoiada the priest dismissed not the courses. 
Moreover Jehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of hundreds s
430,ed Esau his eldest son, and said unto him, My son: and he said unto him, Behold, here am I. 
And he said, Behold now, I am old, I know not the day of my death: 
Now therefore take, I pray thee, thy weapons, thy quiver and thy bow, and go out to the field, and take me some venison; 
And make me savoury meat, such as I love, and bring it to me, that I may eat; that my soul may bless thee before I die. 
And Rebekah heard when Isa
392,Timna was concubine to Eliphaz Esau's son; and she bare to Eliphaz Amalek: these were the sons of Adah Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Reuel; Nahath, and Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah: these were the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these were the sons of Aholibamah, the daughter of Anah the daughter of Zibeon, Esau's wife: and she bare to Esau Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
These 
423,efore I abhorred them. 
But I have said unto you, Ye shall inherit their land, and I will give it unto you to possess it, a land that floweth with milk and honey: I am the LORD your God, which have separated you from other people. 
Ye shall therefore put difference between clean beasts and unclean, and between unclean fowls and clean: and ye shall not make your souls abominable by beast, or by fowl, or by any manner of 
434,I swear by myself, saith the LORD, that this house shall become a desolation. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the king's house of Judah; Thou art Gilead unto me, and the head of Lebanon: yet surely I will make thee a wilderness, and cities which are not inhabited. 
And I will prepare destroyers against thee, every one with his weapons: and they shall cut down thy choice cedars, and cast them into the fire. 
And many nations shall pa
408,he LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from Israel: because the water of separation was not sprinkled upon him, he shall be unclean; his uncleanness is yet upon him. 
This is the law, when a man dieth in a tent: all that come into the tent, and all that is in the tent, shall be unclean seven days. 
And every open vessel, which hath no covering bound upon it, is unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth one that i
475,fraid, and rose up, and went every man his way. 
And Adonijah feared because of Solomon, and arose, and went, and caught hold on the horns of the altar. 
And it was told Solomon, saying, Behold, Adonijah feareth king Solomon: for, lo, he hath caught hold on the horns of the altar, saying, Let king Solomon swear unto me today that he will not slay his servant with the sword. 
And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, there shall not an hair of him fall to th
401,e words of thy mouth. 
Do this now, my son, and deliver thyself, when thou art come into the hand of thy friend; go, humble thyself, and make sure thy friend. 
Give not sleep to thine eyes, nor slumber to thine eyelids. 
Deliver thyself as a roe from the hand of the hunter, and as a bird from the hand of the fowler. 
Go to the ant, thou sluggard; consider her ways, and be wise: 
Which having no gui
458,that the nation and kingdom which will not serve the same Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon, and that will not put their neck under the yoke of the king of Babylon, that nation will I punish, saith the LORD, with the sword, and with the famine, and with the pestilence, until I have consumed them by his hand. 
Therefore hearken not ye to your prophets, nor to your diviners, nor to your dreamers, nor to your enchanters, nor to your sorcerers, which speak 
381,e, silver and gold, which were among them:) 
Lest there should be among you man, or woman, or family, or tribe, whose heart turneth away this day from the LORD our God, to go and serve the gods of these nations; lest there should be among you a root that beareth gall and wormwood; 
And it come to pass, when he heareth the words of this curse, that he bless himself in his heart, 
374,, neither thirst any more; neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. 
For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them, and shall lead them unto living fountains of waters: and God shall wipe away all tears from their eyes. 
And when he had opened the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven about the space of half an hour. 
And I saw the seven a
469,rods which the Philistines returned for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 
And the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fenced cities, and of country villages, even unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the LORD: which stone remaineth unto this day in the field of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
An
378, herd of swine feeding. 
And all the devils besought him, saying, Send us into the swine, that we may enter into them. 
And forthwith Jesus gave them leave. And the unclean spirits went out, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the sea, (they were about two thousand;) and were choked in the sea. 
And they that fed the swine fled, and 
451,rer by the hand of the angel which appeared to him in the bush. 
He brought them out, after that he had shewed wonders and signs in the land of Egypt, and in the Red sea, and in the wilderness forty years. 
This is that Moses, which said unto the children of Israel, A prophet shall the Lord your God raise up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall ye hear. 
This is he, that was in the church in the wilderness with the angel which spake 
353,nd on the other side, which was at the porch of the gate, were two tables. 
Four tables were on this side, and four tables on that side, by the side of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew their sacrifices. 
And the four tables were of hewn stone for the burnt offering, of a cubit and an half long, and a cubit and an half broad, and one cubit h
392, his firstborn son Abdon, then Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Ner, and Nadab. 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zechariah, and Mikloth. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeam. And they also dwelt with their brethren at Jerusalem, over against their brethren. 
And Ner begat Kish; and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchishua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal. 
And the son of Jonathan was Meribbaal: and M
325, he is made whole; 
Be it known unto you all, and to all the people of Israel, that by the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth, whom ye crucified, whom God raised from the dead, even by him doth this man stand here before you whole. 
This is the stone which was set at nought of you builders, which is become the head of the cor
374,gypt and with Assyria, even a blessing in the midst of the land: 
Whom the LORD of hosts shall bless, saying, Blessed be Egypt my people, and Assyria the work of my hands, and Israel mine inheritance. 
In the year that Tartan came unto Ashdod, (when Sargon the king of Assyria sent him,) and fought against Ashdod, and took it; 
At the same time spake the LORD by Isaiah the
414,ill cease. 
And he smote them hip and thigh with a great slaughter: and he went down and dwelt in the top of the rock Etam. 
Then the Philistines went up, and pitched in Judah, and spread themselves in Lehi. 
And the men of Judah said, Why are ye come up against us? And they answered, To bind Samson are we come up, to do to him as he hath done to us. 
Then three thousand men of Judah went to the top of the rock
449,Thus I fell down before the LORD forty days and forty nights, as I fell down at the first; because the LORD had said he would destroy you. 
I prayed therefore unto the LORD, and said, O Lord GOD, destroy not thy people and thine inheritance, which thou hast redeemed through thy greatness, which thou hast brought forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand. 
Remember thy servants, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; look not unto the stubbornness of this people
363,
And how the chief priests and our rulers delivered him to be condemned to death, and have crucified him. 
But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed Israel: and beside all this, to day is the third day since these things were done. 
Yea, and certain women also of our company made us astonished, which were early at the sepulchre; 
And when th
438,come upon them, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye the word of the LORD, O house of Jacob, and all the families of the house of Israel: 
Thus saith the LORD, What iniquity have your fathers found in me, that they are gone far from me, and have walked after vanity, and are become vain? 
Neither said they, Where is the LORD that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, that led us through the wilderness, through a land of deserts and of pits, thro
344,land of Egypt, and shall be a boil breaking forth with blains upon man, and upon beast, throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And they took ashes of the furnace, and stood before Pharaoh; and Moses sprinkled it up toward heaven; and it became a boil breaking forth with blains upon man, and upon beast. 
And the magicians could not stand before Mo
364,the Christ, tell us plainly. 
Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works that I do in my Father's name, they bear witness of me. 
But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said unto you. 
My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me: 
And I give unto them eternal life; and they shall never perish, neither shall 
390,: therefore hear the word at my mouth, and give them warning from me. 
When I say unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; and thou givest him not warning, nor speakest to warn the wicked from his wicked way, to save his life; the same wicked man shall die in his iniquity; but his blood will I require at thine hand. 
Yet if thou warn the wicked, and he turn not from his wickedness, nor fr
374,ntinued on the sea shore, and abode in his breaches. 
Zebulun and Naphtali were a people that jeoparded their lives unto the death in the high places of the field. 
The kings came and fought, then fought the kings of Canaan in Taanach by the waters of Megiddo; they took no gain of money. 
They fought from heaven; the stars in their courses fought against Sisera. 
The rive
427,ds honour, both to great and small. 
And the saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did according to the word of Memucan: 
For he sent letters into all the king's provinces, into every province according to the writing thereof, and to every people after their language, that every man should bear rule in his own house, and that it should be published according to the language of every people. 
After these thin
381,to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass after this, that there arose war at Gezer with the Philistines; at which time Sibbechai the Hushathite slew Sippai, that was of the children of the giant: and they were subdued. 
And there was war again with the Philistines; and Elhanan the son of Jair slew Lahmi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, whose spear staff was like a weaver's beam. 
A
326,ickedness of your fathers, and the wickedness of the kings of Judah, and the wickedness of their wives, and your own wickedness, and the wickedness of your wives, which they have committed in the land of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem? 
They are not humbled even unto this day, neither have they feared, nor walked in 
356,pened to him which is escaped, and thou shalt speak, and be no more dumb: and thou shalt be a sign unto them; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against the Ammonites, and prophesy against them; 
And say unto the Ammonites, Hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord 
327, great name, like unto the name of the great men that are in the earth. 
Moreover I will appoint a place for my people Israel, and will plant them, that they may dwell in a place of their own, and move no more; neither shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more, as beforetime, 
And as since the time that I command
456,at never shall be quenched: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out: it is better for thee to enter into the kingdom of God with one eye, than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
For every one shall be salted with fire, and every sacrifice shall be salted with salt. 
Salt is good: but if the salt have lost his saltness, wher
369,o Korah, and all their goods. 
They, and all that appertained to them, went down alive into the pit, and the earth closed upon them: and they perished from among the congregation. 
And all Israel that were round about them fled at the cry of them: for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up also. 
And there came out a fire from the LORD, and consumed the two hundred 
449,as the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of Eliakim, 
Which was the son of Melea, which was the son of Menan, which was the son of Mattatha, which was the son of Nathan, which was the son of David,
385,een done in Sodom, it would have remained until this day. 
But I say unto you, That it shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom in the day of judgment, than for thee. 
At that time Jesus answered and said, I thank thee, O Father, Lord of heaven and earth, because thou hast hid these things from the wise and prudent, and hast revealed them unto babes. 
Even so, Father: for so it
389,e to another, and pray one for another, that ye may be healed. The effectual fervent prayer of a righteous man availeth much. 
Elias was a man subject to like passions as we are, and he prayed earnestly that it might not rain: and it rained not on the earth by the space of three years and six months. 
And he prayed again, and the heaven gave rain, and the earth brought forth her fruit. 
393, and Kenaz. 
And Timna was concubine to Eliphaz Esau's son; and she bare to Eliphaz Amalek: these were the sons of Adah Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Reuel; Nahath, and Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah: these were the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these were the sons of Aholibamah, the daughter of Anah the daughter of Zibeon, Esau's wife: and she bare to Esau Jeush, and Jaalam, an
345,s spake unto the children of Israel, that they should keep the passover. 
And they kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month at even in the wilderness of Sinai: according to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so did the children of Israel. 
And there were certain men, who were defiled by the dead body of a man, that they could
466,ith the LORD, About midnight will I go out into the midst of Egypt: 
And all the firstborn in the land of Egypt shall die, from the first born of Pharaoh that sitteth upon his throne, even unto the firstborn of the maidservant that is behind the mill; and all the firstborn of beasts. 
And there shall be a great cry throughout all the land of Egypt, such as there was none like it, nor shall be like it any more. 
But against any of the children of Israel shall not
458, an atonement for them to cleanse them. 
And after that went the Levites in to do their service in the tabernacle of the congregation before Aaron, and before his sons: as the LORD had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they unto them. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is it that belongeth unto the Levites: from twenty and five years old and upward they shall go in to wait upon the service of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
A
373,l? 
Wherefore, behold, I send unto you prophets, and wise men, and scribes: and some of them ye shall kill and crucify; and some of them shall ye scourge in your synagogues, and persecute them from city to city: 
That upon you may come all the righteous blood shed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the blood of Zacharias son of Barachias, whom ye slew 
419,derness of Sinai. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take Aaron and his sons with him, and the garments, and the anointing oil, and a bullock for the sin offering, and two rams, and a basket of unleavened bread; 
And gather thou all the congregation together unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And Moses did as the LORD commanded him; and the assembly was gathered together unto the door of the
433,ses also and Aaron, and I plagued Egypt, according to that which I did among them: and afterward I brought you out. 
And I brought your fathers out of Egypt: and ye came unto the sea; and the Egyptians pursued after your fathers with chariots and horsemen unto the Red sea. 
And when they cried unto the LORD, he put darkness between you and the Egyptians, and brought the sea upon them, and covered them; and your eyes have seen wha
363,t prolong thy days upon the earth, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, for ever. 
Then Moses severed three cities on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
That the slayer might flee thither, which should kill his neighbour unawares, and hated him not in times past; and that fleeing unto one of these cities he might live: 
Namely, Bezer in the wilderness, in t
431,run to bring his disciples word. 
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them, saying, All hail. And they came and held him by the feet, and worshipped him. 
Then said Jesus unto them, Be not afraid: go tell my brethren that they go into Galilee, and there shall they see me. 
Now when they were going, behold, some of the watch came into the city, and shewed unto the chief priests all the things that were done
358, Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the LO
427,: and every living soul died in the sea. 
And the third angel poured out his vial upon the rivers and fountains of waters; and they became blood. 
And I heard the angel of the waters say, Thou art righteous, O Lord, which art, and wast, and shalt be, because thou hast judged thus. 
For they have shed the blood of saints and prophets, and thou hast given them blood to drink; for they are worthy. 
And I heard another out of t
370,eping for her children refused to be comforted for her children, because they were not. 
Thus saith the LORD; Refrain thy voice from weeping, and thine eyes from tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy. 
And there is hope in thine end, saith the LORD, that thy children shall come again to their own bo
442,hou take a wife to her sister, to vex her, to uncover her nakedness, beside the other in her life time. 
Also thou shalt not approach unto a woman to uncover her nakedness, as long as she is put apart for her uncleanness. 
Moreover thou shalt not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife, to defile thyself with her. 
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to Molech, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am t
377,ll give strength unto his king, and exalt the horn of his anointed. 
And Elkanah went to Ramah to his house. And the child did minister unto the LORD before Eli the priest. 
Now the sons of Eli were sons of Belial; they knew not the LORD. 
And the priest's custom with the people was, that, when any man offered sacrifice, the priest's servant came, while the flesh was in seet
355,forth fruit, some thirtyfold, some sixty, and some an hundred. 
And he said unto them, Is a candle brought to be put under a bushel, or under a bed? and not to be set on a candlestick? 
For there is nothing hid, which shall not be manifested; neither was any thing kept secret, but that it should come abroad. 
If any man have ears to hear, let him hear. 
455,. 
I know, O LORD, that thy judgments are right, and that thou in faithfulness hast afflicted me. 
Let, I pray thee, thy merciful kindness be for my comfort, according to thy word unto thy servant. 
Let thy tender mercies come unto me, that I may live: for thy law is my delight. 
Let the proud be ashamed; for they dealt perversely with me without a cause: but I will meditate in thy precepts. 
Let those that fear thee turn unto me, and those that have 
433,llowed, cried, saying, Hosanna; Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord: 
Blessed be the kingdom of our father David, that cometh in the name of the Lord: Hosanna in the highest. 
And Jesus entered into Jerusalem, and into the temple: and when he had looked round about upon all things, and now the eventide was come, he went out unto Bethany with the twelve. 
And on the morrow, when they were come from Bethany, he was hu
364,the land of Judah. 
And David smote them from the twilight even unto the evening of the next day: and there escaped not a man of them, save four hundred young men, which rode upon camels, and fled. 
And David recovered all that the Amalekites had carried away: and David rescued his two wives. 
And there was nothing lacking to them, neither small nor great, neith
428,and. 
The third captain of the host for the third month was Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, a chief priest: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
This is that Benaiah, who was mighty among the thirty, and above the thirty: and in his course was Ammizabad his son. 
The fourth captain for the fourth month was Asahel the brother of Joab, and Zebadiah his son after him: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 

392,th fulfilled the request of his servant. 
So Joab arose and went to Geshur, and brought Absalom to Jerusalem. 
And the king said, Let him turn to his own house, and let him not see my face. So Absalom returned to his own house, and saw not the king's face. 
But in all Israel there was none to be so much praised as Absalom for his beauty: from the sole of his foot even to the crown of his h
413,m. 
Bless the LORD, O house of Israel: bless the LORD, O house of Aaron: 
Bless the LORD, O house of Levi: ye that fear the LORD, bless the LORD. 
Blessed be the LORD out of Zion, which dwelleth at Jerusalem. Praise ye the LORD. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks unto the God of gods: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks to the Lord of lords
360,see him: and, behold, if the plague be turned into white; then the priest shall pronounce him clean that hath the plague: he is clean. 
The flesh also, in which, even in the skin thereof, was a boil, and is healed, 
And in the place of the boil there be a white rising, or a bright spot, white, and somewhat reddish, and it be shewed to the priest; 
And if, wh
410,the voice of his servant, that walketh in darkness, and hath no light? let him trust in the name of the LORD, and stay upon his God. 
Behold, all ye that kindle a fire, that compass yourselves about with sparks: walk in the light of your fire, and in the sparks that ye have kindled. This shall ye have of mine hand; ye shall lie down in sorrow. 
Hearken to me, ye that follow after righteousness, ye that seek
405,hat diligently seek him. 
By faith Noah, being warned of God of things not seen as yet, moved with fear, prepared an ark to the saving of his house; by the which he condemned the world, and became heir of the righteousness which is by faith. 
By faith Abraham, when he was called to go out into a place which he should after receive for an inheritance, obeyed; and he went out, not knowing whither he went
402,s dead already, they brake not his legs: 
But one of the soldiers with a spear pierced his side, and forthwith came there out blood and water. 
And he that saw it bare record, and his record is true: and he knoweth that he saith true, that ye might believe. 
For these things were done, that the scripture should be fulfilled, A bone of him shall not be broken. 
And again another scripture saith, They
398,his statutes, which I command thee this day. 
And Moses charged the people the same day, saying, 
These shall stand upon mount Gerizim to bless the people, when ye are come over Jordan; Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Joseph, and Benjamin: 
And these shall stand upon mount Ebal to curse; Reuben, Gad, and Asher, and Zebulun, Dan, and Naphtali. 
And the Levites shall speak, and say 
376,of man, the things which God hath prepared for them that love him. 
But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit searcheth all things, yea, the deep things of God. 
For what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man which is in him? even so the things of God knoweth no man, but the Spirit of God. 
Now we have received, not the spirit of the
464,rom your mouth. 
For a nation is come up upon my land, strong, and without number, whose teeth are the teeth of a lion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a great lion. 
He hath laid my vine waste, and barked my fig tree: he hath made it clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white. 
Lament like a virgin girded with sackcloth for the husband of her youth. 
The meat offering and the drink offering is cut off from the house of the LORD; the prie
347, the LORD is his name; 
Call unto me, and I will answer thee, and shew thee great and mighty things, which thou knowest not. 
For thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel, concerning the houses of this city, and concerning the houses of the kings of Judah, which are thrown down by the mounts, and by the sword; 
They come to fight with the Chaldean
364,ll in you. Now if any man have not the Spirit of Christ, he is none of his. 
And if Christ be in you, the body is dead because of sin; but the Spirit is life because of righteousness. 
But if the Spirit of him that raised up Jesus from the dead dwell in you, he that raised up Christ from the dead shall also quicken your mortal bodies by his Spirit that dwelleth 
407,ts of Endor and her towns, and the inhabitants of Taanach and her towns, and the inhabitants of Megiddo and her towns, even three countries. 
Yet the children of Manasseh could not drive out the inhabitants of those cities; but the Canaanites would dwell in that land. 
Yet it came to pass, when the children of Israel were waxen strong, that they put the Canaanites to tribute, but did not utterly drive th
370,he beast, neither his image, neither had received his mark upon their foreheads, or in their hands; and they lived and reigned with Christ a thousand years. 
But the rest of the dead lived not again until the thousand years were finished. This is the first resurrection. 
Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection: on such the second death hath no 
377,ides, which strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye make clean the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within they are full of extortion and excess. 
Thou blind Pharisee, cleanse first that which is within the cup and platter, that the outside of them may be clean also. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypoc
336,fruit of the ground; and it shall burn, and shall not be quenched. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Put your burnt offerings unto your sacrifices, and eat flesh. 
For I spake not unto your fathers, nor commanded them in the day that I brought them out of the land of Egypt, concerning burnt offerings or sacrifices: 
Bu
355,, the Jews' enemy. 
And the king said unto Haman, The silver is given to thee, the people also, to do with them as it seemeth good to thee. 
Then were the king's scribes called on the thirteenth day of the first month, and there was written according to all that Haman had commanded unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors that were over every p
324,es from the south to the north shall be burned therein. 
And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word tow
459, idols, even unto this day: and shall I be enquired of by you, O house of Israel? As I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will not be enquired of by you. 
And that which cometh into your mind shall not be at all, that ye say, We will be as the heathen, as the families of the countries, to serve wood and stone. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out, will I rule over you: 
And I will bring
414,arms of flies upon thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people, and into thy houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are. 
And I will sever in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou mayest know that I am the LORD in the midst of the earth. 
And I will put a division bet
327,d, and gave him to drink. 
The rest said, Let be, let us see whether Elias will come to save him. 
Jesus, when he had cried again with a loud voice, yielded up the ghost. 
And, behold, the veil of the temple was rent in twain from the top to the bottom; and the earth did quake, and the rocks rent; 
And the graves were opened;
387,n he shall stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and shall be divided toward the four winds of heaven; and not to his posterity, nor according to his dominion which he ruled: for his kingdom shall be plucked up, even for others beside those. 
And the king of the south shall be strong, and one of his princes; and he shall be strong above him, and have dominion; his dominion shall be a
340,d not have you ignorant. 
Ye know that ye were Gentiles, carried away unto these dumb idols, even as ye were led. 
Wherefore I give you to understand, that no man speaking by the Spirit of God calleth Jesus accursed: and that no man can say that Jesus is the Lord, but by the Holy Ghost. 
Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Sp
357,had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and it came even to me: 
Upon the which when I had fastened mine eyes, I considered, and saw fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts, and creeping things, and fowls of the air. 
And I heard a voice saying unto me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat. 
But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common
434, unto the priest: 
And the priest shall go forth out of the camp; and the priest shall look, and, behold, if the plague of leprosy be healed in the leper; 
Then shall the priest command to take for him that is to be cleansed two birds alive and clean, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop: 
And the priest shall command that one of the birds be killed in an earthen vessel over running water: 
As for the living bird, he shall take
454,up toward heaven from off the altar, that the angel of the LORD ascended in the flame of the altar. And Manoah and his wife looked on it, and fell on their faces to the ground. 
But the angel of the LORD did no more appear to Manoah and to his wife. Then Manoah knew that he was an angel of the LORD. 
And Manoah said unto his wife, We shall surely die, because we have seen God. 
But his wife said unto him, If the LORD were pleased to kill us, he would
422,nd for ever. 
Be not carried about with divers and strange doctrines. For it is a good thing that the heart be established with grace; not with meats, which have not profited them that have been occupied therein. 
We have an altar, whereof they have no right to eat which serve the tabernacle. 
For the bodies of those beasts, whose blood is brought into the sanctuary by the high priest for sin, are burned without the ca
442,aking occasion by the commandment, deceived me, and by it slew me. 
Wherefore the law is holy, and the commandment holy, and just, and good. 
Was then that which is good made death unto me? God forbid. But sin, that it might appear sin, working death in me by that which is good; that sin by the commandment might become exceeding sinful. 
For we know that the law is spiritual: but I am carnal, sold under sin. 
For that which I do I allow n
355,vid said, Mephibosheth. And he answered, Behold thy servant! 
And David said unto him, Fear not: for I will surely shew thee kindness for Jonathan thy father's sake, and will restore thee all the land of Saul thy father; and thou shalt eat bread at my table continually. 
And he bowed himself, and said, What is thy servant, that thou shouldest look upon 
427,f the gospel, I said unto Peter before them all, If thou, being a Jew, livest after the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews, why compellest thou the Gentiles to live as do the Jews? 
We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles, 
Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law, but by the faith of Jesus Christ, even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be justified by the faith of
345,n any coast of Israel: so shall I escape out of his hand. 
And David arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that were with him unto Achish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath. 
And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the Carm
456,hall never be forgotten. 
But, O LORD of hosts, that triest the righteous, and seest the reins and the heart, let me see thy vengeance on them: for unto thee have I opened my cause. 
Sing unto the LORD, praise ye the LORD: for he hath delivered the soul of the poor from the hand of evildoers. 
Cursed be the day wherein I was born: let not the day wherein my mother bare me be blessed. 
Cursed be the man who brought tidings to my father, saying, A man ch
410,was the son of Menan, which was the son of Mattatha, which was the son of Nathan, which was the son of David, 
Which was the son of Jesse, which was the son of Obed, which was the son of Booz, which was the son of Salmon, which was the son of Naasson, 
Which was the son of Aminadab, which was the son of Aram, which was the son of Esrom, which was the son of Phares, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the 
428,he said, Here am I. 
And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down into Egypt; for I will there make of thee a great nation: 
I will go down with thee into Egypt; and I will also surely bring thee up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes. 
And Jacob rose up from Beersheba: and the sons of Israel carried Jacob their father, and their little ones, and their wives, in the wagons which Pharaoh 
424,s, and brake, and gave to his disciples to set before them; and they did set them before the people. 
And they had a few small fishes: and he blessed, and commanded to set them also before them. 
So they did eat, and were filled: and they took up of the broken meat that was left seven baskets. 
And they that had eaten were about four thousand: and he sent them away. 
And straightway he entered into a ship with his discip
415, 
And now shall mine head be lifted up above mine enemies round about me: therefore will I offer in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy; I will sing, yea, I will sing praises unto the LORD. 
Hear, O LORD, when I cry with my voice: have mercy also upon me, and answer me. 
When thou saidst, Seek ye my face; my heart said unto thee, Thy face, LORD, will I seek. 
Hide not thy face far from me; put not thy servant away 
459,d day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the mother of Jesus was there: 
And both Jesus was called, and his disciples, to the marriage. 
And when they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him, They have no wine. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine hour is not yet come. 
His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it. 
And there were set there six waterpots of stone, after the manner of 
439,aul also among the prophets? 
And one of the same place answered and said, But who is their father? Therefore it became a proverb, Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And when he had made an end of prophesying, he came to the high place. 
And Saul's uncle said unto him and to his servant, Whither went ye? And he said, To seek the asses: and when we saw that they were no where, we came to Samuel. 
And Saul's uncle said, Tell me, I pray th
347,l: my reins also instruct me in the night seasons. 
I have set the LORD always before me: because he is at my right hand, I shall not be moved. 
Therefore my heart is glad, and my glory rejoiceth: my flesh also shall rest in hope. 
For thou wilt not leave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou wilt shew
435,es, which thing I hate. 
Repent; or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will fight against them with the sword of my mouth. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the hidden manna, and will give him a white stone, and in the stone a new name written, which no man knoweth saving he that receiveth it. 
And unto the angel of the church in Thyatira wr
377, hope in God, and not forget the works of God, but keep his commandments: 
And might not be as their fathers, a stubborn and rebellious generation; a generation that set not their heart aright, and whose spirit was not stedfast with God. 
The children of Ephraim, being armed, and carrying bows, turned back in the day of battle. 
They kept not the covenant of God, and refused
360,sper. 
And it came to pass after these things, that the butler of the king of Egypt and his baker had offended their lord the king of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh was wroth against two of his officers, against the chief of the butlers, and against the chief of the bakers. 
And he put them in ward in the house of the captain of the guard, into the prison, the place wh
465,ean. 
This is the law for all manner of plague of leprosy, and scall, 
And for the leprosy of a garment, and of a house, 
And for a rising, and for a scab, and for a bright spot: 
To teach when it is unclean, and when it is clean: this is the law of leprosy. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and to Aaron, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When any man hath a running issue out of his flesh, because of his issue he is unclean. 
And this 
386,hey have sinned against thee; and shall return and confess thy name, and pray and make supplication before thee in this house; 
Then hear thou from the heavens, and forgive the sin of thy people Israel, and bring them again unto the land which thou gavest to them and to their fathers. 
When the heaven is shut up, and there is no rain, because they have sinned against thee; yet if the
373,ng lion roaring on his prey, when a multitude of shepherds is called forth against him, he will not be afraid of their voice, nor abase himself for the noise of them: so shall the LORD of hosts come down to fight for mount Zion, and for the hill thereof. 
As birds flying, so will the LORD of hosts defend Jerusalem; defending also he will deliver it; and passing over he w
350,d they went out, they and all their hosts with them, much people, even as the sand that is upon the sea shore in multitude, with horses and chariots very many. 
And when all these kings were met together, they came and pitched together at the waters of Merom, to fight against Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Be not afraid because of them: fo
374,suburbs, and Eshtemoa with her suburbs, 
And Holon with her suburbs, and Debir with her suburbs, 
And Ain with her suburbs, and Juttah with her suburbs, and Bethshemesh with her suburbs; nine cities out of those two tribes. 
And out of the tribe of Benjamin, Gibeon with her suburbs, Geba with her suburbs, 
Anathoth with her suburbs, and Almon with her suburbs; four cities
337,e woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee over the wall. 
Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab. And he blew a trumpet, and they retired from the city, every man to his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king
385,ode in the mount that is called the mount of Olives. 
And all the people came early in the morning to him in the temple, for to hear him. 
Now the feast of unleavened bread drew nigh, which is called the Passover. 
And the chief priests and scribes sought how they might kill him; for they feared the people. 
Then entered Satan into Judas surnamed Iscariot, being of the number of the
452, perfect knowledge of that way, he deferred them, and said, When Lysias the chief captain shall come down, I will know the uttermost of your matter. 
And he commanded a centurion to keep Paul, and to let him have liberty, and that he should forbid none of his acquaintance to minister or come unto him. 
And after certain days, when Felix came with his wife Drusilla, which was a Jewess, he sent for Paul, and heard him concerning the faith in Christ. 
366, to Bashan: and Og the king of Bashan came out against us, he and all his people, to battle at Edrei. 
And the LORD said unto me, Fear him not: for I will deliver him, and all his people, and his land, into thy hand; and thou shalt do unto him as thou didst unto Sihon king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon. 
So the LORD our God delivered into our hands Og al
479,ed into our palaces, to cut off the children from without, and the young men from the streets. 
Speak, Thus saith the LORD, Even the carcases of men shall fall as dung upon the open field, and as the handful after the harvestman, and none shall gather them. 
Thus saith the LORD, Let not the wise man glory in his wisdom, neither let the mighty man glory in his might, let not the rich man glory in his riches: 
But let him that glorieth glory in this, that he understandeth and 
468,n, which pertained to Ishbosheth the son of Saul, and twelve of the servants of David. 
And they caught every one his fellow by the head, and thrust his sword in his fellow's side; so they fell down together: wherefore that place was called Helkathhazzurim, which is in Gibeon. 
And there was a very sore battle that day; and Abner was beaten, and the men of Israel, before the servants of David. 
And there were three sons of Zeruiah there, Joab, and Abishai, and Asa
384, thee, that thou mayest be feared. 
I wait for the LORD, my soul doth wait, and in his word do I hope. 
My soul waiteth for the Lord more than they that watch for the morning: I say, more than they that watch for the morning. 
Let Israel hope in the LORD: for with the LORD there is mercy, and with him is plenteous redemption. 
And he shall redeem Israel from all his iniquities. 
Lo
473,didst cleave the earth with rivers. 
The mountains saw thee, and they trembled: the overflowing of the water passed by: the deep uttered his voice, and lifted up his hands on high. 
The sun and moon stood still in their habitation: at the light of thine arrows they went, and at the shining of thy glittering spear. 
Thou didst march through the land in indignation, thou didst thresh the heathen in anger. 
Thou wentest forth for the salvation of thy people, even for salv
354,And Pharaoh's daughter said unto her, Take this child away, and nurse it for me, and I will give thee thy wages. And the women took the child, and nursed it. 
And the child grew, and she brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter, and he became her son. And she called his name Moses: and she said, Because I drew him out of the water. 
And it came to pass in t
346,trength, that I should hope? and what is mine end, that I should prolong my life? 
Is my strength the strength of stones? or is my flesh of brass? 
Is not my help in me? and is wisdom driven quite from me? 
To him that is afflicted pity should be shewed from his friend; but he forsaketh the fear of the Almighty. 
My brethren have dealt deceitfu
367,ll be great tribulation, such as was not since the beginning of the world to this time, no, nor ever shall be. 
And except those days should be shortened, there should no flesh be saved: but for the elect's sake those days shall be shortened. 
Then if any man shall say unto you, Lo, here is Christ, or there; believe it not. 
For there shall arise false Christs, and
396,d his ways, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah. 
He was five and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. 
And Jotham slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the city of David: and Ahaz his son reigned in his stead. 
Ahaz was twenty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem: but he d
430,e that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his she
324,ed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto 
406,and Judah shall not vex Ephraim. 
But they shall fly upon the shoulders of the Philistines toward the west; they shall spoil them of the east together: they shall lay their hand upon Edom and Moab; and the children of Ammon shall obey them. 
And the LORD shall utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian sea; and with his mighty wind shall he shake his hand over the river, and shall smite it in the seven 
385,lace. 
Also now, behold, my witness is in heaven, and my record is on high. 
My friends scorn me: but mine eye poureth out tears unto God. 
O that one might plead for a man with God, as a man pleadeth for his neighbour! 
When a few years are come, then I shall go the way whence I shall not return. 
My breath is corrupt, my days are extinct, the graves are ready for me. 
Are there no
442,that seek after my soul to destroy it; let them be driven backward and put to shame that wish me evil. 
Let them be desolate for a reward of their shame that say unto me, Aha, aha. 
Let all those that seek thee rejoice and be glad in thee: let such as love thy salvation say continually, The LORD be magnified. 
But I am poor and needy; yet the Lord thinketh upon me: thou art my help and my deliverer; make no tarrying, O my God. 
Blessed is
468,of our Lord Jesus Christ; 
Submitting yourselves one to another in the fear of God. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as unto the Lord. 
For the husband is the head of the wife, even as Christ is the head of the church: and he is the saviour of the body. 
Therefore as the church is subject unto Christ, so let the wives be to their own husbands in every thing. 
Husbands, love your wives, even as Christ also loved the church, and gave himself for it;
377, shalt thou bear it upon thy shoulders, and carry it forth in the twilight: thou shalt cover thy face, that thou see not the ground: for I have set thee for a sign unto the house of Israel. 
And I did so as I was commanded: I brought forth my stuff by day, as stuff for captivity, and in the even I digged through the wall with mine hand; I brought it forth in the twilight, an
398,e of his voice, and the sound that goeth out of his mouth. 
He directeth it under the whole heaven, and his lightning unto the ends of the earth. 
After it a voice roareth: he thundereth with the voice of his excellency; and he will not stay them when his voice is heard. 
God thundereth marvellously with his voice; great things doeth he, which we cannot comprehend. 
For he saith to the snow, Be 
459,cy. 
He will not always chide: neither will he keep his anger for ever. 
He hath not dealt with us after our sins; nor rewarded us according to our iniquities. 
For as the heaven is high above the earth, so great is his mercy toward them that fear him. 
As far as the east is from the west, so far hath he removed our transgressions from us. 
Like as a father pitieth his children, so the LORD pitieth them that fear him. 
For he knoweth our frame; he remembe
371,the beasts of the forest do creep forth. 
The young lions roar after their prey, and seek their meat from God. 
The sun ariseth, they gather themselves together, and lay them down in their dens. 
Man goeth forth unto his work and to his labour until the evening. 
O LORD, how manifold are thy works! in wisdom hast thou made them all: the earth is full of thy riches. 
So
440,ll of them: they shall go to confusion together that are makers of idols. 
But Israel shall be saved in the LORD with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be ashamed nor confounded world without end. 
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there is none else. 
I have not spoken i
339,livered them out of the hand of those that spoiled them. 
And yet they would not hearken unto their judges, but they went a whoring after other gods, and bowed themselves unto them: they turned quickly out of the way which their fathers walked in, obeying the commandments of the LORD; but they did not so. 
And when the LORD raised them u
453,f Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell in the mountains are gathered together against us. 
So Joshua ascended from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valour. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear them not: for I have delivered them into thine hand; there shall not 
388, even of the tabernacle of testimony, as it was counted, according to the commandment of Moses, for the service of the Levites, by the hand of Ithamar, son to Aaron the priest. 
And Bezaleel the son Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah, made all that the LORD commanded Moses. 
And with him was Aholiab, son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan, an engraver, and a cunning workman, and
456, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these, seeing I have lost my children, and am desolate, a captive, and removing to and fro? and who hath brought up these? Behold, I was left alone; these, where had they been? 
T
372,e substance of his house. 
But whoso committeth adultery with a woman lacketh understanding: he that doeth it destroyeth his own soul. 
A wound and dishonour shall he get; and his reproach shall not be wiped away. 
For jealousy is the rage of a man: therefore he will not spare in the day of vengeance. 
He will not regard any ransom; neither will he rest content, though 
351,so. 
And the LORD was very angry with Aaron to have destroyed him: and I prayed for Aaron also the same time. 
And I took your sin, the calf which ye had made, and burnt it with fire, and stamped it, and ground it very small, even until it was as small as dust: and I cast the dust thereof into the brook that descended out of the mount. 
And at Taber
424,ing that may abide the fire, ye shall make it go through the fire, and it shall be clean: nevertheless it shall be purified with the water of separation: and all that abideth not the fire ye shall make go through the water. 
And ye shall wash your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall be clean, and afterward ye shall come into the camp. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the sum of the prey that was taken, 
475,bour as thyself. There is none other commandment greater than these. 
And the scribe said unto him, Well, Master, thou hast said the truth: for there is one God; and there is none other but he: 
And to love him with all the heart, and with all the understanding, and with all the soul, and with all the strength, and to love his neighbour as himself, is more than all whole burnt offerings and sacrifices. 
And when Jesus saw that he answered discreetly, he said unto him, Th
460,d unto him, Hearken not unto him, nor consent. 
Wherefore he said unto the messengers of Benhadad, Tell my lord the king, All that thou didst send for to thy servant at the first I will do: but this thing I may not do. And the messengers departed, and brought him word again. 
And Benhadad sent unto him, and said, The gods do so unto me, and more also, if the dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for all the people that follow me. 
And the king of Isra
377,h the LORD; and I will bring you again into the place whence I caused you to be carried away captive. 
Because ye have said, The LORD hath raised us up prophets in Babylon; 
Know that thus saith the LORD of the king that sitteth upon the throne of David, and of all the people that dwelleth in this city, and of your brethren that are not gone forth with you into captivity; 
T
448, worshipped the LORD. 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of my master Abraham, who hath not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the way, the LORD led me to the house of my master's brethren. 
And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these things. 
And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out unto the man, unto the well. 
And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracel
360,altiel, governor of Judah, and to Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, and to the residue of the people, saying, 
Who is left among you that saw this house in her first glory? and how do ye see it now? is it not in your eyes in comparison of it as nothing? 
Yet now be strong, O Zerubbabel, saith the LORD; and be strong, O Joshua, son of Josedech, the
368,by great waters the seed of Sihor, the harvest of the river, is her revenue; and she is a mart of nations. 
Be thou ashamed, O Zidon: for the sea hath spoken, even the strength of the sea, saying, I travail not, nor bring forth children, neither do I nourish up young men, nor bring up virgins. 
As at the report concerning Egypt, so shall they be sorely pained at the
472,ok no heed to the sword that was in Joab's hand: so he smote him therewith in the fifth rib, and shed out his bowels to the ground, and struck him not again; and he died. So Joab and Abishai his brother pursued after Sheba the son of Bichri. 
And one of Joab's men stood by him, and said, He that favoureth Joab, and he that is for David, let him go after Joab. 
And Amasa wallowed in blood in the midst of the highway. And when the man saw that all the people stood still
460,hould be tormented five months: and their torment was as the torment of a scorpion, when he striketh a man. 
And in those days shall men seek death, and shall not find it; and shall desire to die, and death shall flee from them. 
And the shapes of the locusts were like unto horses prepared unto battle; and on their heads were as it were crowns like gold, and their faces were as the faces of men. 
And they had hair as the hair of women, and their teeth were
383,dventure it was an oversight: 
Take also your brother, and arise, go again unto the man: 
And God Almighty give you mercy before the man, that he may send away your other brother, and Benjamin. If I be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved. 
And the men took that present, and they took double money in their hand and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood before 
425,f all things which he did both in the land of the Jews, and in Jerusalem; whom they slew and hanged on a tree: 
Him God raised up the third day, and shewed him openly; 
Not to all the people, but unto witnesses chosen before God, even to us, who did eat and drink with him after he rose from the dead. 
And he commanded us to preach unto the people, and to testify that it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of q
404, other field. 
So she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz to glean unto the end of barley harvest and of wheat harvest; and dwelt with her mother in law. 
Then Naomi her mother in law said unto her, My daughter, shall I not seek rest for thee, that it may be well with thee? 
And now is not Boaz of our kindred, with whose maidens thou wast? Behold, he winnoweth barley to night in the threshingfloor. 
Wash
455,ly begotten son, 
Of whom it was said, That in Isaac shall thy seed be called: 
Accounting that God was able to raise him up, even from the dead; from whence also he received him in a figure. 
By faith Isaac blessed Jacob and Esau concerning things to come. 
By faith Jacob, when he was a dying, blessed both the sons of Joseph; and worshipped, leaning upon the top of his staff. 
By faith Joseph, when he died, made mention of the departing of the childr
396,et brake. 
And they beckoned unto their partners, which were in the other ship, that they should come and help them. And they came, and filled both the ships, so that they began to sink. 
When Simon Peter saw it, he fell down at Jesus' knees, saying, Depart from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord. 
For he was astonished, and all that were with him, at the draught of the fishes which they had ta
464,he skin, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin; it is a plague of leprosy, and shall be shewed unto the priest: 
And the priest shall look upon the plague, and shut up it that hath the plague seven days: 
And he shall look on the plague on the seventh day: if the plague be spread in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in a skin, or in any work that is made of skin; the plague is a fretting leprosy; it is unclean. 
He shall
444, Moab: and Eglon was a very fat man. 
And when he had made an end to offer the present, he sent away the people that bare the present. 
But he himself turned again from the quarries that were by Gilgal, and said, I have a secret errand unto thee, O king: who said, Keep silence. And all that stood by him went out from him. 
And Ehud came unto him; and he was sitting in a summer parlour, which he had for himself alone. And Ehud said, I have a
424,ebanon. 
He maketh them also to skip like a calf; Lebanon and Sirion like a young unicorn. 
The voice of the LORD divideth the flames of fire. 
The voice of the LORD shaketh the wilderness; the LORD shaketh the wilderness of Kadesh. 
The voice of the LORD maketh the hinds to calve, and discovereth the forests: and in his temple doth every one speak of his glory. 
The LORD sitteth upon the flood; yea, the LORD sitteth Kin
375,nd forsook not the ordinance of their God: they ask of me the ordinances of justice; they take delight in approaching to God. 
Wherefore have we fasted, say they, and thou seest not? wherefore have we afflicted our soul, and thou takest no knowledge? Behold, in the day of your fast ye find pleasure, and exact all your labours. 
Behold, ye fast for strife and debate, and to
434,fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the midst of thee they commit lewdness. 
In thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee have they humbled her that was set apart for pollution. 
And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife; and another hath lewdly
370,be, which they have received to hold, as the washing of cups, and pots, brasen vessels, and of tables. 
Then the Pharisees and scribes asked him, Why walk not thy disciples according to the tradition of the elders, but eat bread with unwashen hands? 
He answered and said unto them, Well hath Esaias prophesied of you hypocrites, as it is written, This people honoureth 
426,ses sold them, and brought the prices of the things that were sold, 
And laid them down at the apostles' feet: and distribution was made unto every man according as he had need. 
And Joses, who by the apostles was surnamed Barnabas, (which is, being interpreted, The son of consolation,) a Levite, and of the country of Cyprus, 
Having land, sold it, and brought the money, and laid it at the apostles' feet. 
But a certain ma
326, I will now put forth a riddle unto you: if ye can certainly declare it me within the seven days of the feast, and find it out, then I will give you thirty sheets and thirty change of garments: 
But if ye cannot declare it me, then shall ye give me thirty sheets and thirty change of garments. And they said unto him, Put fort
348,d a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the world, and a ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes: 
Who also hath gone about to profane the temple: whom we took, and would have judged according to our law. 
But the chief captain Lysias came upon us, and with great violence took him away out of our hands, 
Commanding his accusers to com
373,ossess that which Chemosh thy god giveth thee to possess? So whomsoever the LORD our God shall drive out from before us, them will we possess. 
And now art thou any thing better than Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab? did he ever strive against Israel, or did he ever fight against them, 
While Israel dwelt in Heshbon and her towns, and in Aroer and her towns, and in 
469,ut the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh, at even, or at midnight, or at the cockcrowing, or in the morning: 
Lest coming suddenly he find you sleeping. 
And what I say unto you I say u
326,t not see him, yet judgment is before him; therefore trust thou in him. 
But now, because it is not so, he hath visited in his anger; yet he knoweth it not in great extremity: 
Therefore doth Job open his mouth in vain; he multiplieth words without knowledge. 
Elihu also proceeded, and said, 
Suffer me a little, and I will s
350,h days reasoned with them out of the scriptures, 
Opening and alleging, that Christ must needs have suffered, and risen again from the dead; and that this Jesus, whom I preach unto you, is Christ. 
And some of them believed, and consorted with Paul and Silas; and of the devout Greeks a great multitude, and of the chief women not a few. 
But the Jew
345,taken, every one of their bows is broken: for the LORD God of recompences shall surely requite. 
And I will make drunk her princes, and her wise men, her captains, and her rulers, and her mighty men: and they shall sleep a perpetual sleep, and not wake, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; The broad w
470,ittle moment, until the indignation be overpast. 
For, behold, the LORD cometh out of his place to punish the inhabitants of the earth for their iniquity: the earth also shall disclose her blood, and shall no more cover her slain. 
In that day the LORD with his sore and great and strong sword shall punish leviathan the piercing serpent, even leviathan that crooked serpent; and he shall slay the dragon that is in the sea. 
In that day sing ye unto her, A vineyard of 
392,, and said unto the king, Know, O king, that the law of the Medes and Persians is, That no decree nor statute which the king establisheth may be changed. 
Then the king commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he will deliver thee. 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth
409, the inhabitants of the land shall hear of it, and shall environ us round, and cut off our name from the earth: and what wilt thou do unto thy great name? 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Get thee up; wherefore liest thou thus upon thy face? 
Israel hath sinned, and they have also transgressed my covenant which I commanded them: for they have even taken of the accursed thing, and have also stolen, and disse
461,hat bend the bow, camp against it round about; let none thereof escape: recompense her according to her work; according to all that she hath done, do unto her: for she hath been proud against the LORD, against the Holy One of Israel. 
Therefore shall her young men fall in the streets, and all her men of war shall be cut off in that day, saith the LORD. 
Behold, I am against thee, O thou most proud, saith the Lord GOD of hosts: for thy day is come, the time 
473,nty cubits which were for the inner court, and over against the pavement which was for the utter court, was gallery against gallery in three stories. 
And before the chambers was a walk to ten cubits breadth inward, a way of one cubit; and their doors toward the north. 
Now the upper chambers were shorter: for the galleries were higher than these, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the building. 
For they were in three stories, but had not pillars as the pillar
436,RD which he commanded Joshua. 
And Joshua burnt Ai, and made it an heap for ever, even a desolation unto this day. 
And the king of Ai he hanged on a tree until eventide: and as soon as the sun was down, Joshua commanded that they should take his carcase down from the tree, and cast it at the entering of the gate of the city, and raise thereon a great heap of stones, that remaineth unto this day. 
Then Joshua built an altar unto the
347,f vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits worthy of repentance, and begin not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, That God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: every tree there
427,h these witness against thee? 
But Jesus held his peace, And the high priest answered and said unto him, I adjure thee by the living God, that thou tell us whether thou be the Christ, the Son of God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thou hast said: nevertheless I say unto you, Hereafter shall ye see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, H
334,ass through unto thee: thou shalt be drunken, and shalt make thyself naked. 
The punishment of thine iniquity is accomplished, O daughter of Zion; he will no more carry thee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold 
407,alms unto him: talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice that seek the LORD. 
Seek the LORD, and his strength: seek his face evermore. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done; his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Abraham his servant, ye children of Jacob his chosen. 
He is the LORD our God: his judgments are in all the eart
350,called. 
And thou, my lord, O king, the eyes of all Israel are upon thee, that thou shouldest tell them who shall sit on the throne of my lord the king after him. 
Otherwise it shall come to pass, when my lord the king shall sleep with his fathers, that I and my son Solomon shall be counted offenders. 
And, lo, while she yet talked with the king, N
370,h. 
And there came a certain poor widow, and she threw in two mites, which make a farthing. 
And he called unto him his disciples, and saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That this poor widow hath cast more in, than all they which have cast into the treasury: 
For all they did cast in of their abundance; but she of her want did cast in all that she had, even all h
455,be of thee, and kings shall come out of thy loins; 
And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee will I give the land. 
And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him. 
And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he talked with him, even a pillar of stone: and he poured a drink offering thereon, and he poured oil thereon. 
And Jacob called the name of the place where God spake with hi
390,D are riches, and honour, and life. 
Thorns and snares are in the way of the froward: he that doth keep his soul shall be far from them. 
Train up a child in the way he should go: and when he is old, he will not depart from it. 
The rich ruleth over the poor, and the borrower is servant to the lender. 
He that soweth iniquity shall reap vanity: and the rod of his anger shall fail. 
He th
346,e son of Zerah, the son of Adaiah, 
The son of Ethan, the son of Zimmah, the son of Shimei, 
The son of Jahath, the son of Gershom, the son of Levi. 
And their brethren the sons of Merari stood on the left hand: Ethan the son of Kishi, the son of Abdi, the son of Malluch, 
The son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah, 
The son o
409,s spake unto the children of Israel, and every one of their princes gave him a rod apiece, for each prince one, according to their fathers' houses, even twelve rods: and the rod of Aaron was among their rods. 
And Moses laid up the rods before the LORD in the tabernacle of witness. 
And it came to pass, that on the morrow Moses went into the tabernacle of witness; and, behold, the rod of Aaron for the hous
397,roth with the priests, the leprosy even rose up in his forehead before the priests in the house of the LORD, from beside the incense altar. 
And Azariah the chief priest, and all the priests, looked upon him, and, behold, he was leprous in his forehead, and they thrust him out from thence; yea, himself hasted also to go out, because the LORD had smitten him. 
And Uzziah the king was a leper unt
349,ations that the house of Israel committeth here, that I should go far off from my sanctuary? but turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations. 
And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold a hole in the wall. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and when I had digged in the wall, behold a
355,ypt, in the first day of the fifth month. 
And Aaron was an hundred and twenty and three years old when he died in mount Hor. 
And king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south in the land of Canaan, heard of the coming of the children of Israel. 
And they departed from mount Hor, and pitched in Zalmonah. 
And they departed from Zalmonah, and pitche
397,is broken down: howl and cry; tell ye it in Arnon, that Moab is spoiled, 
And judgment is come upon the plain country; upon Holon, and upon Jahazah, and upon Mephaath, 
And upon Dibon, and upon Nebo, and upon Bethdiblathaim, 
And upon Kiriathaim, and upon Bethgamul, and upon Bethmeon, 
And upon Kerioth, and upon Bozrah, and upon all the cities of the land of Moab, far or near. 
The horn of Moab
444, believed? and how shall they believe in him of whom they have not heard? and how shall they hear without a preacher? 
And how shall they preach, except they be sent? as it is written, How beautiful are the feet of them that preach the gospel of peace, and bring glad tidings of good things! 
But they have not all obeyed the gospel. For Esaias saith, Lord, who hath believed our report? 
So then faith cometh by hearing, and hearing by the wor
413, them at all in the time of their trouble. 
For according to the number of thy cities were thy gods, O Judah; and according to the number of the streets of Jerusalem have ye set up altars to that shameful thing, even altars to burn incense unto Baal. 
Therefore pray not thou for this people, neither lift up a cry or prayer for them: for I will not hear them in the time that they cry unto me for their trouble. 
437,ion: 
That every one of you should know how to possess his vessel in sanctification and honour; 
Not in the lust of concupiscence, even as the Gentiles which know not God: 
That no man go beyond and defraud his brother in any matter: because that the Lord is the avenger of all such, as we also have forewarned you and testified. 
For God hath not called us unto uncleanness, but unto holiness. 
He therefore that despiseth, despiseth no
404, wherein they should go. 
Thou gavest also thy good spirit to instruct them, and withheldest not thy manna from their mouth, and gavest them water for their thirst. 
Yea, forty years didst thou sustain them in the wilderness, so that they lacked nothing; their clothes waxed not old, and their feet swelled not. 
Moreover thou gavest them kingdoms and nations, and didst divide them into corners: so they
392,ld, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves wil
373,ot washed from their filthiness. 
There is a generation, O how lofty are their eyes! and their eyelids are lifted up. 
There is a generation, whose teeth are as swords, and their jaw teeth as knives, to devour the poor from off the earth, and the needy from among men. 
The horseleach hath two daughters, crying, Give, give. There are three things that are never satisfied,
349,ollow of Jacob's thigh was out of joint, as he wrestled with him. 
And he said, Let me go, for the day breaketh. And he said, I will not let thee go, except thou bless me. 
And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob. 
And he said, Thy name shall be called no more Jacob, but Israel: for as a prince hast thou power with God and with 
359, unto the house of the LORD: the altar of gold, and the table of gold, whereupon the shewbread was, 
And the candlesticks of pure gold, five on the right side, and five on the left, before the oracle, with the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs of gold, 
And the bowls, and the snuffers, and the basons, and the spoons, and the censers of pure gold; and th
359,ls which kept not their first estate, but left their own habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains under darkness unto the judgment of the great day. 
Even as Sodom and Gomorrha, and the cities about them in like manner, giving themselves over to fornication, and going after strange flesh, are set forth for an example, suffering the vengeance of et
367,shall be unto them for an inheritance: I am their inheritance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am their possession. 
They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be theirs. 
And the first of all the firstfruits of all things, and every oblation of all, of every sort of
404,other Philip's wife. 
For John said unto him, It is not lawful for thee to have her. 
And when he would have put him to death, he feared the multitude, because they counted him as a prophet. 
But when Herod's birthday was kept, the daughter of Herodias danced before them, and pleased Herod. 
Whereupon he promised with an oath to give her whatsoever she would ask. 
And she, being before instructed of h
441,hy flesh. 
And moreover in time past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israel: and the LORD thy God said unto thee, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler over my people Israel. 
Therefore came all the elders of Israel to the king to Hebron; and David made a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and they anointed David king over Israel, according to the word of the LORD b
336,t no man come in with the king unto the banquet that she had prepared but myself; and to morrow am I invited unto her also with the king. 
Yet all this availeth me nothing, so long as I see Mordecai the Jew sitting at the king's gate. 
Then said Zeresh his wife and all his friends unto him, Let a gallows be made of fifty cubits high, 
405,teries, fornications, thefts, false witness, blasphemies: 
These are the things which defile a man: but to eat with unwashen hands defileth not a man. 
Then Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon. 
And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil. 

438,that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off fr
480,m, These are the words which I spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me. 
Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures, 
And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name amo
434,man whom thou gavest to be with me, she gave me of the tree, and I did eat. 
And the LORD God said unto the woman, What is this that thou hast done? And the woman said, The serpent beguiled me, and I did eat. 
And the LORD God said unto the serpent, Because thou hast done this, thou art cursed above all cattle, and above every beast of the field; upon thy belly shalt thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of thy life: 
And 
473,carry away silver and gold, to take away cattle and goods, to take a great spoil? 
Therefore, son of man, prophesy and say unto Gog, Thus saith the Lord GOD; In that day when my people of Israel dwelleth safely, shalt thou not know it? 
And thou shalt come from thy place out of the north parts, thou, and many people with thee, all of them riding upon horses, a great company, and a mighty army: 
And thou shalt come up against my people of Israel, as a cloud to cover the
331,rs of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by the mounting up of Luhith with weeping shall they go it up; for in the way of Horonaim they shall raise up a cry of destruction. 
For the waters of Nimrim shall 
402,s, them will I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem. 
And if it be meet that I go also, they shall go with me. 
Now I will come unto you, when I shall pass through Macedonia: for I do pass through Macedonia. 
And it may be that I will abide, yea, and winter with you, that ye may bring me on my journey whithersoever I go. 
For I will not see you now by the way; but I trust to tarry a while wi
446,k, and hid in three measures of meal, till the whole was leavened. 
All these things spake Jesus unto the multitude in parables; and without a parable spake he not unto them: 
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, saying, I will open my mouth in parables; I will utter things which have been kept secret from the foundation of the world. 
Then Jesus sent the multitude away, and went into the house: and his disciples came u
424, first. 
And my temptation which was in my flesh ye despised not, nor rejected; but received me as an angel of God, even as Christ Jesus. 
Where is then the blessedness ye spake of? for I bear you record, that, if it had been possible, ye would have plucked out your own eyes, and have given them to me. 
Am I therefore become your enemy, because I tell you the truth? 
They zealously affect you, but not well; yea, they wou
438, seethe a kid in his mother's milk. 
Thou shalt truly tithe all the increase of thy seed, that the field bringeth forth year by year. 
And thou shalt eat before the LORD thy God, in the place which he shall choose to place his name there, the tithe of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil, and the firstlings of thy herds and of thy flocks; that thou mayest learn to fear the LORD thy God always. 
And if the way be too long for thee, 
357, iniquities, like the wind, have taken us away. 
And there is none that calleth upon thy name, that stirreth up himself to take hold of thee: for thou hast hid thy face from us, and hast consumed us, because of our iniquities. 
But now, O LORD, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou our potter; and we all are the work of thy hand. 
Be not wroth ve
330,s, 
And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem. 
And ye are witnesses of these things. 
And, behold, I send the promise of my Father upon 
461, that he may declare it, for what the land perisheth and is burned up like a wilderness, that none passeth through? 
And the LORD saith, Because they have forsaken my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither walked therein; 
But have walked after the imagination of their own heart, and after Baalim, which their fathers taught them: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will feed them, even this peopl
460, from Jerusalem unto Antioch. 
And there stood up one of them named Agabus, and signified by the Spirit that there should be great dearth throughout all the world: which came to pass in the days of Claudius Caesar. 
Then the disciples, every man according to his ability, determined to send relief unto the brethren which dwelt in Judaea: 
Which also they did, and sent it to the elders by the hands of Barnabas and Saul. 
Now about that time Herod the king st
334, thou be the Son of God, come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes and elders, said, 
He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be the King of Israel, let him now come down from the cross, and we will believe him. 
He trusted in God; let him deliver him now, if he will have him: fo
451,ers which she had sent unto them. 
They proclaimed a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people. 
And there came in two men, children of Belial, and sat before him: and the men of Belial witnessed against him, even against Naboth, in the presence of the people, saying, Naboth did blaspheme God and the king. Then they carried him forth out of the city, and stoned him with stones, that he died. 
Then they sent to Jezebel, saying, Naboth is stoned
408,ron. 
And it came to pass, while there was war between the house of Saul and the house of David, that Abner made himself strong for the house of Saul. 
And Saul had a concubine, whose name was Rizpah, the daughter of Aiah: and Ishbosheth said to Abner, Wherefore hast thou gone in unto my father's concubine? 
Then was Abner very wroth for the words of Ishbosheth, and said, Am I a dog's head, which against 
381,abbaths, and all her solemn feasts. 
And I will destroy her vines and her fig trees, whereof she hath said, These are my rewards that my lovers have given me: and I will make them a forest, and the beasts of the field shall eat them. 
And I will visit upon her the days of Baalim, wherein she burned incense to them, and she decked herself with her earrings and her jewels, and she
370,m. 
These were heads of the fathers, by their generations, chief men. These dwelt in Jerusalem. 
And at Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon; whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Nadab, 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeah. And these also dwelt with their brethren in Jerusalem, over against 
378, will do in thee that which I have not done, and whereunto I will not do any more the like, because of all thine abominations. 
Therefore the fathers shall eat the sons in the midst of thee, and the sons shall eat their fathers; and I will execute judgments in thee, and the whole remnant of thee will I scatter into all the winds. 
Wherefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD; Sur
324, to pass from the time that he had made him overseer in his house, and over all that he had, that the LORD blessed the Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the LORD was upon all that he had in the house, and in the field. 
And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not ought he had, save t
357,is a pleasant thing if thou keep them within thee; they shall withal be fitted in thy lips. 
That thy trust may be in the LORD, I have made known to thee this day, even to thee. 
Have not I written to thee excellent things in counsels and knowledge, 
That I might make thee know the certainty of the words of truth; that thou mightest answer the words of tr
351,hee: thy walls shall shake at the noise of the horsemen, and of the wheels, and of the chariots, when he shall enter into thy gates, as men enter into a city wherein is made a breach. 
With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy streets: he shall slay thy people by the sword, and thy strong garrisons shall go down to the ground. 
And th
461,send them away fasting to their own houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of them came from far. 
And his disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy these men with bread here in the wilderness? 
And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven. 
And he commanded the people to sit down on the ground: and he took the seven loaves, and gave thanks, and brake, and gave to his disciples to set before them; and they did set the
356,ness, with burnt offering and whole burnt offering: then shall they offer bullocks upon thine altar. 
Why boastest thou thyself in mischief, O mighty man? the goodness of God endureth continually. 
The tongue deviseth mischiefs; like a sharp razor, working deceitfully. 
Thou lovest evil more than good; and lying rather than to speak righteousness. Selah.
356,, and hide it there in a hole of the rock. 
So I went, and hid it by Euphrates, as the LORD commanded me. 
And it came to pass after many days, that the LORD said unto me, Arise, go to Euphrates, and take the girdle from thence, which I commanded thee to hide there. 
Then I went to Euphrates, and digged, and took the girdle from the place where I had hid
333,ndments are my delights. 
The righteousness of thy testimonies is everlasting: give me understanding, and I shall live. 
I cried with my whole heart; hear me, O LORD: I will keep thy statutes. 
I cried unto thee; save me, and I shall keep thy testimonies. 
I prevented the dawning of the morning, and cried: I hoped in thy word. 
Min
396,heir horses also are swifter than the leopards, and are more fierce than the evening wolves: and their horsemen shall spread themselves, and their horsemen shall come from far; they shall fly as the eagle that hasteth to eat. 
They shall come all for violence: their faces shall sup up as the east wind, and they shall gather the captivity as the sand. 
And they shall scoff at the kings, and the
341,is destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet. 
His breasts are full of milk, and
415,me in the morning, but I shall not be. 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
How long wilt thou speak these things? and how long shall the words of thy mouth be like a strong wind? 
Doth God pervert judgment? or doth the Almighty pervert justice? 
If thy children have sinned against him, and he have cast them away for their transgression; 
If thou wouldest seek unto God betimes, and make thy supplication
412,e? let thine hand, I pray thee, be against me, and against my father's house. 
And Gad came that day to David, and said unto him, Go up, rear an altar unto the LORD in the threshingfloor of Araunah the Jebusite. 
And David, according to the saying of Gad, went up as the LORD commanded. 
And Araunah looked, and saw the king and his servants coming on toward him: and Araunah went out, and bowed himself before t
414,For the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; the howling thereof unto Eglaim, and the howling thereof unto Beerelim. 
For the waters of Dimon shall be full of blood: for I will bring more upon Dimon, lions upon him that escapeth of Moab, and upon the remnant of the land. 
Send ye the lamb to the ruler of the land from Sela to the wilderness, unto the mount of the daughter of Zion. 
For it shall be, that
394,of the housetop, than with a brawling woman in a wide house. 
The soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no favour in his eyes. 
When the scorner is punished, the simple is made wise: and when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his
466,ORD also accepted Job. 
And the LORD turned the captivity of Job, when he prayed for his friends: also the LORD gave Job twice as much as he had before. 
Then came there unto him all his brethren, and all his sisters, and all they that had been of his acquaintance before, and did eat bread with him in his house: and they bemoaned him, and comforted him over all the evil that the LORD had brought upon him: every man also gave him a piece of money, and every one a
409,for stubble, and they shall kindle in them, and devour them; and there shall not be any remaining of the house of Esau; for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And they of the south shall possess the mount of Esau; and they of the plain the Philistines: and they shall possess the fields of Ephraim, and the fields of Samaria: and Benjamin shall possess Gilead. 
And the captivity of this host of the children of Israel
405, and bolt the door after her. 
And she had a garment of divers colours upon her: for with such robes were the king's daughters that were virgins apparelled. Then his servant brought her out, and bolted the door after her. 
And Tamar put ashes on her head, and rent her garment of divers colours that was on her, and laid her hand on her head, and went on crying. 
And Absalom her brother said unto her, Ha
473,pillars round about the court shall be filleted with silver; their hooks shall be of silver, and their sockets of brass. 
The length of the court shall be an hundred cubits, and the breadth fifty every where, and the height five cubits of fine twined linen, and their sockets of brass. 
All the vessels of the tabernacle in all the service thereof, and all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of brass. 
And thou shalt command the children of Israel, 
379,e against an ungodly nation: O deliver me from the deceitful and unjust man. 
For thou art the God of my strength: why dost thou cast me off? why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy? 
O send out thy light and thy truth: let them lead me; let them bring me unto thy holy hill, and to thy tabernacles. 
Then will I go unto the altar of God, unto God my exceeding j
444, when ye have heaved from it the best of it: neither shall ye pollute the holy things of the children of Israel, lest ye die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD hath commanded, saying, Speak unto the children of Israel, that they bring thee a red heifer without spot, wherein is no blemish, and upon which never came yoke: 
And ye shall give her unto Eleazar the priest, that
398,ly, neither lie one to another. 
And ye shall not swear by my name falsely, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
Thou shalt not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind, but shalt fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
Ye
336,n, and heavy. And he had judged Israel forty years. 
And his daughter in law, Phinehas' wife, was with child, near to be delivered: and when she heard the tidings that the ark of God was taken, and that her father in law and her husband were dead, she bowed herself and travailed; for her pains came upon her. 
And about the time of her
472, all the people to whom thou shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn their backs unto thee. 
And I will send hornets before thee, which shall drive out the Hivite, the Canaanite, and the Hittite, from before thee. 
I will not drive them out from before thee in one year; lest the land become desolate, and the beast of the field multiply against thee. 
By little and little I will drive them out from before thee, until thou be increased, and inherit the land. 
360,pleased them verily; and their debtors they are. For if the Gentiles have been made partakers of their spiritual things, their duty is also to minister unto them in carnal things. 
When therefore I have performed this, and have sealed to them this fruit, I will come by you into Spain. 
And I am sure that, when I come unto you, I shall come in the fulness of 
382, the city, behold, Samuel came out against them, for to go up to the high place. 
Now the LORD had told Samuel in his ear a day before Saul came, saying, 
To morrow about this time I will send thee a man out of the land of Benjamin, and thou shalt anoint him to be captain over my people Israel, that he may save my people out of the hand of the Philistines: for I have looked upon 
443,d they, when they had heard that he was alive, and had been seen of her, believed not. 
After that he appeared in another form unto two of them, as they walked, and went into the country. 
And they went and told it unto the residue: neither believed they them. 
Afterward he appeared unto the eleven as they sat at meat, and upbraided them with their unbelief and hardness of heart, because they believed not them which had seen him after he w
336, of the second was Zelophehad: and Zelophehad had daughters. 
And Maachah the wife of Machir bare a son, and she called his name Peresh; and the name of his brother was Sheresh; and his sons were Ulam and Rakem. 
And the sons of Ulam; Bedan. These were the sons of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh. 
And his sister Hammole
342,n the plains of Jericho. 
And they did eat of the old corn of the land on the morrow after the passover, unleavened cakes, and parched corn in the selfsame day. 
And the manna ceased on the morrow after they had eaten of the old corn of the land; neither had the children of Israel manna any more; but they did eat of the fruit of the land of
433, the tops of the ears of corn. 
And if it be not so now, who will make me a liar, and make my speech nothing worth? 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
Dominion and fear are with him, he maketh peace in his high places. 
Is there any number of his armies? and upon whom doth not his light arise? 
How then can man be justified with God? or how can he be clean that is born of a woman? 
Behold even to the moon, and it shine
465, the saints, as I have given order to the churches of Galatia, even so do ye. 
Upon the first day of the week let every one of you lay by him in store, as God hath prospered him, that there be no gatherings when I come. 
And when I come, whomsoever ye shall approve by your letters, them will I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem. 
And if it be meet that I go also, they shall go with me. 
Now I will come unto you, when I shall pass through Macedonia: fo
419,har the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminadab, 
And said unto them, Ye are the chief of the fathers of the Levites: sanctify yourselves, both ye and your brethren, that ye may bring up the ark of the LORD God of Israel unto the place that I have prepared for it. 
For because ye did it not at the first, the LORD our God made a breach upon us, for that we sought 
381,rod, the flock of thine heritage, which dwell solitarily in the wood, in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in Bashan and Gilead, as in the days of old. 
According to the days of thy coming out of the land of Egypt will I shew unto him marvellous things. 
The nations shall see and be confounded at all their might: they shall lay their hand upon their mouth, their ears shall be d
365,hstanding ye would not go up, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God: 
And ye murmured in your tents, and said, Because the LORD hated us, he hath brought us forth out of the land of Egypt, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us. 
Whither shall we go up? our brethren have discouraged our heart, saying, The people is greater 
465,em, Ye are from beneath; I am from above: ye are of this world; I am not of this world. 
I said therefore unto you, that ye shall die in your sins: for if ye believe not that I am he, ye shall die in your sins. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou? And Jesus saith unto them, Even the same that I said unto you from the beginning. 
I have many things to say and to judge of you: but he that sent me is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have hear
436,ware lest any man spoil you through philosophy and vain deceit, after the tradition of men, after the rudiments of the world, and not after Christ. 
For in him dwelleth all the fulness of the Godhead bodily. 
And ye are complete in him, which is the head of all principality and power: 
In whom also ye are circumcised with the circumcision made without hands, in putting off the body of the sins of the flesh by the circumcision of Chr
342,e: for it were better for me to die, than that any man should make my glorying void. 
For though I preach the gospel, I have nothing to glory of: for necessity is laid upon me; yea, woe is unto me, if I preach not the gospel! 
For if I do this thing willingly, I have a reward: but if against my will, a dispensation of the gospel is committe
386,
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim, 
And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (of whom came the Philistines,) and Caphthorim. 
And Canaan begat Zidon his firstborn, and Heth, 
The Jebusite also, and the Amorite, and the Girgashite, 
And the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite, 
And the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite. 
The sons of Shem; Elam, and As
347,; so is every one that trusteth in them. 
O Israel, trust thou in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
O house of Aaron, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
Ye that fear the LORD, trust in the LORD: he is their help and their shield. 
The LORD hath been mindful of us: he will bless us; he will bless the house of Israe
467,ad, the fat and the blood, and they have broken my covenant because of all your abominations. 
And ye have not kept the charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, 
444,ire burneth, the fire causeth the waters to boil, to make thy name known to thine adversaries, that the nations may tremble at thy presence! 
When thou didst terrible things which we looked not for, thou camest down, the mountains flowed down at thy presence. 
For since the beginning of the world men have not heard, nor perceived by the ear, neither hath the eye seen, O God, beside thee, what he hath prepared for him that waiteth for him. 

328,, and every bond wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband hath utterly made them void on the day he heard them; then whatsoever proceeded out of her lips concerning her vows, or concerning the bond of her soul, shall not stand: her husband hath made them void; and the LORD shall forgive her. 
Every vow, an
325,and the sons of the brethren of Ahaziah, that ministered to Ahaziah, he slew them. 
And he sought Ahaziah: and they caught him, (for he was hid in Samaria,) and brought him to Jehu: and when they had slain him, they buried him: Because, said they, he is the son of Jehoshaphat, who sought the LORD with all his heart. So the 
380,. 
Then the five men departed, and came to Laish, and saw the people that were therein, how they dwelt careless, after the manner of the Zidonians, quiet and secure; and there was no magistrate in the land, that might put them to shame in any thing; and they were far from the Zidonians, and had no business with any man. 
And they came unto their brethren to Zorah and Eshtaol: a
333,ss unto all nations; and then shall the end come. 
When ye therefore shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, stand in the holy place, (whoso readeth, let him understand:) 
Then let them which be in Judaea flee into the mountains: 
Let him which is on the housetop not come down to take any thing out
322,his neighbour, and it be hurt, or die, the owner thereof being not with it, he shall surely make it good. 
But if the owner thereof be with it, he shall not make it good: if it be an hired thing, it came for his hire. 
And if a man entice a maid that is not betrothed, and lie with her, he shall surely endow her to be his
350,erein, then shall they know that I am the LORD. 
This is the lamentation wherewith they shall lament her: the daughters of the nations shall lament her: they shall lament for her, even for Egypt, and for all her multitude, saith the Lord GOD. 
It came to pass also in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day of the month, that the word of the LORD cam
430,lean shall present the man that is to be made clean, and those things, before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall take one he lamb, and offer him for a trespass offering, and the log of oil, and wave them for a wave offering before the LORD: 
And he shall slay the lamb in the place where he shall kill the sin offering and the burnt offering, in the holy place: for as the sin offer
363,ilene, 
Annas and Caiaphas being the high priests, the word of God came unto John the son of Zacharias in the wilderness. 
And he came into all the country about Jordan, preaching the baptism of repentance for the remission of sins; 
As it is written in the book of the words of Esaias the prophet, saying, The voice of one crying in the wilderness, Prepare ye th
343,like wool, as white as snow; and his eyes were as a flame of fire; 
And his feet like unto fine brass, as if they burned in a furnace; and his voice as the sound of many waters. 
And he had in his right hand seven stars: and out of his mouth went a sharp twoedged sword: and his countenance was as the sun shineth in his strength. 
And when I 
459, blind and the lame shall not come into the house. 
So David dwelt in the fort, and called it the city of David. And David built round about from Millo and inward. 
And David went on, and grew great, and the LORD God of hosts was with him. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar trees, and carpenters, and masons: and they built David an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had established him king over Israel, and that he had exal
374,aziah gathered Judah together, and made them captains over thousands, and captains over hundreds, according to the houses of their fathers, throughout all Judah and Benjamin: and he numbered them from twenty years old and above, and found them three hundred thousand choice men, able to go forth to war, that could handle spear and shield. 
He hired also an hundred thousand
412,Whosoever shall read this writing, and shew me the interpretation thereof, shall be clothed with scarlet, and have a chain of gold about his neck, and shall be the third ruler in the kingdom. 
Then came in all the king's wise men: but they could not read the writing, nor make known to the king the interpretation thereof. 
Then was king Belshazzar greatly troubled, and his countenance was changed in him, and h
399,l the workers of iniquity shall be scattered. 
But my horn shalt thou exalt like the horn of an unicorn: I shall be anointed with fresh oil. 
Mine eye also shall see my desire on mine enemies, and mine ears shall hear my desire of the wicked that rise up against me. 
The righteous shall flourish like the palm tree: he shall grow like a cedar in Lebanon. 
Those that be planted in the house of the 
376,e dragons, and all deeps: 
Fire, and hail; snow, and vapours; stormy wind fulfilling his word: 
Mountains, and all hills; fruitful trees, and all cedars: 
Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl: 
Kings of the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of the earth: 
Both young men, and maidens; old men, and children: 
Let them praise the name of the LO
386, 
And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the younger arose, and lay with him; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father. 
And the first born bare a son, and called his name Moab: the same is the father of the Moabites unto this day. 
And the younger, she also bare a son, and called h
354,thee, consent thou not. 
If they say, Come with us, let us lay wait for blood, let us lurk privily for the innocent without cause: 
Let us swallow them up alive as the grave; and whole, as those that go down into the pit: 
We shall find all precious substance, we shall fill our houses with spoil: 
Cast in thy lot among us; let us all have one purse: 
M
345,yet they knew not the scripture, that he must rise again from the dead. 
Then the disciples went away again unto their own home. 
But Mary stood without at the sepulchre weeping: and as she wept, she stooped down, and looked into the sepulchre, 
And seeth two angels in white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the feet, where the bo
458,sts as they, neither after them shall be such. 
For they covered the face of the whole earth, so that the land was darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the fruit of the trees which the hail had left: and there remained not any green thing in the trees, or in the herbs of the field, through all the land of Egypt. 
Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron in haste; and he said, I have sinned against the LORD your God, and against you. 
426,thee, into one of the priests' offices, that I may eat a piece of bread. 
And the child Samuel ministered unto the LORD before Eli. And the word of the LORD was precious in those days; there was no open vision. 
And it came to pass at that time, when Eli was laid down in his place, and his eyes began to wax dim, that he could not see; 
And ere the lamp of God went out in the temple of the LORD, where the ark of God was, an
338,ind is enmity against God: for it is not subject to the law of God, neither indeed can be. 
So then they that are in the flesh cannot please God. 
But ye are not in the flesh, but in the Spirit, if so be that the Spirit of God dwell in you. Now if any man have not the Spirit of Christ, he is none of his. 
And if Christ be in you, the bo
348, also I delivered unto you, that the Lord Jesus the same night in which he was betrayed took bread: 
And when he had given thanks, he brake it, and said, Take, eat: this is my body, which is broken for you: this do in remembrance of me. 
After the same manner also he took the cup, when he had supped, saying, this cup is the new testament in my bl
448,g forth more fruit. 
Now ye are clean through the word which I have spoken unto you. 
Abide in me, and I in you. As the branch cannot bear fruit of itself, except it abide in the vine; no more can ye, except ye abide in me. 
I am the vine, ye are the branches: He that abideth in me, and I in him, the same bringeth forth much fruit: for without me ye can do nothing. 
If a man abide not in me, he is cast forth as a branch, and is withered; and me
379, the house of the LORD his God. 
And when they came to Hilkiah the high priest, they delivered the money that was brought into the house of God, which the Levites that kept the doors had gathered of the hand of Manasseh and Ephraim, and of all the remnant of Israel, and of all Judah and Benjamin; and they returned to Jerusalem. 
And they put it in the hand of the workmen that 
372,el, the rebellious house, said unto thee, What doest thou? 
Say thou unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; This burden concerneth the prince in Jerusalem, and all the house of Israel that are among them. 
Say, I am your sign: like as I have done, so shall it be done unto them: they shall remove and go into captivity. 
And the prince that is among them shall bear upon his 
437,ere of gold; and he cast for them four sockets of silver. 
And he made an hanging for the tabernacle door of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, of needlework; 
And the five pillars of it with their hooks: and he overlaid their chapiters and their fillets with gold: but their five sockets were of brass. 
And Bezaleel made the ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half was the length of it, and a cubit and a half the
340,e of Pharaoh, and dwelt in the land of Midian: and he sat down by a well. 
Now the priest of Midian had seven daughters: and they came and drew water, and filled the troughs to water their father's flock. 
And the shepherds came and drove them away: but Moses stood up and helped them, and watered their flock. 
And when they came to Reuel 
352,ned for a trespass offering unto the LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one, for Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 
And the golden mice, according to the number of all the cities of the Philistines belonging to the five lords, both of fenced cities, and of country villages, even unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the L
369, as stubble; the fire shall burn them; they shall not deliver themselves from the power of the flame: there shall not be a coal to warm at, nor fire to sit before it. 
Thus shall they be unto thee with whom thou hast laboured, even thy merchants, from thy youth: they shall wander every one to his quarter; none shall save thee. 
Hear ye this, O house of Jacob, which a
471,st and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever and ever. 
And I saw a great white throne, and him that sat on it, from whose face the earth and the heaven fled away; and there was found no place for them. 
And I saw the dead, small and great, stand before God; and the books were opened: and another book was opened, which is the book of life: and the dead were judged out of those things which were written in the books, according to their w
416,dliness. 
And their word will eat as doth a canker: of whom is Hymenaeus and Philetus; 
Who concerning the truth have erred, saying that the resurrection is past already; and overthrow the faith of some. 
Nevertheless the foundation of God standeth sure, having this seal, The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, let every one that nameth the name of Christ depart from iniquity. 
But in a great house there are not
323,they utterly destroyed all that was in the city, both man and woman, young and old, and ox, and sheep, and ass, with the edge of the sword. 
But Joshua had said unto the two men that had spied out the country, Go into the harlot's house, and bring out thence the woman, and all that she hath, as ye sware unto her. 
And the
329,s vain life which he spendeth as a shadow? for who can tell a man what shall be after him under the sun? 
A good name is better than precious ointment; and the day of death than the day of one's birth. 
It is better to go to the house of mourning, than to go to the house of feasting: for that is the end of all men; and the livi
368,els thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle. 
And when the tabernacle setteth forward, the Levites shall take it down: and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall set it up: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own c
354,s buried in the sepulchre of his father. 
Then David came to Mahanaim. And Absalom passed over Jordan, he and all the men of Israel with him. 
And Absalom made Amasa captain of the host instead of Joab: which Amasa was a man's son, whose name was Ithra an Israelite, that went in to Abigail the daughter of Nahash, sister to Zeruiah Joab's mother. 
So Is
337,and rising again of many in Israel; and for a sign which shall be spoken against; 
(Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed. 
And there was one Anna, a prophetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of the tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an husband seven yea
340,nguage, and to the Jews according to their writing, and according to their language. 
And he wrote in the king Ahasuerus' name, and sealed it with the king's ring, and sent letters by posts on horseback, and riders on mules, camels, and young dromedaries: 
Wherein the king granted the Jews which were in every city to gather themselves tog
339,words of the righteous. 
That which is altogether just shalt thou follow, that thou mayest live, and inherit the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not plant thee a grove of any trees near unto the altar of the LORD thy God, which thou shalt make thee. 
Neither shalt thou set thee up any image; which the LORD thy God ha
422,g or sacrifice, for one lamb. 
Or for a ram, thou shalt prepare for a meat offering two tenth deals of flour mingled with the third part of an hin of oil. 
And for a drink offering thou shalt offer the third part of an hin of wine, for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And when thou preparest a bullock for a burnt offering, or for a sacrifice in performing a vow, or peace offerings unto the LORD: 
Then shall he bring with
397,nd when he came, I was afraid, and fell upon my face: but he said unto me, Understand, O son of man: for at the time of the end shall be the vision. 
Now as he was speaking with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright. 
And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the indignation: for at the time appointed the 
440,ing open in his chamber toward Jerusalem, he kneeled upon his knees three times a day, and prayed, and gave thanks before his God, as he did aforetime. 
Then these men assembled, and found Daniel praying and making supplication before his God. 
Then they came near, and spake before the king concerning the king's decree; Hast thou not signed a decree, that every man that shall ask a petition of any God or man within thirty days, save of 
345,hee. 
I am as a wonder unto many; but thou art my strong refuge. 
Let my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all the day. 
Cast me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my strength faileth. 
For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my soul take counsel together, 
Saying, God hath forsaken him:
403,of the Chaldeans. 
Come against her from the utmost border, open her storehouses: cast her up as heaps, and destroy her utterly: let nothing of her be left. 
Slay all her bullocks; let them go down to the slaughter: woe unto them! for their day is come, the time of their visitation. 
The voice of them that flee and escape out of the land of Babylon, to declare in Zion the vengeance of the LORD our Go
452,ue. 
Whoso robbeth his father or his mother, and saith, It is no transgression; the same is the companion of a destroyer. 
He that is of a proud heart stirreth up strife: but he that putteth his trust in the LORD shall be made fat. 
He that trusteth in his own heart is a fool: but whoso walketh wisely, he shall be delivered. 
He that giveth unto the poor shall not lack: but he that hideth his eyes shall have many a curse. 
When the wicked rise, men
407, but they see not; 
They have ears, but they hear not; neither is there any breath in their mouths. 
They that make them are like unto them: so is every one that trusteth in them. 
Bless the LORD, O house of Israel: bless the LORD, O house of Aaron: 
Bless the LORD, O house of Levi: ye that fear the LORD, bless the LORD. 
Blessed be the LORD out of Zion, which dwelleth at Jerusalem. Praise ye the LORD. 

436,se. 
And these are the measures of the altar after the cubits: The cubit is a cubit and an hand breadth; even the bottom shall be a cubit, and the breadth a cubit, and the border thereof by the edge thereof round about shall be a span: and this shall be the higher place of the altar. 
And from the bottom upon the ground even to the lower settle shall be two cubits, and the breadth one cubit; and from the lesser settle even to the gr
378,had known no man by lying with any male: and they brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan. 
And the whole congregation sent some to speak to the children of Benjamin that were in the rock Rimmon, and to call peaceably unto them. 
And Benjamin came again at that time; and they gave them wives which they had saved alive of the women of Jabeshgilead:
352,er in the land of Canaan. 
And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall I know that ye are true men; leave one of your brethren here with me, and take food for the famine of your households, and be gone: 
And bring your youngest brother unto me: then shall I know that ye are no spies, but that ye are true men: so will I deliver yo
428,not overtake nor prevent us. 
In that day will I raise up the tabernacle of David that is fallen, and close up the breaches thereof; and I will raise up his ruins, and I will build it as in the days of old: 
That they may possess the remnant of Edom, and of all the heathen, which are called by my name, saith the LORD that doeth this. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that the plowman shall overtake the reaper, and the 
414,e, when the bridegroom shall be taken from them, and then shall they fast. 
No man putteth a piece of new cloth unto an old garment, for that which is put in to fill it up taketh from the garment, and the rent is made worse. 
Neither do men put new wine into old bottles: else the bottles break, and the wine runneth out, and the bottles perish: but they put new wine into new bottles, and both are preserved. 
Whi
474,t sinned against thee; yet thou huntest my soul to take it. 
The LORD judge between me and thee, and the LORD avenge me of thee: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
As saith the proverb of the ancients, Wickedness proceedeth from the wicked: but mine hand shall not be upon thee. 
After whom is the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou pursue? after a dead dog, after a flea. 
The LORD therefore be judge, and judge between me and thee, and see, and plead my cau
393,th the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying, Because thou hast sent letters in thy name unto all the people that are at Jerusalem, and to Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, and to all the priests, saying, 
The LORD hath made thee priest in the stead of Jehoiada the priest, that ye should be officers in the house of the LORD, for every man that is mad, and maketh himself a prophet
395,n the land that I have given unto Jacob my servant, wherein your fathers have dwelt; and they shall dwell therein, even they, and their children, and their children's children for ever: and my servant David shall be their prince for ever. 
Moreover I will make a covenant of peace with them; it shall be an everlasting covenant with them: and I will place them, and multiply them, and will set m
441,gainst whom the LORD hath indignation for ever. 
And your eyes shall see, and ye shall say, The LORD will be magnified from the border of Israel. 
A son honoureth his father, and a servant his master: if then I be a father, where is mine honour? and if I be a master, where is my fear? saith the LORD of hosts unto you, O priests, that despise my name. And ye say, Wherein have we despised thy name? 
Ye offer polluted bread upon mine altar;
410, the man that is clean, and is not in a journey, and forbeareth to keep the passover, even the same soul shall be cut off from among his people: because he brought not the offering of the LORD in his appointed season, that man shall bear his sin. 
And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover unto the LORD; according to the ordinance of the passover, and according to the manner there
331,e herb of the field; 
In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread, till thou return unto the ground; for out of it wast thou taken: for dust thou art, and unto dust shalt thou return. 
And Adam called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother of all living. 
Unto Adam also and to his wife did the LORD God make coats of sk
391,l against it; come, and let us cut it off from being a nation. Also thou shalt be cut down, O Madmen; the sword shall pursue thee. 
A voice of crying shall be from Horonaim, spoiling and great destruction. 
Moab is destroyed; her little ones have caused a cry to be heard. 
For in the going up of Luhith continual weeping shall go up; for in the going down of Horonaim the enemies have heard
388,suffered, he threatened not; but committed himself to him that judgeth righteously: 
Who his own self bare our sins in his own body on the tree, that we, being dead to sins, should live unto righteousness: by whose stripes ye were healed. 
For ye were as sheep going astray; but are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop of your souls. 
Likewise, ye wives, be in subjection to your ow
372,God, little children, and have overcome them: because greater is he that is in you, than he that is in the world. 
They are of the world: therefore speak they of the world, and the world heareth them. 
We are of God: he that knoweth God heareth us; he that is not of God heareth not us. Hereby know we the spirit of truth, and the spirit of error. 
Beloved, let us love on
365,re spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the G
362,hall be a statute for ever in your generations: ye shall celebrate it in the seventh month. 
Ye shall dwell in booths seven days; all that are Israelites born shall dwell in booths: 
That your generations may know that I made the children of Israel to dwell in booths, when I brought them out of the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God. 
And Moses declared unt
361, the righteous shall not deliver him in the day of his transgression: as for the wickedness of the wicked, he shall not fall thereby in the day that he turneth from his wickedness; neither shall the righteous be able to live for his righteousness in the day that he sinneth. 
When I shall say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if he trust to his own 
360, 
Pilate therefore went forth again, and saith unto them, Behold, I bring him forth to you, that ye may know that I find no fault in him. 
Then came Jesus forth, wearing the crown of thorns, and the purple robe. And Pilate saith unto them, Behold the man! 
When the chief priests therefore and officers saw him, they cried out, saying, Crucify him, crucify him
407,eth the law is a wise son: but he that is a companion of riotous men shameth his father. 
He that by usury and unjust gain increaseth his substance, he shall gather it for him that will pity the poor. 
He that turneth away his ear from hearing the law, even his prayer shall be abomination. 
Whoso causeth the righteous to go astray in an evil way, he shall fall himself into his own pit: but the upright sh
434,LORD be against you, as it was against your fathers. 
Now therefore stand and see this great thing, which the LORD will do before your eyes. 
Is it not wheat harvest to day? I will call unto the LORD, and he shall send thunder and rain; that ye may perceive and see that your wickedness is great, which ye have done in the sight of the LORD, in asking you a king. 
So Samuel called unto the LORD; and the LORD sent thunder and rain th
328,ld. 
And in the most holy house he made two cherubims of image work, and overlaid them with gold. 
And the wings of the cherubims were twenty cubits long: one wing of the one cherub was five cubits, reaching to the wall of the house: and the other wing was likewise five cubits, reaching to the wing of the other cherub. 
And on
371,straitness, wherewith their enemies, and they that seek their lives, shall straiten them. 
Then shalt thou break the bottle in the sight of the men that go with thee, 
And shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Even so will I break this people and this city, as one breaketh a potter's vessel, that cannot be made whole again: and they shall bury them in Toph
400,the prison according to the word of the LORD, and said unto me, Buy my field, I pray thee, that is in Anathoth, which is in the country of Benjamin: for the right of inheritance is thine, and the redemption is thine; buy it for thyself. Then I knew that this was the word of the LORD. 
And I bought the field of Hanameel my uncle's son, that was in Anathoth, and weighed him the money, even seventeen
412,s thy voice, and thy countenance is comely. 
Take us the foxes, the little foxes, that spoil the vines: for our vines have tender grapes. 
My beloved is mine, and I am his: he feedeth among the lilies. 
Until the day break, and the shadows flee away, turn, my beloved, and be thou like a roe or a young hart upon the mountains of Bether. 
By night on my bed I sought him whom my soul loveth: I sought him, but I 
343, the LORD I will destroy them. 
They compassed me about like bees: they are quenched as the fire of thorns: for in the name of the LORD I will destroy them. 
Thou hast thrust sore at me that I might fall: but the LORD helped me. 
The LORD is my strength and song, and is become my salvation. 
The voice of rejoicing and salvation is in the tab
399,humble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always wroth: for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made. 
For the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him: I hid me, and was wroth, and he went on frowardly in the way of his heart. 
I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and
470,nformed the governor against Paul. 
And when he was called forth, Tertullus began to accuse him, saying, Seeing that by thee we enjoy great quietness, and that very worthy deeds are done unto this nation by thy providence, 
We accept it always, and in all places, most noble Felix, with all thankfulness. 
Notwithstanding, that I be not further tedious unto thee, I pray thee that thou wouldest hear us of thy clemency a few words. 
For we have found this man a pestilen
470,eces, though all the people of the earth be gathered together against it. 
In that day, saith the LORD, I will smite every horse with astonishment, and his rider with madness: and I will open mine eyes upon the house of Judah, and will smite every horse of the people with blindness. 
And the governors of Judah shall say in their heart, The inhabitants of Jerusalem shall be my strength in the LORD of hosts their God. 
In that day will I make the governors of Judah li
423,er him into the hands of the Gentiles. 
And when we heard these things, both we, and they of that place, besought him not to go up to Jerusalem. 
Then Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine heart? for I am ready not to be bound only, but also to die at Jerusalem for the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And when he would not be persuaded, we ceased, saying, The will of the Lord be done. 
And after those days we to
458, bullock of the sin offering, which is for himself, and make an atonement for himself, and for his house. 
And he shall take the two goats, and present them before the LORD at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And Aaron shall cast lots upon the two goats; one lot for the LORD, and the other lot for the scapegoat. 
And Aaron shall bring the goat upon which the LORD's lot fell, and offer him for a sin offering. 
But the goat, on which the lo
379,ughts are not your thoughts, neither are your ways my ways, saith the LORD. 
For as the heavens are higher than the earth, so are my ways higher than your ways, and my thoughts than your thoughts. 
For as the rain cometh down, and the snow from heaven, and returneth not thither, but watereth the earth, and maketh it bring forth and bud, that it may give seed to the sower, and 
349,s took the blood, and put it upon the horns of the altar round about with his finger, and purified the altar, and poured the blood at the bottom of the altar, and sanctified it, to make reconciliation upon it. 
And he took all the fat that was upon the inwards, and the caul above the liver, and the two kidneys, and their fat, and Moses burned it u
398,f God our Saviour; 
Who will have all men to be saved, and to come unto the knowledge of the truth. 
For there is one God, and one mediator between God and men, the man Christ Jesus; 
Who gave himself a ransom for all, to be testified in due time. 
Whereunto I am ordained a preacher, and an apostle, (I speak the truth in Christ, and lie not;) a teacher of the Gentiles in faith and verity. 
I wil
454,d himself in Jerusalem, and reigned: for Rehoboam was one and forty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD had chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. 
And he did evil, because he prepared not his heart to seek the LORD. 
Now the acts of Rehoboam, first and last, are they not written in the book of Shemaiah the prophe
456,ments, which if a man do, he shall even live in them; and my sabbaths they greatly polluted: then I said, I would pour out my fury upon them in the wilderness, to consume them. 
But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted before the heathen, in whose sight I brought them out. 
Yet also I lifted up my hand unto them in the wilderness, that I would not bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing with milk and honey, whic
386,in to men uncircumcised, and didst eat with them. 
But Peter rehearsed the matter from the beginning, and expounded it by order unto them, saying, 
I was in the city of Joppa praying: and in a trance I saw a vision, A certain vessel descend, as it had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and it came even to me: 
Upon the which when I had fastened mine eyes, I con
433,, and their cauls, and their round tires like the moon, 
The chains, and the bracelets, and the mufflers, 
The bonnets, and the ornaments of the legs, and the headbands, and the tablets, and the earrings, 
The rings, and nose jewels, 
The changeable suits of apparel, and the mantles, and the wimples, and the crisping pins, 
The glasses, and the fine linen, and the hoods, and the vails. 
And it shall come to pass, that instead of 
464,s. 
These were in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and in the days of Nehemiah the governor, and of Ezra the priest, the scribe. 
And at the dedication of the wall of Jerusalem they sought the Levites out of all their places, to bring them to Jerusalem, to keep the dedication with gladness, both with thanksgivings, and with singing, with cymbals, psalteries, and with harps. 
And the sons of the singers gathered themselves together, bo
322,manded me, that ye should do so in the land whither ye go to possess it. 
Keep therefore and do them; for this is your wisdom and your understanding in the sight of the nations, which shall hear all these statutes, and say, Surely this great nation is a wise and understanding people. 
For what nation is there so great, w
394,d of the LORD that day, and said, How shall the ark of the LORD come to me? 
So David would not remove the ark of the LORD unto him into the city of David: but David carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gittite. 
And the ark of the LORD continued in the house of Obededom the Gittite three months: and the LORD blessed Obededom, and all his household. 
And it was told king David, sa
376, 
And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the LORD, which am but dust and ashes: 
Peradventure there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou destroy all the city for lack of five? And he said, If I find there forty and five, I will not destroy it. 
And he spake unto him yet again, and said, Peradventure there shall be forty fo
419,en that bare Joab's armour compassed about and smote Absalom, and slew him. 
And Joab blew the trumpet, and the people returned from pursuing after Israel: for Joab held back the people. 
And they took Absalom, and cast him into a great pit in the wood, and laid a very great heap of stones upon him: and all Israel fled every one to his tent. 
Now Absalom in his lifetime had taken and reared up for himself a pillar, 
421,ings in righteousness wilt thou answer us, O God of our salvation; who art the confidence of all the ends of the earth, and of them that are afar off upon the sea: 
Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the
342,ly. 
Make a joyful noise unto the LORD, all ye lands. 
Serve the LORD with gladness: come before his presence with singing. 
Know ye that the LORD he is God: it is he that hath made us, and not we ourselves; we are his people, and the sheep of his pasture. 
Enter into his gates with thanksgiving, and into his courts with praise: be thankful
368,ed, and his daughters, into captivity unto Sihon king of the Amorites. 
We have shot at them; Heshbon is perished even unto Dibon, and we have laid them waste even unto Nophah, which reacheth unto Medeba. 
Thus Israel dwelt in the land of the Amorites. 
And Moses sent to spy out Jaazer, and they took the villages thereof, and drove out the Amorites that were there. 
392,hildren of Israel were gone up to Mizpeh.) Then said the children of Israel, Tell us, how was this wickedness? 
And the Levite, the husband of the woman that was slain, answered and said, I came into Gibeah that belongeth to Benjamin, I and my concubine, to lodge. 
And the men of Gibeah rose against me, and beset the house round about upon me by night, and thought to have slain me: and my 
418, come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall hiss for the fly that is in the uttermost part of the rivers of Egypt, and for the bee that is in the land of Assyria. 
And they shall come, and shall rest all of them in the desolate valleys, and in the holes of the rocks, and upon all thorns, and upon all bushes. 
In the same day shall the Lord shave with a razor that is hired, namely, by them beyond the river, by th
448,o the hand of his king: and they shall smite the land, and out of their hand I will not deliver them. 
And I will feed the flock of slaughter, even you, O poor of the flock. And I took unto me two staves; the one I called Beauty, and the other I called Bands; and I fed the flock. 
Three shepherds also I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed them, and their soul also abhorred me. 
Then said I, I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die;
409, commanded; and he lifted up the rod, and smote the waters that were in the river, in the sight of Pharaoh, and in the sight of his servants; and all the waters that were in the river were turned to blood. 
And the fish that was in the river died; and the river stank, and the Egyptians could not drink of the water of the river; and there was blood throughout all the land of Egypt. 
And the magicians of Egy
381,, and killing, and stealing, and committing adultery, they break out, and blood toucheth blood. 
Therefore shall the land mourn, and every one that dwelleth therein shall languish, with the beasts of the field, and with the fowls of heaven; yea, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away. 
Yet let no man strive, nor reprove another: for thy people are as they that strive wit
427, a statute for ever: it is a covenant of salt for ever before the LORD unto thee and to thy seed with thee. 
And the LORD spake unto Aaron, Thou shalt have no inheritance in their land, neither shalt thou have any part among them: I am thy part and thine inheritance among the children of Israel. 
And, behold, I have given the children of Levi all the tenth in Israel for an inheritance, for their service which they serve, ev
447, be offended because of me this night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the sheep of the flock shall be scattered abroad. 
But after I am risen again, I will go before you into Galilee. 
Peter answered and said unto him, Though all men shall be offended because of thee, yet will I never be offended. 
Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, That this night, before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. 
Peter said unto 
322,my brethren: in the midst of the congregation will I praise thee. 
Ye that fear the LORD, praise him; all ye the seed of Jacob, glorify him; and fear him, all ye the seed of Israel. 
For he hath not despised nor abhorred the affliction of the afflicted; neither hath he hid his face from him; but when he cried unto him, h
452,srael, saith the LORD, return unto me: and if thou wilt put away thine abominations out of my sight, then shalt thou not remove. 
And thou shalt swear, The LORD liveth, in truth, in judgment, and in righteousness; and the nations shall bless themselves in him, and in him shall they glory. 
For thus saith the LORD to the men of Judah and Jerusalem, Break up your fallow ground, and sow not among thorns. 
Circumcise yourselves to the LORD, and take aw
464, but ourselves also, which have the firstfruits of the Spirit, even we ourselves groan within ourselves, waiting for the adoption, to wit, the redemption of our body. 
For we are saved by hope: but hope that is seen is not hope: for what a man seeth, why doth he yet hope for? 
But if we hope for that we see not, then do we with patience wait for it. 
Likewise the Spirit also helpeth our infirmities: for we know not what we should pray for as we ought: but the 
350,hem, (though it was turned to the contrary, that the Jews had rule over them that hated them;) 
The Jews gathered themselves together in their cities throughout all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus, to lay hand on such as sought their hurt: and no man could withstand them; for the fear of them fell upon all people. 
And all the rulers of the pro
477,D said to him by the hand of Moses. 
But on the morrow all the congregation of the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron, saying, Ye have killed the people of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, when the congregation was gathered against Moses and against Aaron, that they looked toward the tabernacle of the congregation: and, behold, the cloud covered it, and the glory of the LORD appeared. 
And Moses and Aaron came before the tabernacle of the congregati
324,ea, ten acres of vineyard shall yield one bath, and the seed of an homer shall yield an ephah. 
Woe unto them that rise up early in the morning, that they may follow strong drink; that continue until night, till wine inflame them! 
And the harp, and the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and wine, are in their feasts: but they re
336,to the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, and unto half the tribe of Manasseh the son of Joseph, the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, and the kingdom of Og king of Bashan, the land, with the cities thereof in the coasts, even the cities of the country round about. 
And the children of Gad built Dibon, and Ataroth, a
462,, even to the years of many generations. 
A fire devoureth before them; and behind them a flame burneth: the land is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate wilderness; yea, and nothing shall escape them. 
The appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as horsemen, so shall they run. 
Like the noise of chariots on the tops of mountains shall they leap, like the noise of a flame of fire that devoureth the stubble, as a strong
386,And when they had finished it, they brought the rest of the money before the king and Jehoiada, whereof were made vessels for the house of the LORD, even vessels to minister, and to offer withal, and spoons, and vessels of gold and silver. And they offered burnt offerings in the house of the LORD continually all the days of Jehoiada. 
But Jehoiada waxed old, and was full of days when
372,r servant. 
And whosoever shall exalt himself shall be abased; and he that shall humble himself shall be exalted. 
But woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye shut up the kingdom of heaven against men: for ye neither go in yourselves, neither suffer ye them that are entering to go in. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye devour widows
393,, he shall live thereby. 
Yet ye say, The way of the Lord is not equal. O ye house of Israel, I will judge you every one after his ways. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the tenth month, in the fifth day of the month, that one that had escaped out of Jerusalem came unto me, saying, The city is smitten. 
Now the hand of the LORD was upon me in the evening, afore 
379,o me: and when I waited for light, there came darkness. 
My bowels boiled, and rested not: the days of affliction prevented me. 
I went mourning without the sun: I stood up, and I cried in the congregation. 
I am a brother to dragons, and a companion to owls. 
My skin is black upon me, and my bones are burned with heat. 
My harp also is turned to mourning, and my organ into th
399,the priests, and the Levites, and all the people, great and small: and he read in their ears all the words of the book of the covenant that was found in the house of the LORD. 
And the king stood in his place, and made a covenant before the LORD, to walk after the LORD, and to keep his commandments, and his testimonies, and his statutes, with all his heart, and with all his soul, to perform the w
465,n. 
And they were the more fierce, saying, He stirreth up the people, teaching throughout all Jewry, beginning from Galilee to this place. 
When Pilate heard of Galilee, he asked whether the man were a Galilaean. 
And as soon as he knew that he belonged unto Herod's jurisdiction, he sent him to Herod, who himself also was at Jerusalem at that time. 
And when Herod saw Jesus, he was exceeding glad: for he was desirous to see him of a long season, because he had 
446,and, that he die: he that smote him shall surely be put to death; for he is a murderer: the revenger of blood shall slay the murderer, when he meeteth him. 
But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he die, and was not his enemy, neither sought his harm: 
Then the congregation shall judge between 
444,ays. 
Blessed is the man that endureth temptation: for when he is tried, he shall receive the crown of life, which the Lord hath promised to them that love him. 
Let no man say when he is tempted, I am tempted of God: for God cannot be tempted with evil, neither tempteth he any man: 
But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed. 
Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finish
460, uncovered? 
Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a man have long hair, it is a shame unto him? 
But if a woman have long hair, it is a glory to her: for her hair is given her for a covering. 
But if any man seem to be contentious, we have no such custom, neither the churches of God. 
Now in this that I declare unto you I praise you not, that ye come together not for the better, but for the worse. 
For first of all, when ye come together in the 
454,oshaphat waxed great exceedingly; and he built in Judah castles, and cities of store. 
And he had much business in the cities of Judah: and the men of war, mighty men of valour, were in Jerusalem. 
And these are the numbers of them according to the house of their fathers: Of Judah, the captains of thousands; Adnah the chief, and with him mighty men of valour three hundred thousand. 
And next to him was Jehohanan the captain, and with him two hundred 
380, say, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Rise up and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of man hath power upon earth to forgive sins, (he said unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take up thy couch, and go into thine house. 
And immediately he rose up before them, and took up that whereon he lay, and departed to his own house, glorifying God. 
And t
402,fter them, I will even set my face against that soul, and will cut him off from among his people. 
Sanctify yourselves therefore, and be ye holy: for I am the LORD your God. 
And ye shall keep my statutes, and do them: I am the LORD which sanctify you. 
For every one that curseth his father or his mother shall be surely put to death: he hath cursed his father or his mother; his blood shall be upon h
412,n, we do you to wit of the grace of God bestowed on the churches of Macedonia; 
How that in a great trial of affliction the abundance of their joy and their deep poverty abounded unto the riches of their liberality. 
For to their power, I bear record, yea, and beyond their power they were willing of themselves; 
Praying us with much intreaty that we would receive the gift, and take upon us the fellowship of t
354,y way perfect. 
He maketh my feet like hinds' feet: and setteth me upon my high places. 
He teacheth my hands to war; so that a bow of steel is broken by mine arms. 
Thou hast also given me the shield of thy salvation: and thy gentleness hath made me great. 
Thou hast enlarged my steps under me; so that my feet did not slip. 
I have pursued mine enemie
472,l my steps? 
If I have walked with vanity, or if my foot hath hasted to deceit; 
Let me be weighed in an even balance that God may know mine integrity. 
If my step hath turned out of the way, and mine heart walked after mine eyes, and if any blot hath cleaved to mine hands; 
Then let me sow, and let another eat; yea, let my offspring be rooted out. 
If mine heart have been deceived by a woman, or if I have laid wait at my neighbour's door; 
Then let my wife grind unto
333,or I am come to set a man at variance against his father, and the daughter against her mother, and the daughter in law against her mother in law. 
And a man's foes shall be they of his own household. 
He that loveth father or mother more than me is not worthy of me: and he that loveth son or daughter more than me is not worthy of m
468,ed unto him vain men, the children of Belial, and have strengthened themselves against Rehoboam the son of Solomon, when Rehoboam was young and tenderhearted, and could not withstand them. 
And now ye think to withstand the kingdom of the LORD in the hand of the sons of David; and ye be a great multitude, and there are with your golden calves, which Jeroboam made you for gods. 
Have ye not cast out the priests of the LORD, the sons of Aaron, and the Levites, and h
421,e saith unto the man, Stretch forth thine hand. And he stretched it out: and his hand was restored whole as the other. 
And the Pharisees went forth, and straightway took counsel with the Herodians against him, how they might destroy him. 
But Jesus withdrew himself with his disciples to the sea: and a great multitude from Galilee followed him, and from Judaea, 
And from Jerusalem, and from Idumaea, and from beyond Jo
363,t him dip his foot in oil. 
Thy shoes shall be iron and brass; and as thy days, so shall thy strength be. 
There is none like unto the God of Jeshurun, who rideth upon the heaven in thy help, and in his excellency on the sky. 
The eternal God is thy refuge, and underneath are the everlasting arms: and he shall thrust out the enemy from before thee; and shall sa
421,'s wisdom maketh his face to shine, and the boldness of his face shall be changed. 
I counsel thee to keep the king's commandment, and that in regard of the oath of God. 
Be not hasty to go out of his sight: stand not in an evil thing; for he doeth whatsoever pleaseth him. 
Where the word of a king is, there is power: and who may say unto him, What doest thou? 
Whoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no evil thing: a
359,her. 
And they removed from mount Shapher, and encamped in Haradah. 
And they removed from Haradah, and pitched in Makheloth. 
And they removed from Makheloth, and encamped at Tahath. 
And they departed from Tahath, and pitched at Tarah. 
And they removed from Tarah, and pitched in Mithcah. 
And they went from Mithcah, and pitched in Hashmonah. 
And they de
346,them with sorceries. 
But when they believed Philip preaching the things concerning the kingdom of God, and the name of Jesus Christ, they were baptized, both men and women. 
Then Simon himself believed also: and when he was baptized, he continued with Philip, and wondered, beholding the miracles and signs which were done. 
Now when the apostle
395,ers anointed with oil. 
And if thy oblation be a meat offering baken in a pan, it shall be of fine flour unleavened, mingled with oil. 
Thou shalt part it in pieces, and pour oil thereon: it is a meat offering. 
And if thy oblation be a meat offering baken in the fryingpan, it shall be made of fine flour with oil. 
And thou shalt bring the meat offering that is made of these things unto the L
332,nd to build a fort. 
And it shall be unto them as a false divination in their sight, to them that have sworn oaths: but he will call to remembrance the iniquity, that they may be taken. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have made your iniquity to be remembered, in that your transgressions are discovered, so that in al
324,s name upon his rod. 
And thou shalt write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one rod shall be for the head of the house of their fathers. 
And thou shalt lay them up in the tabernacle of the congregation before the testimony, where I will meet with you. 
And it shall come to pass, that the man's rod, whom I shall choo
416,a in the sight of all Israel; and they feared him, as they feared Moses, all the days of his life. 
And the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Command the priests that bear the ark of the testimony, that they come up out of Jordan. 
Joshua therefore commanded the priests, saying, Come ye up out of Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD were come up out of the mi
389, spoken? 
But since ye say, The burden of the LORD; therefore thus saith the LORD; Because ye say this word, The burden of the LORD, and I have sent unto you, saying, Ye shall not say, The burden of the LORD; 
Therefore, behold, I, even I, will utterly forget you, and I will forsake you, and the city that I gave you and your fathers, and cast you out of my presence: 
And I will bring an
361,ed. 
And they took up Asahel, and buried him in the sepulchre of his father, which was in Bethlehem. And Joab and his men went all night, and they came to Hebron at break of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were s
342,de, neither shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new fruit according to his months, because their waters they issued out of the sanctuary: and the fruit thereof shall be for meat, and the leaf thereof for medicine. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; This shall be the border, whereby ye shall inherit the land according to the twe
429,t High proceedeth not evil and good? 
Wherefore doth a living man complain, a man for the punishment of his sins? 
Let us search and try our ways, and turn again to the LORD. 
Let us lift up our heart with our hands unto God in the heavens. 
We have transgressed and have rebelled: thou hast not pardoned. 
Thou hast covered with anger, and persecuted us: thou hast slain, thou hast not pitied. 
Thou hast covered thyself with a 
